 
 
When They say "I hate America", what do you think They mean?
 
 
Why is the United States, in your opinion the paragon by which all things bad are compared to and found guilty of committing?
For as long as I can remember, I read or watched the news fairly consistently. Frequently, pictures of burning flags, placards or quotes from around the world were/are featured, each with the same message. American tourists and journalists are kidnapped or tortured as a message, Anti-US propaganda is delivered in speeches or found on newsstands and each country seems to despise the states for it's own independent reasons. I realize in Chechnya and other places, the US isn't top priority, but at some point in every country, at one time or another, the US will be bashed. For the most part, the world's knives are aimed at the US.
I'm not trying to over simplify the issue, but I was listening to an opinion piece the other night, I started thinking how his anti-usa rhetoric was ludicrous, and typically canadian. Another program (a couple of years ago), 60 Minutes did a segment in Pakistan, where students chanted anti-american slogans as answers to questions, the show could have been from anywhere at anytime. I remember reading about the pilot of a 911 plane, how he lived amoung us. And yet he hated us, so much. Because of what he saw on T.V. and witnessed around him. The apparent loose morals...
And on another show, a few weeks ago, Americans were asked, why the world hated them? I was astounded by some of the answers.

What is it about the United States that draws such sentiment? Many western countries share the same principles and ideologies. Our mongrel (that is to say, we are mixed in colour and creed) populations and development are on par and our governments are usually in agreement, in accord. We have similar lifestyles, education, employment, religions, justice systems and leisure. And yet the US is normally the target.
Why?
Is it the military might, the foreign policy, Bush, Clinton, and/or Reagan. Hollywood, the strength of the US dollar, the drug or terrorist policies, all of these, none of it.

As a side note, Why aren't some americans more aware of these feelings?
Plenty of the answers on the program were based on the idea that the world is jealous. That would never have occured to me.
 
 
Although I don't agree with the outright hatred, I can see why those outside of the United States may have a dislike of Americans. I suspect the hatred is really more to do with the American government than the actual people of the United States.

You've heard the phrase "ugly American"? I think it describes those Americans who, outside their own country, conduct themselves in a manner that would suggest they feel entitled to continue behaving as though they were still in the U.S.A. Their belief that just because they are American, they should be treated differently (better) is part of it. And then there is the arrogance that accompanies citizens who feel their country is the best in the world and flaunt that feeling abroad. No one outside the U.S.A. wants to hear that because it is a put down of their own nation.

With that said, I don't believe there are many Americans today who conduct themselves in this manner and I don't believe that even during the time that phrase was coined that every American behaved that way. But the image remains.

With a history of military intervention in so many parts of the world, there is another image of Americans as being "bullies". I don't think the latest war is doing much for that image.

Oh, I forgot one other segment of America. Aside from government and people, there is corporate America. Think Union Carbide and what happened in Bhopal, India and you have another reason for resentment towards Americans.

Ceili, you also touched on the aspect of "loose morals". Given the global village our world is becoming, many other countries are able to access American pop culture, certainly more so than ever before. Many citizens of those nations who see their youth adopting western attitudes are more than unhappy about this change. I would imagine the feeling is if Americans weren't so morally corrupt, their influence wouldn't be so negative.

That's how I see part of it anyhow.
 
 
I would tend to say that people generally hate the country with the most power. Not that they are jealous, it just seems to be the default.

I like one of caprice's answers better, though. When the two mass immigrations occurred in the US, parents would see their children reject old traditions in favor of Americanized ones, and they hated the country for that. This happens today, but it causes a lot more grief because Americanization is invading other countries.
 
 
 
Last month, a survey was conducted by the U.N Worldwide--The only question asked was:

"Would you please give your honest opinion about solutions to the food shortage in the rest of the world?"

The survey was a HUGE failure.

In Africa they didn't know what "food" meant.
In Eastern Europe they didn't know what "honest" meant.
In Western Europe they didn't know what "shortage" meant.
In China they didn't know what "opinion" meant.
In the Middle East they didn't know what "solution" meant.
In South America they didn't know what "please" meant.
And in the USA they didn't know what "the rest of the world" meant.
 

I think the isolationism that this refers to is a part of the source of it in the western world.
 
 
What's this "China" place you talk of? That isn't on my map of America!
 
 
Big, rich, powerful - that's three - any country with all those is gonna be hated, c'mon!

Hypocrisy would be another - all countries are hypocritical, of course - but the States really spouts goodness (and does a lot) but does lots of open and secret badness - then says: "Who? ME???!...bats eyelashes. AND is patronizing, often, with it. Lots of countries and economies have been affected by this. Many people have good reason to hate the States. Many don't.

And - we all like to whinge and moan, rather than look at the positives - especially with a big target. I suspect - to get all psychological - that the US has a good mummy/bad mummy role in the psyches of many parts of the world. The milk and approval are wanted - the power and control and bad behaviour aren't - and, I think a lot of some people's internal emotional angst is projected onto the US - as is the blame for bad lives.

And the ubiquity and 'orridness and power of many aspects of US exported mass culture. It is easy to see that, and not the wonderful aspects of American culture.

Some's fair, some sucks. Like criticism of any country.

I guess, too, the closer, the more threatening; and the bigger the nose hairs and black heads look, too - and the worse the morning breath...

Canada is CLOSE.....
 
 
Quick answer...more later. Good responses, above.

I think it is the perceived lack of understanding in the USA that other cultures and systems of government, commerce and religions are equally valid alternatives, each with their pros and cons.

...and the use of power to prevent developments that commercial interests, which fund politics, find too hard to handle, e.g. the Kyoto agreement on climate change.

KP
 
 
Yeah - and the big target thing comes in there. Oz hasn't signed either - AND has tried to negotiate "developing nation" wiggle room - we deserve to be kicked in the bum on this as much as the USA - if any bum kicking is to be done - but, except for people who go digging, who notices what Oz does?
 
 
Oh, and we invaded Iraq, too - but even the US thinks we were Austria...
 
 
 
who notices what Oz does?
 

You got that right. There were three leaders most responsible for the invasion. George Bush, Tony Blair, and John Howard. But Howard never get's mentioned, even though he's just as big a criminal as the other two.
 
 
Well, depends, assuming they are all criminals, on whether you measure the size of the criminal on the basis of intent, or the size of the military force...

We speak loudly - (albeit, into the wrong of the megaphone) - and carry a small stick.....
 
 
I never knew so many people hated us until just the last few years after the Iraq and the UN thing. After 9/11 it was painfully obvious that the extremist in the Muslim faith resented us, but I thought it was pretty much limited to them.

I think it is our arrogance in wanting to turn the whole world into "democratic states" whether they like it or not. Also, not to bring up sensitive issues, but it is our obvious partiality to Israel over Palestine that shows not only in our policies but in just the talk on TV from the news pundits and from ordinary people who either call in or email in their opinions or in some kind of forum like this where those from other countries can hear or read what they are communicating too.

Also since we are so big (we should remember that Rome was once too)if another country or the UN disagrees with us we just pooh pooh that country as irrelevant.
 
 
It's the American government I've always had a problem with. I don't like the arrogance and the bullying that goes on, along with the super power attitude. They feed the rich and forget about the poor, so I had lost respect for the government a long time ago. They want to control everyone and they don't care who they hurt as long as they get their way. It's all about money and power with them and the hell with the people, unless they're rich people of course! I hate greed!
 
 
Power & wealth both beget envy, fear, hatred between individuals & nations.
America is a proud, powerfull nation & has a lot of influence in promoting its ideology. The American Way is the way to go, it is said, in the USA.
There are those who believe America wants to force its ideology on them.
But not all nations/cultures/individuals subscribe to that view. They may make that known thru violence, distain or simple rejection.
America should respect the fact that many countries are happy being Muslims, Hindus, Africans, Arabs.
They may drink Coke or smoke Lucky Strike, drive a Chevy but they don't want America telling them how to live or imposing upon them an alien culture.
 
 
Actually, so long as we gain an economic advantage, I don't think we are at all concerned with spreading any sort of ideology. Notice all of the dictatorships/plutocracies we have and do prop up and/or tolerate. If we're taking their stuff, no need for them to take our ideology. If we want to sell them stuff, though, that's another story. There's a lot of purchasing power in China, for instance...
 
 
I wouldn't have said this a year ago, but looking at us from the outside (or trying to), I think fear is a big factor.

We are armed to the teeth. I don't think there has been any such unmatched power, who hasn't set about colonizing and enslaving. I know the terms almost sound silly in 2004, but who likes having some incredibly rich, militarily superior country controlling the world economy, entertainment, trade and politics... I used to have a visual of a global neighborhood-- Countries personified by houses and families, living on a street, interacting with one another. Needless to say, we have the biggest house, the newest technology, the most enviable lifestyle. You can get pretty unpopular in this scenario, even if you have no faults or foibles. If you do, it is so much easier to justify hating you.

I watch BBC News. The US almost invariably leads the first three 'world' headlines. I would be sick of us if I weren't us.

The rest of the world seems to have some sick fascination with the US. Hate us--but for God's sake, don't miss any detail of what is going on here....  

This matter, and the fact that we have done possibly more than we should have of geopolitical dabbling... (which adds to fear) and adds justified resentment.
 
 
I don't believe we have to force Capitalism, let alone the concept of a democratic republic on the rest of the world. The more we bellow, infiltrate and start wars based on false pretenses the more we will be hated.
 
 
During the cold war, many Americans were terrified of the Russians and the same was true of the Russian fear of Americans. No one seemed to realize that the governments of both countries were responsible for the valid fear of nuclear holocaust.

I think the hugeness of the US is what brings on such hatred and rightly so, because our power is overwhelming to almost every other nation on earth. Our corporations are only concerned with profit, even if it means that we support governments that are terribly oppressive. Do you think most corporations of the world don't do the same thing? Problem is, the US can cause damage and destruction on a massive scale.

Hitler was and is considered the most heinous monster of the 20th century. Who remembers Pol Pot and so many other evil leaders? Size is what makes Hitler so reviled, but he really wasn't any worse than any of the other monsters.

Then there is our entertainment industry. Good grief!! How can we be so puritanical while producing such sleaze? At least Europe is open about nudity and sexuality.

Here is a link with an excerpt from an article by Richard Reeves I found on Yahoo about the flap over Janet Jackson's boob popping at the Super Bowl.

 http://story.news.yahoo.com/news?tmpl=story&cid=123&e=2&u=/uclicktext/20040207/cm_ucrr/boobpoppingaspublicdiplomacy 

 
Does it matter at all? Well, it seems to concern some conservatives in the streets of Washington. Michael Powell -- the powerful Powell, the one who is chairman of the Federal Communications Commission (news - web sites) -- says he is outraged. His indignation confuses me as much as the halftime music, because he is one of the people so hot for deregulation of all sorts. Is it possible that there's some connection between the deregulation so dear to economic conservatives, the freeing of media corporations from restraints on ownership and content, and the down-and-dirty garbage so offensive to cultural conservatives?

Naw! The great flag-wearing poobahs of News Corp., Viacom, General Electric and other conglomerating media would never allow that. My God, the children might be watching! And certainly those upright citizens would never allow news to be debased, melded into a branch of entertainment.
 

Our entertainment is shown all over the world. Is anyone naive enough to think that represents everyday life in the US? Apparently many people actually believe what they see on TV or on the news.

Our size and power will continue to be hated and, quite often, for good reason. I just wish that the US could also be seen as a nation of people--individulas, who seldom have the power or voice to restrict the actions of our government, especially if those in power have no compunction about taking action that doesn't require the vote of the PEOPLE.
 
 
It's the ignorance of our current leadership. I betcha things will change big time after November 2004.
 
 
For example. The US has just said that Canada is the biggest risk for letting terrorists in and that our immigration is much to soft, meaning that we pose a threat to the US. In the mean time, illegal immigrants are pouring into the US daily and they are not coming from Canada. This is total bullshit. Canada didn't back the US in their war and the US government has been pointing fingers at us ever since.
 
 
The US was hated long before Bush II, CI.
 
 
 
It's the ignorance of our current leadership. I betcha things will change big time after November 2004.
 

I've got everything crossed ;-)
 
 
 
The US was hated long before Bush II, CI.
 

Yes, but Bush made that hate spread much wider.
 
 
I have a minor disagreement with Diane's post.

She said: I think the hugeness of the US is what brings on such hatred and rightly so, because our power is overwhelming to almost every other nation on earth. Our corporations are only concerned with profit, even if it means that we support governments that are terribly oppressive. Do you think most corporations of the world don't do the same thing? Problem is, the US can cause damage and destruction

---------
Hugeness brings hatred, and rightly so...? We are bad because our profit-seeking corporations are bigger and more successful than others' profit-seeking corps...?

This is where a lot of Blame America types completely lose mainstream Americans. Hated, perhaps. Rightly...because of success...certainly not.
 
 
Sofia, I don't know if fear is really in the "top 10", as it were, of reasons why America is hated by some nations. At least not in the manner you describe. I could see it in a nation such as North Korea, used to keep their citizens from fleeing their nation by espousing lies of the outside world and the crime-riddent, decadent U. S. o' A.
 
 
It's not the hugeness, it's when it swaggers it around with absolutely no humility. The nation was built upon immigrants from other countries. In building on Capitalism, there have been some major growing pains that hurt a lot of people unable to defend themselves. Now we want to prove we can do it globally? Yes, let's prove we can start civil wars in other countries other than our own.
 
 
Have you heard Europeans complain that the US was going to start WWIII, or muck up the environment? Isn't the very reason the EU came about? To usurp US economic/political hegemony?
{Punctuation for clarification. Still a grammatical nightmare.}
Why would Europe not be content to be the perennial distant second to the US?

It may not be fear of being enslaved physically, but mentally, economically, spiritually...?
 
 
 
Although I don't agree with the outright hatred, I can see why those outside of the United States may have a dislike of Americans. I suspect the hatred is really more to do with the American government than the actual people of the United States.

You've heard the phrase "ugly American"? I think it describes those Americans who, outside their own country, conduct themselves in a manner that would suggest they feel entitled to continue behaving as though they were still in the U.S.A. Their belief that just because they are American, they should be treated differently (better) is part of it. And then there is the arrogance that accompanies citizens who feel their country is the best in the world and flaunt that feeling abroad. No one outside the U.S.A. wants to hear that because it is a put down of their own nation.

With that said, I don't believe there are many Americans today who conduct themselves in this manner and I don't believe that even during the time that phrase was coined that every American behaved that way. But the image remains.

With a history of military intervention in so many parts of the world, there is another image of Americans as being "bullies". I don't think the latest war is doing much for that image.

Oh, I forgot one other segment of America. Aside from government and people, there is corporate America. Think Union Carbide and what happened in Bhopal, India and you have another reason for resentment towards Americans.

Ceili, you also touched on the aspect of "loose morals". Given the global village our world is becoming, many other countries are able to access American pop culture, certainly more so than ever before. Many citizens of those nations who see their youth adopting western attitudes are more than unhappy about this change. I would imagine the feeling is if Americans weren't so morally corrupt, their influence wouldn't be so negative.

That's how I see part of it anyhow.
 

I'll weigh in quickly.

As to the reason why the United States is singled out for hatred, while other Western countries with similar values are ignored: I think the basic answer for this is twofold. First, and most obviously, the United States is the biggest and boldest representation of the Western world; it is the sole remaining super-power, and therefore, it is only natural that it will inspire resentment among non-Western societies. Secondly, the United States is the only nation that interacts with and influences every corner of globe, and its policies often have dramatic affects on other nations. Economically, politically, and even culturally, the world is shaped to large degree by America. So, in that respect, people around the world have a real reason for resenting the United States. For example, when the President warned Palestinians not to vote for Yassir Arafat a few years ago. Instances like that help spread the fear of American neo-imperialism. In many cases it is a fear grounded in reality.
 
 
I was just thinking - that the US population is only five percent of the world's, but we consume forty percent of the goods and services produced, and we have the strongest military. That's got to rankle some folks all over the world. The EU is far from usurping the US in economics or politically, because the members of the EU are not all homogeneous. They're going to have enough internal problems that they must face before they externalize their efforts.
 
 
It's not possible to be successful in a competitive enviroment without contributing to the losses of others.

On our way to success we have walked over many a person and made many an enemy.

Sometimes merely through healty competition. Sometimes through less noble means.
 
 
 
It's the American government I've always had a problem with. I don't like the arrogance and the bullying that goes on, along with the super power attitude. They feed the rich and forget about the poor, so I had lost respect for the government a long time ago. They want to control everyone and they don't care who they hurt as long as they get their way. It's all about money and power with them and the hell with the people, unless they're rich people of course! I hate greed!
 

So America should stop handing out free food to drought stricken countries?

We should stop sending all the help in the form of free supplies, volunteer rescue and medical personnel and financial help when a disaster strikes other nations?

We should encourage all the private American relief agencies to spend all their time and money helping the marginally poor here in the states and ignore the devastatingly poor in other countries?

Montana, most of us are not blind to the flaws of our home nation but please get a clue about how much good that America does in the world without asking anything back for it.

Please realize that America isn't the 'font of all evil' that some nations want it portrayed as.

Perhaps we should just pull all our help back to home and watch our quality of life improve even MORE over other nations while theirs slips farther and farther into the toilet.

But we won't do that... why ?? Because we care about those less fortunate than ourselves.

Oh yes... thats the evil americans for you...  
 
 
Thanks for all the interesting answers so far, I have nothing to add at this point, I'm the proverbial fly on the wall.
 
 
 
 
It's the American government I've always had a problem with. I don't like the arrogance and the bullying that goes on, along with the super power attitude. They feed the rich and forget about the poor, so I had lost respect for the government a long time ago. They want to control everyone and they don't care who they hurt as long as they get their way. It's all about money and power with them and the hell with the people, unless they're rich people of course! I hate greed!
 

So America should stop handing out free food to drought stricken countries?

We should stop sending all the help in the form of free supplies, volunteer rescue and medical personnel and financial help when a disaster strikes other nations?

We should encourage all the private American relief agencies to spend all their time and money helping the marginally poor here in the states and ignore the devastatingly poor in other countries?

Montana, most of us are not blind to the flaws of our home nation but please get a clue about how much good that America does in the world without asking anything back for it.

Please realize that America isn't the 'font of all evil' that some nations want it portrayed as.

Perhaps we should just pull all our help back to home and watch our quality of life improve even MORE over other nations while theirs slips farther and farther into the toilet.

But we won't do that... why ?? Because we care about those less fortunate than ourselves.

Oh yes... thats the evil americans for you...  
 

I was born and raised in the US and I was treated like a piece of shit simply because I was a single mother, so you're preaching to the wrong person!
 
 
I didn't ask for handouts either. I worked my ass off and provided for my son on my own.
 
 
 
I was born and raised in the US and I was treated like a piece of shit simply because I was a single mother, so you're preaching to the wrong person!

I didn't ask for handouts either. I worked my ass off and provided for my son on my own.
 

And so because some people treated you a bit shabbily in your single motherhood, you are ready to condemn a nation of 300 million as some sort of 'evilspawn' ?

The billions of tons of food we sent to starving countries don't matter because someone wouldn't 'help you out'

The millions of volunteer man hours spent by American medical personnel in treating the sick and injured of the world are negated because someone 'looked down their nose at you'

And the aide we sent to places that were in need have paled to insignificance because you were treated badly.

Yes I see the evil of America now Montana.      
 
 
I grew up in the Boston area. Before I left the country I owned my own taxi and the amount of homeless people I saw every day turned my stomache. I watched the elderly walking the streets with torn cloths while they went from trash can to trash can looking for cans and bottles to cash in so they could feed themselves. These people couldn't get assistance simply because they had no address. I also watched countless of single parents being harrassed by social services who thought they knew what was best for their kids. I also watched some of them lose their children to social services when they didn't agree with everything they had to say. Failing to cooperate with them was not acceptable. I was one of those parents who was harrassed for 8 long years, accused of medical neglect for refusing to drug my son with Ritalin and was dragged through the mud. I left the country for fear of losing my child, so my hate is a very personal one, and I was an American.
 
 
Fedral, when you are overwhelmingly the richest and most powerfull nation on Earth, giving out free food (which is rarely done without ulterior motives anyway) does not qualify as heroic or benevolent - it is the minimum acceptable.
 
 
 
 
I was born and raised in the US and I was treated like a piece of shit simply because I was a single mother, so you're preaching to the wrong person!

I didn't ask for handouts either. I worked my ass off and provided for my son on my own.
 

And so because some people treated you a bit shabbily in your single motherhood, you are ready to condemn a nation of 300 million as some sort of 'evilspawn' ?

The billions of tons of food we sent to starving countries don't matter because someone wouldn't 'help you out'

The millions of volunteer man hours spent by American medical personnel in treating the sick and injured of the world are negated because someone 'looked down their nose at you'

And the aide we sent to places that were in need have paled to insignificance because you were treated badly.

Yes I see the evil of America now Montana.      
 

You completely missed my point Fedral. I didn't need or want help from anyone. I just wanted to left alone to do what I had to do to make sure my son had everything he needed.

Also, I have nothing against the American public and I did make it clear that it's the government that I have a problem with!
 
 
Fedral
People didn't treat me shabbily because I was a single mother, the government did.
 
 
 
I was just thinking - that the US population is only five percent of the world's, but we consume forty percent of the goods and services produced,....
 

... and 25% of the planet's oil.
 
 
Walter, I know it's obscene, but that's the reality of the world today. What it will be like in the future is anybody's guess. I think the far east is gonna be up there some place in leadership positions - economically and politically, and probably far out-pacing Euroland.
 
 
 
Fedral, when you are overwhelmingly the richest and most powerfull nation on Earth, giving out free food (which is rarely done without ulterior motives anyway) does not qualify as heroic or benevolent - it is the minimum acceptable.
 

Since when does the richest and most powerful nation 'owe' anyone ANYTHING.

If you make more money than me, are you obligated to give me some because you are richer than me?? HELL NO

It is that sort of 'expected involuntary wealth redistribution' that gives rise to anger among Americans.

If you don't like America, next time, don't ask for American help. If Americans offer help, don't accept. Happens all the time.

We Americans are a generous people, we give a lot of our time and money to help those less fortunate than ourselves. We do this with very little pressure or encouragement. Yet when people like yourself seem to look upon that help as an 'entitlement' is when you cause Americans to close their checkbooks.

Keep in mind just how difficult it would have been after WW2 for Europe to rebuild itself without America.

How difficult things would have been in Japan without massive influx of American money.

We are now competing economically and politically with those nations and they can now spit at us after they grew strong on the economic backs of the Americans.

We give because we want to... just remember, we can turn the money tap off if we wanted to, then you would see worldwide suffering the likes of which the world hasn't seen since the Dark Ages. I would like to see Europe feed all of Africa. I would like to see Asia provide disaster support during a crisis.

I would like Africa to do ANYTHING for itself.

Just my rant for today.
 
 
 
 
I was just thinking - that the US population is only five percent of the world's, but we consume forty percent of the goods and services produced,....
 

... and 25% of the planet's oil.
 

By the way, your figures are innacurate, the us doesn't consume 40% of the worlds goods and services.
 
 
Fedral
Gee, I guess all those homeless people I use to see were homeless by choice.

Give me a break!
 
 
Aright, homelessness is not exclusively an American enterprise. Some countries do more to address it, many do less.

We have many institutions that do a lot of good around the world. We also have many corporations and governmental policies that do a lot of bad.

The thing that gets me most (as an Amreekan) is the degree to which we (and, historically, many other world powers) have manipulated other parts of the world to our own benefit, disrupted the local socioeconomic fabric, and then done nothing to rebuild.

Again, this is not just American habit, but we are very culpable. Africa, fer instance, probably owes many of its present problems to the invasion and subsequent withdrawal of European colonial powers, who exploited nations for natural resources and left little infrastructure -- political, economic, or real -- behind. We have done the same thing in the Middle East, shifting our allegiances as we see fit (a couple of decades ago, Saddam Hussein was our ally) with little regard for the ongoing consequences of those actions. Not exclusively our fault, but we are perhaps a little behind the curve of many other nations in being more conscious about how this happens. But why the (perhaps) disproportionate animosity toward the USA? Well, as has been pointed out many times, we are highly, highly visible.

A little story, lacking in narrative and punch: I am a Californian buy birth, and growing up it never occurred to me to hate Los Angeles -- at least, not beyond the generally good-natured ribbing that is typical of us northern Californians. Now, though, I live elsewhere, and have spent very little time in California in the past five or six years. All I see of it is what's on TV -- and, I gotta say, I'm really starting to dislike LA and the rest of California. It's not just the Governator, though that's a big part of it; it's my reaction to seeing the glossy, shallow celebrities of the TV-LA (not the real LA, but the one that's packaged for us on the boob tube). The vanity of it, the self-infatuation, just disgusts me. I never liked it, but that used to be balanced in my mind because I spent time in LA, I knew people there, and so I knew that it wasn't really the way it looks on the tube. Now, rationally I know that it's still the same way, but my emotional reaction -- triggered by television imagery -- is not positive. And that's how the rest of the world sees us. Most people haven't been here, most people in the world don't really know any Americans. They just know about whatever news gets to them, they know what beams in through the satellite (or whatever their source for images and information is), and they know that we frequently exploit and bomb people outside of our borders. Sure, some people get helped out, but the vast majority of the world's population never receives aid from anyone.

Anywho, that's how I sees it. I've got some thoughts about differing opinions of Europeans and Americans about war (nothing original, I promise), but this post has gotten long enough.
 
 
This is the best I can find for now. "USA alone accounts for 6% of the global population, but consumes 30% of its resources. Source: World Wildlife Fund" I know I have seen in the past (proly many years ago) that the 5% population and 40% consumption was in a report I saw. With so many changes in the world population and economies, I'm not surprised by this shift.
 
 
c.i. I've heard western countries consume 80% of the world resources, and Canada uses the most per capita.

Western Countries ie, Europe, N. America and Australia.
 
 
 
For example. The US has just said that Canada is the biggest risk for letting terrorists in and that our immigration is much to soft, meaning that we pose a threat to the US. In the mean time, illegal immigrants are pouring into the US daily and they are not coming from Canada. This is total bullshit. Canada didn't back the US in their war and the US government has been pointing fingers at us ever since.
 

Well, the US also says Mexico is a high risk for letting terrorist in, and that our immigration is much too soft, meaning we pose a threat to the US... Mexico also didn't back the US in their war and the US government has also been pointing fingers at us ever since.

----

Now, on the subject:

hatred is a harsh word. Imprecise, too. But I'll stick to it.

First, yes, there is an element of envy among some people who hate Americans (mind you, not only the government or the corporations).
Whoever was born American hit the affluency jackpot by mere luck. So s/he is some times seen as a person who may work hard and have some skills, but anyhow is inmensely richer than people born elsewhere who work as hard and have similar skills. Yet s/he acts like if the riches were only natural, and not a privilege.
On the hands of this comes the "I got money and can make you dance" attitude. Be it on business, politics or tourism, it's a stinking attitude.

Another terrible American trait is peer pressure. You go the States and find a society which in many senses is exemplary. You talk and have social intercourse with individual Americans -or small groups of them- and they're often charming. You find a bunch of Americans -be them a team of businessmen, a group of spring breakers or the members of a retiree community- and they're obnoxious, more often than not.

Certainly, popular opinion tends, somewhat irrationally, to identify the people with their government. The US government's popularity has a lot to do with the acceptance of the people.
One gets to think: "their government is so ruthless but it gets voted because it delivers the economic goodies Americans live for".
It's really a good guys/ bad guys stuff. I wasn't born then, but I bet Americans were more popular in the late '40s.

Finally, there is this sense of Americans (the bulk of American society) as absurd children.
They go crazy about smoking, but sell cigarettes to the whole world.
They go crazy about drugs, but are the world's top consumers.
They go crazy about some breast showing, but control most of the pornography industry.
They defend democracy, but only if the people vote for friends, not for foes.
They are the easiest jailers. And don't mind executions.
They really do care if the candidate inhaled, if the President had sex with the intern, if his son is gay or his daughters drink.
They never do wrong. And have somebody to blame (better is it's an alien).
They rule the world, but most of them don't want to understand it.
 
 
 
For example, when the President warned Palestinians not to vote for Yassir Arafat a few years ago.
 

That is a very telling statement right there. For the leader of one country to tell the citizens of another country who to vote for is quite audacious. It is situations like these that contribute to the overall dislike of Americans and to view them as pompous and arrogant.

That's my observation anyhow.  
 
 
 
Canada is CLOSE.....
 

Ya saying we're seeing the nose hairs up close?  
 
 
 
It's not possible to be successful in a competitive enviroment without contributing to the losses of others.

On our way to success we have walked over many a person and made many an enemy.

Sometimes merely through healty competition. Sometimes through less noble means.
 

That may be part of it, but not all of it.
 
 
fbaezer I think you bring up another important point. There is this sense around the world that Americans don't understand other nations and cultures and don't necessarily feel the need to understand. I know that is a blanket statement, but I think this viewpoint may explain another aspect of why Americans are viewed less than favourably.
 
 
 
fbaezer I think you bring up another important point. There is this sense around the world that Americans don't understand other nations and cultures and don't necessarily feel the need to understand. I know that is a blanket statement, but I think this viewpoint may explain another aspect of why Americans are viewed less than favourably.
 

Having traveled through a few dozen countries around the world (and having lived in at least 4 of them) I can tell you that most people in other countries don't understand people in the US very well either. There are plenty that see movies and American TV or listen to music from the US and assume that that is what the US is all about.

It'd be like someone in Dallas, TX watching CBC TV in Saturday evening and assuming that everyone in Canada does nothing but play hockey all day long (I know you folks take an hour or two a day to quaff a few LaBatt's Blues though!   )

When I lived in ME the could see the US-Canadian border markers just by looking out my living room window ad I can tell you that no one could tell the difference between the Canadians and the Mainiacs unless they saw the license plates on the cars.
 
 
Stereotypes are part of not understanding each other. And yes, they exist everywhere. (I somehow remembered this militant left-wing Italian girl who believed Americans made lousy lovers; the 3 Mexicans in our party said almost at once: "You're soooo wrong!").

One aside about Fishin's statement. The world gets the misconceptions about the US from the US media. The US gets the misconceptions about the rest of the world from the US media.

How many Americans do you know that do not watch foreign films?
How many non-Americans do you know that watch only their national films?
 
 
Ahh, fbaezer, I agree with your sense of the reaction to americans/america completely, I see thinking all those things you listed and could probably add a bunch.

I am not my government, but many "I's" elected it and don't modify its ways very easily. We in the US pride ourselves on our government being representative, and in the end, it is -- even this minute, with a controversially positioned president. To the extent any government can be an arm of popular will or lack of it, ours is, though we do have ways for one person/one vote to not obtain, and most don't vote.

First time I noticed antipathetic reaction was back in the sixties in Guadalajara, in the hotel my friend and I stayed at. I include my friend and I in the grossness. She and I stayed at the Hilton. She had arranged the trip, the interest stemming from her desire to be a stewardess and travel. We got to Guadalajara and she had some kind of fit about it being just like Hawaii, why did we come here, let's leave tomorrow, as we taxi'd to town. This was back when I was a little ball of smart and shy, and was plain old stunned, loving every minute of going to the city and completely confused by her reaction.

As we waited to check in, there was a bunch of loud people, with apparent Texan accents, sorry Texas friends. Loud, loud, loud and demanding, their voices filling the rather large lobby.

My friend got over her wish to leave quickly. Over a week we felt comfortable there, and were shown around by an egyptian medical student and a mexico city businessman - they were courteous and fun - and then by a grad student I knew from LA who was in the history department at the Autonoma. This was my first trip outside of the US, short of a visit to Tijuana with my smart ass group (sag) girlfriends to stay with the family of one of them. Anyway, low level american lab tech that I was, I was a person of amazing privilege then, and saw it. That was the start of a lot of eye opening.

As US citizens, what e'er our good points, we are very solopsistic. So are lots of people in other places, but we seem to revel in our selforiented rays more noticibly.

I don't hate the US, my country. I can understand vast resentment to the tourist I was in the sixties - and then when you add all the world violence for questionable ends we have fostered, plus some other matters, I can understand hatred.

I don't personally know how to fix all this.
 
 
fbaezer

Excellent post.

There was a wonderful piece which I linked some months ago, written by a longtime BBC news writer, which sought to address this question. It will be hard to find, as I don't recall his name, but I'll try.

I'll make a point here which I've made before. There is not, in Canada, nor in any other country I know of, a corollary to the term and notion of 'anti-americanism'. The term 'anti-canadianism' simply does not exist in discourse - I've NEVER seen it. Have any aussies bumped into 'anti-australianism'? Anti-Dutchism?

An element to the complaints above, I think, relates to this oddity...the US really does NOT like to be criticised, even from within. It is of the nature of (and fedral reflects this above), "How DARE you?" It's a tad snooty.
 
 
If you do a Google search you'll find a few hundred pages that use the term "anti-Canadianism" and a few thousand that use the term "anti-Canadian" bernie.

Certainly no where near the numbers for "Anti-American" but there a bit...

 
One aside about Fishin's statement. The world gets the misconceptions about the US from the US media. The US gets the misconceptions about the rest of the world from the US media.
 

Probably true enough. Our daily programming is a lot more heavily tilted towards "fictional entertainment" than it is in most other countries. That's a bit of an odd-duck to try and tackle but...
 
 
Sofia, in my post I was trying to make the point that the US isn't alone in its greed, but that because of our size, it is far more apparent than it is in other countries.

I've heard a few Europeans complain about Germans being the most obnoxious and demanding tourists. I have to admit this pleased me no end, being so used to hearing about the ugly American.

I really do think the size has most to do with it, because human nature is universal, with greed and altruism abundant in everyone. If other countries had the power of the US, I'd be willing to bet that they would fall into the trap of using their power in unjust and ugly ways. This isn't condoning the US and its uglier side, just saying that I think human nature comes to the fore fairly predictably, depending on the situation.
 
 
So size matters, diane?

(The matron of a Greek campground once ran down Aussies to me, but I didn't understand enough to make out what her specific complaints were.)
 
 
There was an absolutely wonderful issue of Granta called "India!", that went into the complexity of that country and how hard it is to quantify. I think we are getting a bit too simplistic about America with things like,

 
the US really does NOT like to be criticised, even from within. It is of the nature of (and fedral reflects this above), "How DARE you?" It's a tad snooty.
 

Of course that exists, but the opposite side of that coin exists, as well -- see Farmerman's response on the "bamboozled" thread just now for an example. We Americans are often criticizing America, and vociferously. We're too damn big and contradictory to categorize so easily. (Will go get that issue and see if I can find some of the choicer quotes...)
 
 
An honest and true explanation of why "they" hate america...a few days post 9/11, dys was flying out of JFK to Lisbon and being the times as they were there was a bomb scare at JFK so we were all herded out to a parking lot while some german shephards in the company of uniformed teenagers sniffed about for bombs as well as crotches of old men and young girls. As I lay down my pack and sat upon the pavement along comes this young and quite attractive young lady to sit beside me. "you must like country/western music" she opens the conversation "No, I reply, I like neither country nor western music, but thanks for asking." She continues with "I just want to go home-I hate it here." Um I think to myself she must not be from Queens so I ask her "Where is the home you wish to go to?" "Poland" she answers. Then she proceeds to tell me her tale of woe as to having been an exchange student here in the US (Vermont) for the past year and how homesick she is. "So," I says to her, "how did you like living in America?" "I hate-hate-hate it here!" she says. Wow I think pretty strong feelings from this girl so I ask her "What did you find so bad here in America?" and she answers quick as a pflash "Well, here they take white gooey stuff they call bread and on one slice they put a salt called Peanut Butter and on another slice of this white gooey stuff they put a sugar called Jelly and THEN they smoosh it togther and EAT IT!" "Never, ever could I come back to a country that does this kind of abomination and call it FOOD" so now you know why "they" hate america
 
 
dys, Love that story!  
 
 
That's about as good of an answer as I've tasted.
 
 
LOL Dys :-D
 
 
Dys, you are always so obscure and obtuse!
Isn't that what people usually complain about regarding your posts? Keep it up, sweetcheeks.
 
 
What I read into that story was that when foreigners complain about the US, it's so innocuous, it really doesn't translate into "hate."
 
 
Yeah, dys, keep on dyssing us!
 
 
Interesting thread. It appears that nearly all agree that the size/power/impact of American political, cultural, and economic activities on the rest of the world is at least a major contributor or cause of the reactions being cited.

With that in mind it might be useful to consider other times and other equivalently dominant powers to contemplate just what might be the "normal" levels of such resentment directed at such size, power, and impact. The Ottoman Empire in the 12th and 13th centuries; the Spanish Empire after the abdication of Charles V; revolutionary and Napoleonic France all come to mind. Certainly the British Empire in the mid and late 19th century is a model that suggests comparison. Each of these powers exerted great political, economic, and cultural influence on the outside world, and each was both resented and admired for it. On the outside resentment generally exceeded admiration, often by wide margins.

However all of these great powers had formidable rivals which either locally or at certain times posed serious threats to them. I believe this significantly diminished the focus on the central power and the intensity of both positive and negative reactions to it. In fact the present situation, after the Cold War, is quite unusual in the relative absence of any serious rivals. History suggests this interregnum will be brief - new rivals are emerging and the relative dominance of the U.S. will fade. Indeed many historians note that the decline of great powers begins at precisely the moment they defeat the last of their serious rivals. It is a fact that we are living in unusual times from an historical perspective, and this fact bears significantly on the question at hand.

Despite this, some aspects of what has been described on this thread were visible to some long before our political ascendancy. Images of the grasping and vulgar Yankee can be found in English literature just a generation after our independence. A later, and perhaps the best illustration of this is Ivan Bunin's short novel "The Gentleman from San Francisco" written just before WWI in Czarist Russia, It portrays a complacent, self-obsessed, materialist, and unfeeling American, abroad and quite unable to see or feel the human drama around him. Though Bunin was doubtless writing about a feature of the modern world he disliked, the fact that he chose a decidedly American model for this self-absorbed materialism is indicative of his impressions and those of the many readers to whom he appealed.

At the same time one must also acknowledge DeTocqueville's very admiring descriptions of the internal features of American life, politics, and culture. In addition, while Bunin was writing his story, hundreds of thousands of immigrants were pouring into the U.S. from throughout Europe, all seeking a better life.

Which image is the truth? The hell of it is that both are true.

We should also note that had the political leaders of Germany, France, Russia, Austria, and Britain not been so incredibly foolish in 1905 -1914, -- inaugurating as they did a needless and horrible war and a century of revolution, war and destruction that wasted innumerable lives and much treasure throughout the world,-- we would today be discussing the arrogance of an utterly rich and dominant Europe.
 
 
george, I believe you have correctly illustrated what has happened to the US ala history. However, I think the quickness of communication has influenced more of the world populace against the almighty US. Mexicans and Cubans still risk their lives to cross the border in the US to improve their lives. Who can blame them? Over half the world's population lives on less than $2 per day. The imaginary gold mountain in the US is a great attraction. The difference between love and hate is a very thin line indeed.
 
 
Cicerone, with respect to modern mass communications, I think fbaezer said it best -

 
The world gets the misconceptions about the US from the US media. The US gets the misconceptions about the rest of the world from the US media.

 
 
 
I find it interesting that a large number of posters here are Americans themselves...speculating on why they are hated in other parts of the world.

I liked dyslexia's story! *L* And what c.i. said about the word "hate" is quite often true!
 
 
Equally as interesting is the number of foreign posters here commenting on this country, but often not their own.
 
 
I asked them to, caprice. I don't think you can exclude the american view. I'm interested in 'what' and 'why' americans are hated. The view from home can be rather limiting (not that I've seen this yet) but it is important.
 
 
 
Equally as interesting is the number of foreign posters here commenting on this country, but often not their own.
 

That isn't the point. This thread is about Americans.

Ceili: I'm not saying exclude the American view, just that I find it odd to have Americans comment on what they think the non-American is thinking.
 
 
 
Equally as interesting is the number of foreign posters here commenting on this country, but often not their own.
 

I've lived in both the US and Canada and I love here in Canada. If I come across anything negative about it, I'll let you know ;-)

Actually, I'm not crazy about the gas prices.
 
 
 
Actually, I'm not crazy about the gas prices.
 

*LOL* Join the club! The only place in the world where you can have a gas refinery right on the city boundary and pay more than places that are miles and miles and miles away from it.

Hey, I know this isn't any of my business and you can certainly tell me so...but...I'm a nosey one and I can't help but ask, how were you able to relocate to Canada?
 
 
LOL on the gas thing. Go figure.

Don't worry about being nosey because I'm nosey too, lol. Both my parents were born here, so I am a dual citizen.
 
 
I just came back from NY and I loved it there !! The place is sooooooooo cheap - and the people sooooooooo polite....

Maybe I should think of moving bag and baggage there..
 
 
 
Don't worry about being nosey because I'm nosey too, lol. Both my parents were born here, so I am a dual citizen.
 

Well isn't that handy! Do you have family at that end of the country? Just wondering if that is why you chose NB.
 
 
 
I just came back from NY and I loved it there !! The place is sooooooooo cheap - and the people sooooooooo polite....

Maybe I should think of moving bag and baggage there..
 

*L* Wow, I'd always heard jokes about how rude New Yorkers are! I was there once, many, many years ago. I don't recall anyone being particularly rude. I just remember the insanity of the traffic.
 
 
Haven't read the answers yet. Please forgive me if I duplicate someone's thoughts in answering Ceili's question.

1) David vs. Goliath stories sell newspapers and TV time everywhere. One of the rules in these stories is that people always cheer for David. America is the ultimate Goliath due to its military and economic power, so it gets cheered against. As a German, I can affirm that anti-Americanism is much more common in televised and printed opinion than if you ask Germans face-to-face in the real world.

2) America has been a free country for very long. As a result, it is more diverse than most countries in just about every way imaginable. Therefore, anything that happens will probably happen in America first. And because bad news sell more papers than good news, the bad stuff that happens in America first gets more coverage than the good stuff that happens in America first. As an aside, my parents still make fun of some members of socialist German student societies in the 60 who printed flyers against everything American while drinking Coca-Cola and listening to Jimi Hendrix.

3) Actual knowledge of America, at least here in Europe, is declining. America used to have a fairly dense network of "America Houses" that brought American culture to the Europeans in the form of libraries, frequent lectures by American scholars, frequent readings by American novelists and poets, and so on. They didn't tell us much in terms of facts that we didn't know from the news, but they gave us a feeling for how the American culture worked, and that America has more to offer than lowest common denominator mediocricity á la McDonalds and Disney. But during the 1990s, the Clinton administration and the Gingrich Congress thinned out this network very much in an effort to curb government spending. These days, when an American president causes an outrage abroad, the buffer of knowledgable people that used to be here is now gone, so the outrage goes undampened.

4) America currently has a president who is the worst bully and the worst extremist to hold that office at least since World War II. I suspect you have to go much farther back to actually find a president who handles foreign affairs worse. True, he has a sincere, competent, and grown-up secretary of state who would do a good job if the administration let him, but the administration won't let him. It almost seems that whenever grown-up Republicans like Colin Powell and Jim Baker get anywhere, their initiatives are killed by friendly fire from Wolfowitz, Perle, and other neoconservative chicken hawks. This gives pro-Americans like me a very hard time when I discuss international politics with my friends.

I think points 1-3 explain why there has always been an undercurrent of Anti-Americanism in the world. Point 4 explains why Anti-Americanism is currently at a peak in the political business cycle.
 
 
 
The place is sooooooooo cheap
 

Well, actually the USA are rather cheap now: since some weeks, I'm buying all my cd's (especially music) direct from the USA. Even with enormous postage added, it's much cheaper than in Europe. (Although funny to see "European import" on the cover :wink: )
 
 
 
So America should stop handing out free food to drought stricken countries?
 

America, as in "the American government", already has pretty much stopped that. Its percentage of the national income dedicated to foreign aid is a fraction of what it is in European countries.

Walter and CI: America, with its 5% of the world population, is not just consuming 25% of the world's resources, it also produces 25% of the world's resources -- including 25% of the world's oil. I can't see the shame in that. Could you please elaborate?
 
 
 
 
Fedral, when you are overwhelmingly the richest and most powerfull nation on Earth, giving out free food (which is rarely done without ulterior motives anyway) does not qualify as heroic or benevolent - it is the minimum acceptable.
 

Since when does the richest and most powerful nation 'owe' anyone ANYTHING.

If you make more money than me, are you obligated to give me some because you are richer than me?? HELL NO
 

It's not quite the same thing but, here in Europe, there used to be a concept of "Noblesse oblige" - if you are Lord of the Manor, you make sure that you look after the whole village, to make sure that no one goes without. A feudal system is highly flawed but it wansn't without its own standards of behaviour.

 
It is that sort of 'expected involuntary wealth redistribution' that gives rise to anger among Americans.

If you don't like America, next time, don't ask for American help. If Americans offer help, don't accept. Happens all the time.

We Americans are a generous people, we give a lot of our time and money to help those less fortunate than ourselves. We do this with very little pressure or encouragement. Yet when people like yourself seem to look upon that help as an 'entitlement' is when you cause Americans to close their checkbooks.

Keep in mind just how difficult it would have been after WW2 for Europe to rebuild itself without America.

How difficult things would have been in Japan without massive influx of American money.

We are now competing economically and politically with those nations and they can now spit at us after they grew strong on the economic backs of the Americans.

We give because we want to... just remember, we can turn the money tap off if we wanted to, then you would see worldwide suffering the likes of which the world hasn't seen since the Dark Ages. I would like to see Europe feed all of Africa. I would like to see Asia provide disaster support during a crisis.

I would like Africa to do ANYTHING for itself.

Just my rant for today.
 

Fedral, I feel like using language that would be ****'ed out on this forum. It is EXACTLY attitudes such as those expressed in this post that INFURIATE those outside the USA.

Your "I'm alright, Jack" attitude takes no account of social responsibility. The EU (and its individual constituent states) give HUGE amounts of money to Africa.

Don't even get me started on the Marshall Plan and its influence on Europe. Yes, it allowed recovery but its political motive was clear: come with us (Capitalists) - you'll make money, we'll make money (interest and sales to these nations) and we won't have to use force to stop you becoming Communists. Hardly charity, I'd say!

As for the protectionism being used by Bush (e.g. for the steel industry or banana producers - at the expense of Jamaica, etc.) it's such hypocracy to preach economic freedom and then slap tariffs on goods to prevent your funding from drying up.

MY rant over!
 
 
Or sugar. Or beef.
 
 
 
 
georgeob1,

I wasn't saying Europe is perfect. I was merely responding to Fedral's post, which made my blood boil.

I do think that Europe's interest/funding of Africa has many reasons - ex-colonial guilt, as well as some economic and immigration-preventing self interest...sure.

My point on "noblesse oblige" is not that it is currently the motivation of many Europeans, but that Fedral's point about the rich being under NO obligation to help the poor goes against the sensibilities in this continent. We offer social security for those who cannot fend for themselves, paid for by those who can. It is often the impression (mistaken or not) that America does not share the view that the community/society is worth preserving, at all levels, rather than merely giving freedom from tax and regulation to those who already possess much.

This is a discussion of why certain feelings of dislike attach themselves to the USA. The Soviet Union is entirely irrelevant to the discussion - the economic system, there, could not support the military spending (which they did out of fear) and, in the end, the system did not survive.

It is not surprising to me that "anti-American" is a synonym for anti-Capitalist, any more than the only place where "Communist" is a real insult (rather than a comment of political alignment) is in the USA.

I can list many things I love about America elsewhere, should you wish...this isn't the place for that!

KP
 
 
 
An honest and true explanation of why "they" hate america...a few days post 9/11, dys was flying out of JFK to Lisbon and being the times as they were there was a bomb scare at JFK so we were all herded out to a parking lot while some german shephards in the company of uniformed teenagers sniffed about for bombs as well as crotches of old men and young girls. As I lay down my pack and sat upon the pavement along comes this young and quite attractive young lady to sit beside me. "you must like country/western music" she opens the conversation "No, I reply, I like neither country nor western music, but thanks for asking." She continues with "I just want to go home-I hate it here." Um I think to myself she must not be from Queens so I ask her "Where is the home you wish to go to?" "Poland" she answers. Then she proceeds to tell me her tale of woe as to having been an exchange student here in the US (Vermont) for the past year and how homesick she is. "So," I says to her, "how did you like living in America?" "I hate-hate-hate it here!" she says. Wow I think pretty strong feelings from this girl so I ask her "What did you find so bad here in America?" and she answers quick as a pflash "Well, here they take white gooey stuff they call bread and on one slice they put a salt called Peanut Butter and on another slice of this white gooey stuff they put a sugar called Jelly and THEN they smoosh it togther and EAT IT!" "Never, ever could I come back to a country that does this kind of abomination and call it FOOD" so now you know why "they" hate america
 

This reminds me of my friends telling me of their bicycle tour vacation in France. After riding 75 miles one day they were starving, my friends are vegetarians, and wherever the group stopped to eat the only choice they had was cold french fries with mayonnaise on them. Yuck!

That would make me never want to go back to France, ever.
 
 
fishin

Acknowledged that google pulls up so much re 'anti-canadianism'...rather a shock to me as I really never ever ever have heard or seen the term, and I read a fair bit.

soz

Sorry, didn't mean to seem or be simplistic. I was trying to isolate a difference. It seems to me that those instances where we respond most negatively to power or priviledge, are where they come attended with pridefulness. lack of reflection, the assumption of superiority, and an apparent disregard for the rest of the community. The sorts of characteristics which we ascribe to an aristocracy.

I doubt there is any way in which the US is totally unique from other nations, including in such characteristics as above. But where she is behaving in like manner, she will be begrudged.
 
 
ps

When a reflective question such as 'why do they hate us?' is raised, it probably would be prudent to assume the 'they' have some seriously legitimate beefs. Didion wrote a wonderful essay in the NY Review a while back pointing to how an initial period of such open reflection in the US was very immediately pushed down by the 'they hate us because we are good and we are free' notion.
 
 
 
 
 
While the former Soviet Union may well be irrelevant to this discussion as you say, I don't believe the relative silence of our critics to that unlamented system is at all irrelevant to an examination of why so much "hatred" is expressed towards the United States, in the era immediately after the collapse of the Soviet System.
 

Oh, I think this is simply because America is a democracy with mass media, so people who have a gripe with the United States can actually make a difference by making their voices heard and expressing said gripe. There was no point in demonstrating against the USSR, because their leaders had no incentive to listen. This logic also explains why most former superpowers were not protested against so much. And it explains why the countries with the worst press in recent decades -- Israel, Pinochet's Chile, and South Africa before 1990 -- were not the worst violators of human rights. They were the just the worst human rights violators whose civil societies were functional enough to be mobilized against the human rights violations.
 
 
Thomas,

Succinctly put. You are likely correct in this. However it does paint a depressing picture of public judgement in free societies. It is one thing to decide not to protest and agitate against an authoritarian superpower because its leaders don't have to listen. It is quite another to c lose your eyes to its faults because of that, and, as a result distort your judgement on other, better systems.

All,

There seem to be lots of Canadians here. What is the source of the apparent particular distemper of our northern neighbors towards us? 1812 was a long time ago and our invasion didn't get very far anyway. Are the descendents of our Tories still angry? Canada enjoys a very favorable balance of trade with the U.S, and derives great economic benefit from its proximity to us. Where's the beef?
 
 
There is a divide in our country between those who want to go around the world to control it to get gain and those that want to go around the world to change it for their own good. Both would cause problems which is why I guess during any presidents time we have some problems with other nations or states or regions. The problem has been made much worse in my own personal opinion by the current president and his administration because of his "with us or against us" policy that he carries out both home and abroad as the political saying goes. He has made us more enemies than we had before. People might not have liked everything about us before and the Muslims and Arabs have long hated us because of our one sided stance with Israel, but other than that I don't think that other nations actively hated us quite as much as they do now.

So what I think needs to happen first and foremost is that we need to get rid of Bush, pronto. Then we need to start looking at things in global way. I mean the world is getting smaller everyday and the oceans, mountains, and deserts are no longer the great dividers that they once were. Not only America needs to do this, but everyone else that are vainly trying to resist globlazation as well. Not that I think nations and states should loose their self governments and cultures, but try to loose this "us and them" mentality.

But, hey, I'm just a housewife in Kentucky mussing around.

Someone said something like because we are rich we should give to those that are not? Yes, that is what humanity and love of your fellow man is all about. Otherwise we all might just as well be animals in the jungles. I guess I'm not mainstream America. (which i think is just a current catch phrase without any real meaning behind it)
 
 
 
 
Don't worry about being nosey because I'm nosey too, lol. Both my parents were born here, so I am a dual citizen.
 

Well isn't that handy! Do you have family at that end of the country? Just wondering if that is why you chose NB.
 

Yup, I'm surrounded by relatives. My mother comes from a family of 11 brothers and sister, and my father had 13 in his family. Both my parents grew up in this area, so it's actually hard finding people around here that I'm not related too, LOL! My mother grew up right next door to where we live now and my great grandparents lived in a house that sat in the same spot as our home now. The house my mother grew up in next door is still standing, but is abandoned now. There are pictures of it in my gallery if you'd like to see them.
 
 
 
There seem to be lots of Canadians here. What is the source of the apparent particular distemper of our northern neighbors towards us? 1812 was a long time ago and our invasion didn't get very far anyway. Are the descendents of our Tories still angry? Canada enjoys a very favorable balance of trade with the U.S, and derives great economic benefit from its proximity to us. Where's the beef?
 

The fact that the US has been pointing fingers at Canada ever since 9/11 might have something to do with it. The ambassador Paul Cellucci actually threatened consequenses for Canada for not backing the US in their war. They also implied that Canada was a safe haven for terrorists, which posed a threat to the US. They banned our potatoes for the longest time for the stupidest thing putting farmers in grave situations. They made threats towards Canada if we proceeded with decriminalizing marijuana. I could go on, but I think you get the idea. I did laugh when you mentioned the war of 1812 though and I assure you that that's not it.
 
 
Gautam
I'm so glad to hear that you had a nice time in NY :-D
 
 
 
Big, rich, powerful - that's three - any country with all those is gonna be hated, c'mon!
 

I've yet to meet my first person that hates Japan.
 
 
You don't know many Americans.... Lots of ole-timers hate Japan. But your point still stands, Japan is hated for their militarism in the past.

This should be a big clue for those who think it's merely the power.

It's not just the power, it's also the will to use it at the expense of others.
 
 
 
That may be part of it, but not all of it.
 

Indeed.

When faced with choosing between a short answer about what I think the real differentiating factor is and listing every possible reason for billions of different people to hate America I chose the former.  
 
 
 
I've yet to meet my first person that hates Japan.
 

Go to Korea, and you'll meet plenty.

Size does count.

Guatemalans, Salvadoreans and Hondurans (at least) have a hate-love-hate relationship with Mexico very similar to the one we have with the United States.
To them, we are "The Colossus of the North" (no kidding), they complain about Mexican economic and cultural "subimperialism" and about patronizing Mexicans who think they own the region.
The also complain about the US. But, then, who doesn't?

Edit: I forgot to add that we also expell them (300 thousand last year) when they try to migrate to the "Mexican promised land" or use our country as a passage way to the "American Dream".
 
 
Or China...

The Japan example is very illuminating. Japan is hated in its region.

Also relevant is that the US really does have an interest in every corner of the globe.

Even Antartica.
 
 
book mark
 
 
 
Canada enjoys a very favorable balance of trade with the U.S, and derives great economic benefit from its proximity to us. Where's the beef?
 

I beg to differ on that point. The North American Free Trade Agreement wasn't exactly the type of deal Canadians wanted and I know some politicians have, in the past, voiced the idea of rescinding the deal. (I think that's only come up around election time though.   If we hadn't had a dumb ass prime minister at the time, I don't think the deal would have gone through.Then you have the lumber dispute, the grain situation and fishing. The latest has to be the whole "Canada is a haven for terrorists" report that U.S. intelligence has come up with. (The whole weapons of mass destruction in Iraq fiasco makes me question the intelligence on this latest report.) I'm sure things have changed now, but when I was a teen, I recall many stories of Americans visiting Canada only to be surprised at how "advanced" we were. In high school, a girl who was born in Canada but spent most of her life in New York, moved back with her family. Her father was a physician, so I imagine that is what made the transitions possible. She and her former classmates in New York thought she would be going to school with "eskimos" and people who lived in igloos. Gee, you Americans only live next door and yet you know (or knew) so little about us?

Some have made the comment of the U.S.A. being so large a presence in the world and I suppose that comes into play within Canada too. I think a lot of Canadians feel we are being "absorbed" by the U.S.A. with so much of our pop culture tied into the American one. A lot of what makes Canada distinct from the U.S. is being eroded, I think, due to business ties with the U.S.A. The premier of the province I live in seems to believe that the American way of government is the way to go based on what he's done to health care and education here, not to mention the deregulation that has been going on -- all to the detriment of the average taxpayer. Ah, but I digress here. Then you have situations like the Stanley Cup -- the "super bowl" of hockey. It hasn't resided with a winning Canadian team in over 10 years. Not that I think it matters now because hockey is less a sport and fan activity than it is a big business. Canadian hockey franchises can't possibly compete against the American dollar and two Canadian teams have already folded. I wonder how Americans would take to the idea of Canadians winning the world series year after year in their national sport of baseball? I've seen the Americans take umbrage over the fact competitors from Japan have been dominating Nathan's hot dog eating contest -- apparently an American tradition. Ahem.

In some ways I think the relationship between Canada and the U.S.A. is similar to rival communities. You know the ones I mean. Although the balance isn't quite the same. The American population is much greater than that found in Canada.

Your last comment on "where's the beef?" alludes to a more recent sore point with Canadians -- the beef industry. Now I'm a veggietarian so the ups and downs of the meat industry isn't going to change what's on my plate but I feel for those in the cattle industry that have lost their livelihood. The latest incidence of BSE was found in a cow that originated in Canada. But I would bet that if every single bovine creature was tested for BSE, you would find just as many American based cows with BSE as you would in Canada on a per capita basis. I think it's rather arrogant for Americans to say they don't have any BSE and it all originates from Canada. I've heard many in the industry (via television and newspaper interviews) state that the cattle industry between Canada and the U.S.A. is so intertwined that it would be unrealistic to say there is no BSE in the U.S.A.

Okay, I'm sort of getting off track here, but from the few anecdotes I've sited here, hopefully you will see a few examples of the way Canadians might view Americans. Generally speaking of course.  

Personally speaking, I have several American friends that I don't view in a negative manner at all. And I have encountered many Americans online (including here) whose chatting company I have enjoyed. That isn't to say I haven't seen the "ugly American" because I have. But I've seen some nice people too. I'd say that I don't care for the way government south of the border works and that it does more for big business and less for the people. I guess I'd have to say that is what I dislike most about America.
 
 
Caprice,

I checked the economic data to verify your claims regarding Canada's trade balance overall and with the U.S. The latest data I could find was for 2002. It shows that Total Canadian exports were $260.5 Billion and total imports were $229 Billion, leaving a total trade surplus of $31.5 Billion. Of those totals 87.7% of the exports (or $228.5 B) and 62.6% of the imports (or $143.35B) were to and from the United States. This means that Canada ran a truly huge $85.15 Billion trade surplus with the United States and a trade deficit of $53.65 Billion with all of her other trading partners combined. So my original point stands. Canada enjoys great economic benefits from her trade with the United States, selling far more goods here than she buys from the U.S. NAFTA does not seem to have hurt Canada's trade as you have claimed.

As for the BSE matter in the cattle so tested,, we (and you) must simply deal with the facts as they unfold. I don't think there was any conspiracy to falsify the facts or to stigmatize Canada unduly. Our trading partners very quickly prohibited the import of U.S. beef after the discovery was made.

Others have noted our concerns over border controls and the potential legalization of pot. Both issues have a good deal to do with the preservation of a traditionally very relaxed and open border between us. Canada is the principal beneficiary of this openness. We are certainly free to make our own policies in these areas (as are you), but a degree of cooperation is required to keep the open border. If it doesn't happen then we adjust for the differences at the border.

I can't help you with the NHL. There are about 290 million Americans and about 32 million Canadians. Based on population distributions in the northern part of our country, that means there are likely to be about twice as many hockey fans in the U.S. as in Canada. While your partisanship may be quite understandable, resentment over these basic facts seems to be rather - well, I'll let you choose the words.

While it is true that many Americans don't know as much as they should about Canada, it seems fairly clear that there are also many Canadians who don't take the trouble to learn much about my country. There are ignorant and crude Canadians, just as there are ignorant and crude Americans. I have no reason to suppose the fractions are different on either side of the border.
 
 
I think part of Canada's resentment to the United States is the constant comparison. We are the little guys, completely over shadowed by Uncle Sam.

That being said, George while your stats may be correct, it doesn't paint a very clear picture of the true nature of trade between the US and anywhere else. Our largest trading partner is the US. Proximaty precludes this and Canadians prosper because of this. However, that doesn't mean we have the upper hand. We are at the mercy of your economy, your trade rules, your government and so on. (rather vague I know, but I daren't sway the intent of the thread too far) There will always be resentment in such circumstances.

I would also like to add, while the american government have, by and large, severely reduced aid to foreign countries, the people themselves have not. Yet regardless of their generosity, it is the government, the press at home and abroad rarely concentrate on it. Or do they?
 
 
No, I think size/power is greatly irrelevant to why Canadians commonly take exception to US policy.

Misuse of that power difference is rather more the issue, I think.

We've had the Ambassador to Canada, and the Drug Czar, both come here on numerous occasions and presume to instruct us (sometimes with threats) on how we ought to organize ourselves socially. The hubris supporting such presumption sits rather poorly here.
 
 
You know, you guys do watch too much hockey. And your beer sucks. (That's what John Candy said, isn't it?)
 
 
Ceili,

From what sources do you get the "constant comparisons"? I see very little criticism of Canada in the U.S. press, certainly far less than I see of the U.S. in Canadian publications. Here on A2K I see far more criticism of the U.S. by Canadians and others than I do of other countries by Americans. Indeed it is sometimes remarkable to note the ease with which others note and examine our many failings and imperfections (and they are many), while remaining apparently oblivious to their own. How many threads here on A2K have been dedicated specifically to fairly harsh criticisms of U.S. politics, culture and international policies? How many to the corresponding errors and failings of others?

I recognize that our situation in the world makes much of this both natural and inevitable. Please recognize, however, that there is little America can do about that. A century of European war and revolution has wiped out the wealth and power of our potential rivals, and left us more or less alone (and perhaps a bit disoriented). We didn't start those wars, although we did take leadership of their last phase - the Cold War with the Soviet Empire. Overall I believe we did that rather well.

With respect to Canada, I believe it was Premier Pierre Trudeau who compared life on our border to sleeping with an elephant. It is simply true that there are about nine Americans for each Canadian, and that there are proportional relative effects, both intended and unforeseen, of our governments' respective actions. The trade data tells an interesting story. Canadian anxiety over this and that potential trade decision by our government is certainly understandable, given the large potential relative effects. However it remains true that for several decades Canada has been the consistent overall winner in the economic give and take of international trade, enjoying a very large and consistent net export margin with the U.S., while we are overall a very serious net importer with both Canada and the world. What does it take to get you guys to shut up?

With respect to foreign aid, I believe that if personal cash transfers are taken into account (The money sent home by Indian, Central American, and other workers here) U.S. cash outflows to needy nations are almost equal (relatively) to those of European nations including government transfers. (We also need the money to finance that big military we think we need to deal with the potential crazies in this world - If Canada is willing to take responsibility for the taming of North Korea, it is welcome to it.) Our experience in aid to many third world nations has also taught us that there is little merit in pouring money down the throat of a kleptocracy or a socialist regime that will just steal and waste it. The sad states of affairs in post colonial Africa are not testimonials to either the wisdom or generosity of their former European masters. (And it will take a long time for Britain, France, Belgium and others to give back what they have taken.) Free enterprise and free trade for those who will choose it have proven to be far more effective in eliminating human misery.
 
 
patiodog,

I'm not with you on either the hockey or the beer. Their beer is pretty good, and overall they produce more first rate hockey players than we do. It's that they are just so goddam insecure about it all!
 
 
Did you know? On a Canadian two dollar bill, the flag flying over the Parliament building is an American flag.
 
 
 
You know, you guys do watch too much hockey. And your beer sucks. (That's what John Candy said, isn't it?)
 

I watch no hockey, so that isn't too much is it? And as for those that do watch hockey...uhm...I'm assuming this is a friendly jibe because Americans have waaaay more sports aired on their televisions than what is seen here in Canada.

And I don't drink beer either, so I can only echo the sentiments of those I know who have sampled both American and Canadian beers. I've been told that American beer is like a watered down version of Canadian beer and when I asked about that on another thread, I had several agreements.   Have you tried Canadian beer? Not the stuff that is brewed there and has the Canadian beer company logo on the can/bottle but stuff FROM Canada. Then you could decide for yourself!  
 
 
 
Did you know? On a Canadian two dollar bill, the flag flying over the Parliament building is an American flag.
 

Hate to say this c.i., but that's an urban legend. I'd actually heard it was the $5 bill. I examined it with a magnifying glass, plus researched it on the 'net. It's actually the old Canadian flag. Or the Canadian Red Ensign.

 
 
 
caprice, You know how those legends are spread about the net. I've been had.  
 
 
 
NAFTA does not seem to have hurt Canada's trade as you have claimed.

 

You quoted recent figures, but are they improved over figures prior to NAFTA? And Ceili has made some valid points regarding the trade issue. Although I am not up on all the facts and figures of it all (although it's something I shall investigate) there is one scenario I know to be true. I know it's only one, but it illustrates a possible negative trend. Prior to NAFTA, if an American company wanted to set up shop in Canada, a head office in Canada was required with, I believe, a Canadian at the helm. Today none of this is needed, thanks to NAFTA.

 
As for the BSE matter in the cattle so tested,, we (and you) must simply deal with the facts as they unfold. I don't think there was any conspiracy to falsify the facts or to stigmatize Canada unduly. Our trading partners very quickly prohibited the import of U.S. beef after the discovery was made.
 

I didn't see any conspiracy either. But I do feel that American officials were quick to place the source of the downed cow as being from Canada. I thought it was very irresponsible of the officials involved to make such statements prior to receiving confirmation. Had it turned out to be false, the damage would have been done with other borders closed to Canada until they heard what the truth was. Since the animal was indeed sourced from Canada, it is somewhat of a moot point in terms of damage. But I still say the official involved should not have made any statements until he had confirmation. To me it seemed as if he was trying to divert attention away from the U.S. beef industry as soon as possible, without consideration to the damage it might create for another country.

 
Canada is the principal beneficiary of this openness.
 

You make it sound as though it is more advantageous for Canadians than it is for Americans. How is having an open border more advantageous to one country over the other?

 
While your partisanship may be quite understandable, resentment over these basic facts seems to be rather - well, I'll let you choose the words.
 

I am merely pointing out an example of why there may be resentment. I didn't say it had to have reason to it. Certainly with a larger population on the U.S. side of the border there will be more people to support American teams. Even though I don't watch hockey, I still know that most of the interest in hockey was sparked with the transfer of Wayne Gretzky to the Kings. Prior to the sale of Gretzky, hockey was a different game. Hockey, and from what I've seen, almost all sports are more about business and money than about sportsmanship and fan participation. Uh oh, I'm going off on a tangent now and getting off track! But as I mentioned, reasons for resentment don't have to be based in facts. This particular example is, for hockey fans, not just an emotional one, but one that speaks to a tradition started in Canada, supported and cultivated by Canadians and now, no longer quite so Canadian, thanks to the takeover by American businesses.

 
While it is true that many Americans don't know as much as they should about Canada, it seems fairly clear that there are also many Canadians who don't take the trouble to learn much about my country. There are ignorant and crude Canadians, just as there are ignorant and crude Americans. I have no reason to suppose the fractions are different on either side of the border.
 

Well sure there are rude Canadians. I encounter them every time I go driving!  

Based on the Roper Survey conducted by the National Geographic Society, it would seem that the youth of both countries is equally abysmal in geographic knowledge and so maybe this is true of what knowledge the youth has in general about our respective countries. However, I do know that in the past, Canadians knew more about the United States than vice versa and any resentment that currently exists is deep rooted beyond some of the examples I gave. As Ceili mentioned, part of it is being in the shadow of the U.S. (For example being asked "oh are you from America?" when you visit a different country.)

As a last word on the view of Americans by Canadians, you might want to read the following site from Canada's Globe and Mail newspaper.

 Friendly Canadians buck anti-U.S. trend 
 
 
 
caprice, You know how those legends are spread about the net. I've been had.  
 

*LOL* c.i.! I am surprised! I thought you would be a little more cynical about 'net stuff.  
 
 
I usually am, but this one came from a friend that's pretty reliable on 'truth.'  
 
 
 
I usually am, but this one came from a friend that's pretty reliable on 'truth.'  
 

*L* Hey, I know exactly what you mean! I got caught in one of those situations myself. A friend of mine said she got an e-mail from someone reliable....and....well....did you hear about the terrorist thing in malls on Hallowe'en 2001? I totally fell for it and told my boss at work. She informed me it was a hoax. Did I feel like a fool or what! *L*
 
 
Yeah, if we can't trust our friends, who can we trust? <grin>
 
 
 
I think part of Canada's resentment to the United States is the 'constant comparison'. We are the little guys, completely over shadowed by Uncle Sam.
 

I suppose I should have been more specific...at least half if not more is done by ourselves, it's a national pastime.
I had no idea I was criticizing anyone. I was, within the context of the question, trying to give a fair answer. I suggest you re-read my post.

 
What does it take to get you guys to shut up?
 

I think that pretty much sums up american hatred in a nutshell.
Shut up or Put up, your dukes as it were....

I have rarely had a bad encounter with an american. I have visited many places throughout the US and alway had a great time. I find most americans are just like me, my friends and family and so on. But, as a people, as a government, as a force to be reckoned with, you are rather domineering.
The government decides they don't like a policy of a trading partner they throw a embargo. This throws local economies into turmoil.

This is silly case but a highly recognizable case of american protectionism, the implications are bothersome, don't you agree? Shwarzenager(sic) (can't be bothered) decides canada - a major consumer of hollywood glitz shouldn't share in the production profits, the only? substantial agenda of his political agenda, and he gets elected.
 
 
 
Shwarzenager(sic) (can't be bothered)
 

*LOL*

I too was pretty amazed that he got in. Oh well, at least any higher aspirations by "Ahnold" will only be dreams. The guy admitted he wasn't that knowledgeable but had many knowledgeable advisors on his team. Nothing like handing the reigns over to the non-elected people.
 
 
 
Yeah, if we can't trust our friends, who can we trust? <grin>
 

  True....I imagine in both our cases, they believed the information they had was from a good source too!

I think some of my friends get annoyed with me because they send me all these warnings or "some sad story and won't I support it by forwarding this e-mail" type things which I then turn around and say "it's a hoax! here is the web page at snopes.com for you to read yourself."  
 
 
 
Canada enjoys great economic benefits from her trade with the United States, selling far more goods here than she buys from the U.S. NAFTA does not seem to have hurt Canada's trade as you have claimed.
 

Canada may well enjoy great economic benefits from its trade with the US, but its trade surplus isn't the reason for it. As a matter of accounting, Canada's trade surplus is only possible if Canada is also running an asset deficit with America -- in other words, if Canada is a net exporter of capital to the United States. Trade surpluses come at a cost just like everything else does, and a current account surplus is not necessarily favorable.

By the way, this is one thing that gets foreigners annoyed with Official America -- the mentality that when America is running a trade deficit with a country, that country is ripping her off and needs to be protected against. But European politicians like to make that mistake too, and if our societies were as much in the red as yours, they would be wining about foreign imports too.
 
 
Balance of trade issues make up the bulk of our Canadian conversations about the US when we are out at lacrosse games, bingo parlors, and while we are standing over pub urinals.

As for size, both Russia and China exceed us in square footage, and believe you me, we are deeply shamed.

Then too, there is the gaping weaponry differential. No few marriages here, begun in the fresh blush of youthful love and confidence, have ended in angry words, tears, and civil procedings, the disillusioned young wife, now burdened by the responsibility of raising her little ones in security, unable to fill the rec room cabinets with revolvers and assault rifles like her counterpart in Ohio.
 
 
 
I have rarely had a bad encounter with an american. I have visited many places throughout the US and alway had a great time. I find most americans are just like me, my friends and family and so on. But, as a people, as a government, as a force to be reckoned with, you are rather domineering.
The government decides they don't like a policy of a trading partner they throw a embargo. This throws local economies into turmoil.

This is silly case but a highly recognizable case of american protectionism, the implications are bothersome, don't you agree? Shwarzenager(sic) (can't be bothered) decides canada - a major consumer of hollywood glitz shouldn't share in the production profits, the only? substantial agenda of his political agenda, and he gets elected.
 

I can readily agree with all of that. It should also be evident that I have found this thread of yours very engaging, and I appreciate the openness and intent of all the posters here. If I have offended anyone in my perhaps too vigorous defense, I apologize.

I run an environmental engineering company that employs engineers, scientists and a variety of construction folks. All very nice, amiable people. However the business we operate in remains very competitive, and some of our competitors are much larger that we. If I allow or costs to get too high or our people to lose their focus, we will lose business to our competitors and they will loose their jobs. The economic relations among free nations are like that too.

There is no doubt that U.S. companies attempt to influence our government to take actions favorable to their interests, and that sometimes they succeed, You cite a good example concerning media production in BC and Hollywood. The Californians are fairly spooked at the prospect of losing lots of production business to lower cost operations in BC, and their reactions have been decidedly protectionist (as opposed to free trade). This stuff cuts two ways too. Canada has a National health care system and has made government agencies the single buyer of pharmaceutical products as a way to leverage their buying power to the greatest effect. The results are reduced profits for the producers and manufacturers and lower prices for Canadians. This is a major distortion of a free market and a result is higher prices for everyone outside Canada. If everyone took the Canadian solution then we would soon have a socialist or government directed pharmaceutical industry - and experience shows this would soon choke off innovation, investment, and progress, harming everyone. We must deal with the consequences of your choices in this matter just as you must deal with ours in others.

There are indeed real issues on both sides of our trade disputes, and I do concede the great potential for harm that our mere size inevitably entails. (Not much we can do about that.) However the fact remains that overall Canada has for a long time been winning the trade game with the United States, and doing so by a wide margin. I believe that basic fact is too often omitted from your public discourse on trade issues.

There are other economic aspects of these trade issues as Thomas has pointed out. (I am a student of his in macroeconomics). However it remains a fact that for the trade issues in dispute, Canada, not the U.S., is the overall winner.

One could readily make a long list of defects in an admittedly dominating (or at least increasingly ubiquitous) American culture. Coarsening standards in the media, excesses by businesses, a pervasive self-preoccupation manifest in both governmental and popular actions, and much more. It's all quite visible, and I won't attempt to defend it. However, overall, I believe these attributes are more often a result of free expression, and therefore universal things, than they are a manifestation of some perverse national neurosis ('though I don't fully exclude that).
 
 
I don't hate America. I hate conservatives far right conservatives everywhere. They just seem to have a LOT of power in the US right now. And the whole world is suffering because of it.
 
 
Well I'm a conservative, but I don't hate you. (Though I do find some of your expressed views a bit repugnant).

There is a great deal of misery and suffering in the world right now, from Africa to poor areas in Asia and other places. However very little of it is a result of the actions of conservatives in this country.

The U.S. is nearly evenly divided between conservatives and liberals. I suspect the whole political spectrum here may be shifted a bit right of what prevails in Australia or Europe, but we are every bit as diverse as other democracies.

We had an acronym in the Navy for one who was wrong a lot - WEFT. You were 0 for 3.
 
 
george, Why is it so easy to figure out the acronym used in the navy? LOL
 
 
 
It's not quite the same thing but, here in Europe, there used to be a concept of "Noblesse oblige" - if you are Lord of the Manor, you make sure that you look after the whole village, to make sure that no one goes without. A feudal system is highly flawed but it wansn't without its own standards of behaviour.
 

Well kitchenpete, speaking from a nation that doesn't have a history feudal hierarchy of of having 'Lords' and 'Nobles' please excuse us for not following the lead of that most enlightened group of forefathers.  

America was founded on the principle of Individual Self Determination that is to say, each one of us is responsible for ourselves. We in America provide for our old and those unable to find work, we look after the infirm etc. (See: Social Security, Unemployment, Welfare, AFDC, etc) but over and above that, each citizen is expected to determine their own course, be it CEO of Microsoft or a cardboard box over a steam vent. America offers millions of opportunities to succeed and a million ways to fail. Each persons actions determine how that will work. That absolute freedom of opportunity scares most non-Americans because they can't comprehend THAT much freedom.

Yet... perhaps... if you wish we Americans to follow that model to make our European brethren feel that we are acting in a 'proper European manner' then we must also take upon ourselves certain OTHER rights and obligations of the Nobles:

How about the obligation to protect ones village? No... when we do that we are called warmongers.

How about the right to judge criminals and administer 'High Justice'? No... we do that and we are accused of depriving people of their rights and of trying to be the worlds 'policeman'

How about the right to make war on ones enemies? No... when we do that, we are accused of ignoring the world and taking 'unilateral action'

Im sorry kitchenpete, but it sounds like you want us to take up just the burdens of 'Nobility' that YOU think are appropriate.

I am an American, born of immigrants. My mother came to this country in 1960 from Liverpool and my fathers parents both arrived in America from Italy in the early 1900's and I thank God every day that I was born here instead of the 'Old World'.

If America is SUCH a terrible place, if it represents all that is 'wrong' with the world, then why are more people emigrating or TRYING to emigrate here than any other nation on Earth ?

It may sound like arrogance... but the truth usually sounds that way to people not used to hearing it.
 
 
Provide for your old? Is that why we commonly see winter stories of the elderly who can't pay their energy bills freezing to death.

Those who can't work? Then why do you have such massive rates of homelessness? Why can't you get welfare without an address?

YOu didn't protect you're own village. Saddam was never a threat.

You did take unilateral action. You invaded a mineral rich nation to take it for yourselves.

Why are people trying to live there? They must be f@cking retarded. I wouldn't swap this island paradise for anything. The rest of the world has to die to get to heaven.
 
 
 
Provide for your old? Is that why we commonly see winter stories of the elderly who can't pay their energy bills freezing to death.

Those who can't work? Then why do you have such massive rates of homelessness? Why can't you get welfare without an address?

 

Do you ever have anything to post other than nonsense?

The US averages less than 200 people per year in total that die from cold. When compared to the population level it comes out pretty darn close to the same percentage of your population that die from drought.

And our homeless rate has remained at or below 1% of the population where your's is at.6%. Neither is "massive" on any scale.

Maybe you just need to quit reading the tabloids for your news.  
 
 
Wilso, Seems you guys have your share of problems too!  http://www.collegian.com/vnews/display.v/ART/2004/02/18/40330507d7261 
 
 
 
Well kitchenpete, speaking from a nation that doesn't have a history feudal hierarchy of of having 'Lords' and 'Nobles' please excuse us for not following the lead of that most enlightened group of forefathers......blah.....That absolute freedom of opportunity scares most non-Americans because they can't comprehend THAT much freedom........
How about the obligation to protect ones village? No... when we do that we are called warmongers........blah......How about the right to judge criminals and administer 'High Justice'? No... we do that and we are accused of depriving people of their rights and of trying to be the worlds 'policeman'..........blah.....How about the right to make war on ones enemies? No... when we do that, we are accused of ignoring the world and taking 'unilateral action'
 

Is there a name for what is wrong with you?
 
 
 
Is there a name for what is wrong with you?
 

Yes, it's called common sense and the ability to not be brainwashed by all the media hype that gets spewed out across all the airwaves.

Iron, why don't you try reading positions from people with many points of view and forming your own opinion, not endlessly regurgitating the propaganda of the liberal/conservative extremists.

Oh and wilso, there are laws in place to prevent power/gas/oil companies from cutting off electricity/gas/oil to the elderly and those on public assistance to prevent them from lacking heat or air conditioning even if they are unable to pay.

Compare this with the thousands of people who died across Europe during this past years heat wave. I live in Florida, and we regularly have months in the high 90s to 100 degF (thats 36 to 38 degC to you) and the only old people here that die of the heat are the elderly who venture out in the noonday sun. But we don't care about our people  
 
 
 
 
Is there a name for what is wrong with you?
 

Iron, why don't you try reading positions from people with many points of view and forming your own opinion, not endlessly regurgitating the propaganda of the liberal/conservative extremists.

 

I am tempted to write a comprehensive reply to your points (and I use the word 'your' loosely because you prefer to post the articles and thoughts of others instead of constructing and defending your own stance.) But I won't do that here. Instead, I will make a new thread to examine some of the ideas you have put forth.

The idea that I merely regurgiatate the positions of the Liberal establishment/media is inaccurate. It is also amusingly ironic given your curious habit of posting absurd articles and then disappearing when they are exposed as false. For example, see  here  and  here. 

In thread after thread, you follow the same modus operandi - you resort to tried but untrue generalizations about Liberals and Liberal thought to mask your singular intellectual bankruptcy; you post retarded articles and then slink away; you latch on too the less capable Liberal posters and harass them while ignoring more substantive posts; you spew out a half-assed philosophy that is, when shaved to the bone, based on nothing more than your blind faith in all things American. By doing all of this you a) make yourself look like a dimwit, b) discredit the entire Conservative philosophy.

There may be, however, a silver lining here. Your posts in this thread alone represent a goldmine of possible sonservative election slogans. "America: Hey, We Have Self Determination, Even If We Are Living In a Card-Board Box" has an appealing land-of-opportunity ring to it. Likewise, "The World: It Hates Us Cause Were Better Than Them" would make an excellent slogan in defense of Bush's foriegn policy. Or, better yet, "America: Were Kinda Like Europeans, But Better" would go a long way in Europe. In Africa, we could sell our Crusader-For-Justice image with the slogan "Go Ahead Starve: We Don't Owe You Anything."
 
 
 
The idea that I merely regurgiatate the positions of the Liberal establishment/media is inaccurate. It is also amusingly ironic given your curious habit of posting absurd articles and then disappearing when they are exposed as false. For example, see  here  and  here.  In thread after thread, you follow the same modus operandi - you resort to tried but untrue generalizations about Liberals and Liberal thought to mask your singular intellectual bankruptcy; you post retarded articles and then slink away; you latch on too the less capable Liberal posters and harass them while ignoring more substantive posts; you spew out a half-assed philosophy that is, when shaved to the bone, based on nothing more than your blind faith in all things American. By doing all of this you a) expose yourself as a dimwit, b) discredit the entire Conservative philosophy.
 

If you will actually READ some of the non articles I post you will have read that I post most of those articles in direct response to Pistoff's continued posting of some of the most ultra biased, left wing propaganda I have ever seen.
As I have said before, for each one of Pistoffs articles that I see posted, I will find and post an even more right wing wacko article to try and show how absurd the extremists from both sides can be.
The thing I find more absurd than the articles that I post is the responses that Pist's absurd posts get. The fact that I am aware of how absurd most of the articles I post while there is a core of ultra libs that step up to wag their heads in agreement with the absurdities that he posts shows who the actual open minded people are on this board.

 
There may be, however, a silver lining here. Your posts in this thread alone represent a goldmine of possible sonservative election slogans. "America: Hey, We Have Self Determination, Even If We Are Living In a Card-Board Box" has an appealing land-of-opportunity ring to it. Likewise, "The World: It Hates Us Cause Were Better Than Them" would make an excellent slogan in defense of Bush's foriegn policy. Or, better yet, "America: Were Kinda Like Europeans, But Better" would go a long way in Europe. In Africa, we could sell our Crusader-For-Justice image with the slogan "Go Ahead Starve: We Don't Owe You Anything."
 

While not sure exactly what you are trying to say here, I stand by my post that America doesn't owe any other nation anything. What we give, we give freely. We have no obligation to help, we do it because we like to help and because the average American is caring and generous. We know we have the highest standard of living and have the better opportunities for advancing ourselves than any other place on Earth. Because of that, most of us have a wish to help others and we do it.

But please don't presume to tell us that we have some sort of obligation to help others whether we wish to or not.
 
 
 
george, Why is it so easy to figure out the acronym used in the navy? LOL
 

When I worked in broadcasting there were video tapes that ended up being labelled NFG. Can you guess what that stood for?  
 
 
I wonder if it is indeed possible to be "successful in a competitive environment without contributing to the losses of others". Some people hold that the age-old assumption that wealth is a limited pie is wrong. Adam Smith felt that Wealth can grow without limits.

I think a large part of foreign animosity towards the USA is based on envy and rancor.

The old saw- "The best way to make an enemy is to give someone money" is certainly true. We saved Europe with the Marshall Plan. They have never forgiven us.
 
 
 
there are laws in place to prevent power/gas/oil companies from cutting off electricity/gas/oil to the elderly and those on public assistance to prevent them from lacking heat or air conditioning even if they are unable to pay.
 

Really? I guess that explains the frequency of house fires in Baltimore, where BGE has shut off gas and electricity to indigent households with small children and elderly people. People start small fires in their stoves in the winter, and use candles in the summer for illumination. In adition, many senior citizens died from heat related illnesses each summer becasue they were without power for air conditioning. There is an assistance plan, but to qualify, a person must deposit $1500.00, and earn at least $25,000.00/year. I don't know many poor people who can afford to do so.
 
 
Fedral wrote:

 
Compare this with the thousands of people who died across Europe during this past years heat wave. I live in Florida, and we regularly have months in the high 90s to 100 degF (thats 36 to 38 degC to you) and the only old people here that die of the heat are the elderly who venture out in the noonday sun. But we don't care about our people
 

With all fairness to the europeans...It was an unprecedented heat wave. They were unprepared and paid the price. I don't think you can compare one disaster to the poverty which affects millions of americans. Your government has turned a blind eye to them, I guess you have as well.

bocdaver wrote:

 
I think a large part of foreign animosity towards the USA is based on envy and rancor.
 

Perhaps you should read the entire thread. A trip or two out of the country wouldn't hurt either. Plenty of people on this big ol' hunk of rock, haven't the slightest interest in living in the United States, purely because the like their lives, they are happy............. I think America envy is highly over rated.

Hatred - antipathy, dislike; animosity, enmity, hostility, rancor
 
 
Ceili--Youmay be right. There may indeed be many people who do not wish to live in the United States.

However, I am sure that you know that millions of people who have first come to Canada have subsequently crossed the border to come to the United States.

I go to Europe every year. Many people I talk to, especially younger ones, say that their greatest wish is to come to the United States to live permanently.

If you are not aware that American Culture has captured the hearts of most young Europeans, you are not listening closely enough.

Again---We saved Europe with the Marshall Plan in the late forties and early fifties.
They have never forgiven us.

No good deed goes unpunished.
 
 
bocdaver

Interesting claim. Could you provide numbers and source, along with comparable figures for movement in the opposite direction.
 
 
 
I go to Europe every year. Many people I talk to, especially younger ones, say that their greatest wish is to come to the United States to live permanently.

If you are not aware that American Culture has captured the hearts of most young Europeans, you are not listening closely enough.

Again---We saved Europe with the Marshall Plan in the late forties and early fifties.
They have never forgiven us.

No good deed goes unpunished.
 

Very inetering, indeed.

And if you mean by "American Culture" burger chains etc, you are nearly 90% correct!
 
 
Who invented hamburgers??? :wink:
 
 
C'mon now, Walt. You mean to tell me you never watch American movies or watch American TV shows? No one wears any American fashions? Don't watch American sports? Don't enjoy American food? Drive American cars? Use American software in there American computers using American chips while surfing the Internet that was created in America?
 
 
 
With all fairness to the europeans...It was an unprecedented heat wave. They were unprepared and paid the price. I don't think you can compare one disaster to the poverty which affects millions of americans. Your government has turned a blind eye to them, I guess you have as well.

 

I agree that it is unfair and inappropriate to cast blame on Europeans or their governments for the deaths during the recent heat wave. No one anticipated it or intended it and their reaction to it has been quite appropriate. Such things can happen anywhere.

At the same time I believe it is an almost equally cheap shot to cite "the poverty that affects millions of Americans", and suggest that our government and people have turned a blind eye towards them.

The fact is that by the usual economic measures the incomes of the poorest strata of Americans are about equal to those of the average for the G-7 nations - better than some, worse than others. It simply isn't true that the poor here are significantly poorer than their counterparts in other advanced countries. We are different from Canada and some other G-7 nations in that we enjoy greater economic mobility - the poor on average stay poor for shorter periods - and we have a much higher average income and much greater income disparity than other G-7 countries. These differences reflect basic social choices. The United States is a more competitive society economically and uses fewer government directed income transfer mechanisms than many other G-7 countries, Canada among them. It remains to be seen if Canada and Europe will be able to sustain their relatively rigid labor markets and generous social welfare systems in an era of ageing populations and a growing gap in labor productivity. My impression is that Canada's prospects in this may be better than Europe's, but the issue is not at all clear.

Both Canada and the United Statres are different from Europe in that we experience much higher rates of immigration. In my view our system is better adapted to this condition than the European one. How Canada copes with both is a bit of a mystery to me. Perhaps an interesting topic for discussion.
 
 
 
Use American software in there American computers using American chips while surfing the Internet that was created in America?
 

That last part is debatable. The surfable part of the web (any internet address that has an  http://  in it) was invented at CERN, located near Geneva on the border between Switzerland and France.

As for the heat wave, most of that was what statisticians heartlessly call a 'harvesting effect'. That is to say, its main effect was to make old people with weak cardiovascular systems die a few weaks earlier than they otherwise would. In the mortality statistics, this shows up as thousands of excess deaths during the heat wave, followed by a 'death shortage' of several thousand in the first few months after the heat wave. But the sensational number of excess deaths gets widely reported while the equally sensational death shortage doesn't. I would be very surprised if the overall mortality in 2003 was much different than in other years.

As heat waves go, there isn't much difference between Europe and America. I hear there was a very bad one in Chicago a few years back, and that its impact was comparable to European heatwaves of equal temperature.
 
 
 
C'mon now, Walt. You mean to tell me you never watch American movies or watch American TV shows? No one wears any American fashions? Don't watch American sports? Don't enjoy American food? Drive American cars? Use American software in there American computers using American chips while surfing the Internet that was created in America?
 

McG,

You're partly right and clearly haven't spent much time in Europe because some things are way off...

American movies... Yes
American TV...Yes
American fashions... Europeans would consider that an oxymoron. Yes, baseball caps and a smattering of Ralph Lauren/DKNY/Hilfiger are worn here, but we don't go for plaid and don't habitually wear white sports shoes and socks, except for sport
American sports...That's an absolute "no" - baseball, American football, hockey and basketball are never shown outside the night slots...we have our own sporting traditions!
American food...you mean processed so far as to disguise its origins in nature e.g. American Cheese? Don't even get me started on the standard of bread! Most food of American origin is found laughable by the Europeans.
American cars...a very few Jeeps but we prefer our own marques: BMW, Mercedes, Audi, VW, Peugeot, Renault, Citroen, Fiat, Jaguar, Aston Martin, Land Rover...do I need to go on? (admittedly some are now owned by US companies, GM and Daimler-Chrysler)
American computers/chips - OK, Intel's the market leader, I'll give you that one!

but, get your facts right...  

Origin of the internet - created by Tim Berners-Lee...who is...English, now living in America, admittedly:

Born in London in 1955
Studied at Wandsworth's Emanuel School
Read physics at Queen's College, Oxford
Banned from using the university's computer when he and a friend were caught hacking
Built own computer with old TV, a Motorola microprocessor and soldering iron
Created web in late 1980s and early 1990s at Cern
Offered it free on the net
Previously awarded an OBE
In 1994 he founded World Wide Web Consortium at MIT
In 1999 he became first holder of the 3Com Founders chair
Time magazine named him one of the top 20 thinkers of the 20th Century
 
 
 
Who invented hamburgers??? :wink:
 

yes who? YUK!!! the greatest justification for a lynch mob ever! please take back your McDonalds and Starbucks and Burger King and.....

and everything Kitchen Pete said

and we have our own very good films and also European films
 
 
 
but, get your facts right...  

Origin of the internet - created by Tim Berners-Lee...who is...English, now living in America, admittedly:

Born in London in 1955
Studied at Wandsworth's Emanuel School
Read physics at Queen's College, Oxford
Banned from using the university's computer when he and a friend were caught hacking
Built own computer with old TV, a Motorola microprocessor and soldering iron
Created web in late 1980s and early 1990s at Cern
Offered it free on the net
Previously awarded an OBE
In 1994 he founded World Wide Web Consortium at MIT
In 1999 he became first holder of the 3Com Founders chair
Time magazine named him one of the top 20 thinkers of the 20th Century
 

Without getting to far off track here - This isn't a "fact" at all. Tim Berners-Lee designed the World Wide Web concept - NOT the Internet. The WWW rides on top of the Internet and use one protocol (http) of the many that are available. The Internet itself came out of the US DoD and was original called ARPAnet based on the x.25 protocol.

While many people think of the WWW as being the Internet it isn't. In fact, the WWW can run on any IP based network and doesn't need the Internet and the Internet existed prior to the  WWW.  The two currently work together but either can exist independently of the other as well.
 
 
OK, fishin'

Let's call it a score draw!

KP
 
 
Well, I am glad we agree on some things at least. I lived in Germany for nine years and I have travelled to every country in Europe except Portugal.

 
American sports...That's an absolute "no" - baseball, American football, hockey and basketball are never shown outside the night slots...we have our own sporting traditions!
 

Football and Rugby are both excellent sports as are the myriad of other sports Europeans play, but I would go out on a limb and say that the World Series, Superbowl and Stanley Cup all get the same attention the world cup does. I am not saying they are as popular as soccor, but American sports do have a place on European TV.

 
American food...you mean processed so far as to disguise its origins in nature e.g. American Cheese? Don't even get me started on the standard of bread! Most food of American origin is found laughable by the Europeans.
 

There is more to American cuisine than McDonalds (which you can find in every major European city). Cajun, Bar-b-que, pizza (chicago deep dish, NY thin crust, etc...), the list goes on. Go to McDonalds this afternoon and tell me how long you have to wait in line...

 
Origin of the internet - created by Tim Berners-Lee...who is...English, now living in America, admittedly:

Born in London in 1955
Studied at Wandsworth's Emanuel School
Read physics at Queen's College, Oxford
Banned from using the university's computer when he and a friend were caught hacking
Built own computer with old TV, a Motorola microprocessor and soldering iron
Created web in late 1980s and early 1990s at Cern
Offered it free on the net
Previously awarded an OBE
In 1994 he founded World Wide Web Consortium at MIT
In 1999 he became first holder of the 3Com Founders chair
Time magazine named him one of the top 20 thinkers of the 20th Century
 

 The actual history of the Internet 
 
 
McGentix

I agree - but PIZZA really is of Neapolitan (Italy) origin - with the first pizzeria appearing there in New York in 1905.

The hamburger patty and sandwich were brought by 19th-century German immigrants to the United States - called here "Frikadelle".

Henry VIII was both forbidding and actually playing football (rugby/soccer)(as just was found out [  link  ]).
 
 
Everybody knows Al Gore invented the internet, Thomas.

Thanks for this, though: "asset deficit with America". That would be the economists version of the accountant's "Cash Flow". We are indeed increasing cash flow at the expense of Canada (and others), but I'm not at all sure if this can be taken to be of benefit to either party.
 
 
 
McGentix

I agree - but PIZZA really is of Neapolitan (Italy) origin - with the first pizzeria appearing there in New York in 1905.

The hamburger patty and sandwich were brought by 19th-century German immigrants to the United States - called here "Frikadelle".

Henry VIII was both forbidding and actually playing football (rugby/soccer)(as just was found out [  link  ]).
 

I don't want to claim that any of those were invented by Americans as we are a country of immigrants, but we have taken it and made it into something that is wholly American (which to me means a mixture of cultures from around the world living in harmony).
 
 
 
Well, I am glad we agree on some things at least. I lived in Germany for nine years and I have travelled to every country in Europe except Portugal.
 

OK - I guessed wrong.

 
 
American sports...That's an absolute "no" - baseball, American football, hockey and basketball are never shown outside the night slots...we have our own sporting traditions!
 

Football and Rugby are both excellent sports as are the myriad of other sports Europeans play, but I would go out on a limb and say that the World Series, Superbowl and Stanley Cup all get the same attention the world cup does. I am not saying they are as popular as soccor, but American sports do have a place on European TV.
 

Simply not true. World Series gets next to no interest, Superbowl is shown well into the small hours of Monday morning and most people go to bed before the end of the first 1/4. I don't even know what sport is played for the Stanley Cup.

For the (football) World Cup, every nation in Europe will be glued to televisions for 3 weeks. Offices and streets are empty for in any nation which is playing.

 
 
American food...you mean processed so far as to disguise its origins in nature e.g. American Cheese? Don't even get me started on the standard of bread! Most food of American origin is found laughable by the Europeans.
 

There is more to American cuisine than McDonalds (which you can find in every major European city). Cajun, Bar-b-que, pizza (chicago deep dish, NY thin crust, etc...), the list goes on. Go to McDonalds this afternoon and tell me how long you have to wait in line....
 

BBQ and Cajun are good examples. I've loved Maine Lobster and Clam Chowdah plus New York deli sandwiches but we don't really get those in Europe because we like our own food...home made, where possible.

I'd rather not go to McDonalds. I've only eaten from one, say, about twice in the last five years!

Tell them in Naples that the Pizza is American!

 
 
Origin of the internet - created by Tim Berners-Lee...who is...English, now living in America, admittedly:

Born in London in 1955
Studied at Wandsworth's Emanuel School
Read physics at Queen's College, Oxford
Banned from using the university's computer when he and a friend were caught hacking
Built own computer with old TV, a Motorola microprocessor and soldering iron
Created web in late 1980s and early 1990s at Cern
Offered it free on the net
Previously awarded an OBE
In 1994 he founded World Wide Web Consortium at MIT
In 1999 he became first holder of the 3Com Founders chair
Time magazine named him one of the top 20 thinkers of the 20th Century
 

 The actual history of the Internet 
 

OK - I've conceded that one, already.

Now, consider how (despite your time in Europe), you still don't understand us...and how America may be equally misunderstood. This misunderstanding, together with a generous seasoning of jealousy (of wealth) and fear (of military power) are at the root of the "hate" to which this thread relates.

I've chosen to spend about 5 weeks of the last year in the USA and enjoyed myself enormously...my greatest love to date has been an American woman and I have plenty of friends from the USA. Don't think that it's me who hates the USA.

Then again, I still consider myself European, despite the language differences, and closer in overall outlook to other Europeans than to most Americans!
 
 
This discussion is getting funny.

Reminded me of my little brother at grade school.

To the question: "Where was Christopher Columbus from?", he answered: "From the United States".

Do I really need to say that he flunked?
 
 
He might just have been making an inciteful observation about the distinction between Christopher Columbus (the American myth) and Cristobal Colon (the man).
 
 
once again KP is right. We have absolutely no interest in American sports - and why should we? I woudn't expect you to watch our football matches avidly. The rare things shown are on in the middle of the night and have a tiny tiny audience.

we have a few basketball teams of our own but not with a huge following like Rugby, Football or Cricket has. American football is a tiny minority sport, rarely played on a local level and certainly not televised. Baseball ??? forget it! Basketball is based on the girls game of netball isn't it?   and baseball on the girls game of rounders?  

Oh and beach volleyball had us curled up with laughter when it was included in the Olympics!

actually the baseball unform makes me giggle personally, strange looking outfit!

someone seems to be claiming an awful lot of European food as American! just because it has become part of American culture doesn't make it American - it is still Italian/German/Jewish/Irish whatever

This claiming the credit for everything is one of the truly irritating things to Europeans and others... you are NOT all guilty I know so this remark is aimed at the few.

I lived on mixed English-American bases for some time as a child and so mixed a lot with Americans. The 2 nations divided by a common language often held true! the social norms, manners etc could be very different.

We all tend to see the world from our own perspective, some of us realise this and others don't. Most of you on A2K have the wit and perception to see this.
 
 
...and the ship he came in on was the Chris Craft
 
 
Clearly modern computing and networks have their recent origins throughout the western (and in some of the eastern) world. The conceptual model for modern computers was developed in the UK (Touring machines - named after their conceptual designer). The mathematics, from Boolean algebra to Fourier transforms and numerical stability theory, from Germany, France, the UK, the United States and Japan. I believe the first major electronic computer development (the Iliac) was done in the United States, but European versions weren't very far behind. Transistors, printed circuits and chips came from the U.S. but efficient, low cost manufacturing was perfected in Japan. We and they have exchanged that lead several times since then.

Others have correctly noted the DARPA (later ARPA) net as a key precursor network. By the late '80s CERN and other European labs were linked to this network and no doubt operated local ones of their own. I suspect from that point on connectivity and collaboration were so high that naming the exact source of a new development would be both difficult and subject to error.

I believe this illustrates a basic point that, In my view, should be central to this thread. Thomas earlier noted that the U.S. has been a free society for a long time and that much of what attracts and infuriates others about us is a result of that. Good and bad new things often happen here first. We live in a fast moving world suffused with a common culture to which we all contribute, but which too often is labelled as American, merely because many of its manifestations either occur or are mass exploited here first. It is a bit like the problem many Americans have with California.

An American cartoon character, Pogo, expressed it well in a paraphrase of an American Naval hero, Oliver Perry, who after an engagement with the British (this is for you Steve and Kitchen Pete) said "We have met the enemy and he is ours".

Pogo's version was "We have met the enemy and he is us."
 
 
I believe the problem lies in the naming. Nations named with the first name "Amerigo" would not be unlike naming a nation "fred." so it seems obvious that solid dignity of a nation's status such as our own would be greatly enhanced should we re-name out nation VespucciLand.
 
 
Don't you mean 'Vespuccia'?  
 
 
 
 
Well, I am glad we agree on some things at least. I lived in Germany for nine years and I have travelled to every country in Europe except Portugal.
 

OK - I guessed wrong.

 
 
American sports...That's an absolute "no" - baseball, American football, hockey and basketball are never shown outside the night slots...we have our own sporting traditions!
 

Football and Rugby are both excellent sports as are the myriad of other sports Europeans play, but I would go out on a limb and say that the World Series, Superbowl and Stanley Cup all get the same attention the world cup does. I am not saying they are as popular as soccor, but American sports do have a place on European TV.
 

Simply not true. World Series gets next to no interest, Superbowl is shown well into the small hours of Monday morning and most people go to bed before the end of the first 1/4. I don't even know what sport is played for the Stanley Cup.

For the (football) World Cup, every nation in Europe will be glued to televisions for 3 weeks. Offices and streets are empty for in any nation which is playing.

 
 
American food...you mean processed so far as to disguise its origins in nature e.g. American Cheese? Don't even get me started on the standard of bread! Most food of American origin is found laughable by the Europeans.
 

There is more to American cuisine than McDonalds (which you can find in every major European city). Cajun, Bar-b-que, pizza (chicago deep dish, NY thin crust, etc...), the list goes on. Go to McDonalds this afternoon and tell me how long you have to wait in line....
 

BBQ and Cajun are good examples. I've loved Maine Lobster and Clam Chowdah plus New York deli sandwiches but we don't really get those in Europe because we like our own food...home made, where possible.

I'd rather not go to McDonalds. I've only eaten from one, say, about twice in the last five years!

Tell them in Naples that the Pizza is American!

 
 
Origin of the internet - created by Tim Berners-Lee...who is...English, now living in America, admittedly:

Born in London in 1955
Studied at Wandsworth's Emanuel School
Read physics at Queen's College, Oxford
Banned from using the university's computer when he and a friend were caught hacking
Built own computer with old TV, a Motorola microprocessor and soldering iron
Created web in late 1980s and early 1990s at Cern
Offered it free on the net
Previously awarded an OBE
In 1994 he founded World Wide Web Consortium at MIT
In 1999 he became first holder of the 3Com Founders chair
Time magazine named him one of the top 20 thinkers of the 20th Century
 

 The actual history of the Internet 
 

OK - I've conceded that one, already.

Now, consider how (despite your time in Europe), you still don't understand us...and how America may be equally misunderstood. This misunderstanding, together with a generous seasoning of jealousy (of wealth) and fear (of military power) are at the root of the "hate" to which this thread relates.

I've chosen to spend about 5 weeks of the last year in the USA and enjoyed myself enormously...my greatest love to date has been an American woman and I have plenty of friends from the USA. Don't think that it's me who hates the USA.

Then again, I still consider myself European, despite the language differences, and closer in overall outlook to other Europeans than to most Americans!
 

The problem, as I see it, is that Walter disparaged American Culture, I tried to defend American culture by giving some examples and now I am being told I don't understand European culture?

I never claimed to have any special insight into European culture. I was not attacking European culture either. By stating that some things that are american (I dare you to compare a Chicago deep dish pizza with anything you can find in Italy and say they are the same thing) is in no way saying that European culture is somewhat diminished!

Europe is full of culture and history. I've been there and I've seen it, I've enjoyed it. I've had pomme frits (sp?) in Berlin, I've had pizza in Florence, I've had fish in London and I've had bread in Paris. I've seen the landmarks and I've enjoyed living there. I even had friends from Germany, Norway and England!

By defending America, I am not disparaging Europe. BUT...do you have a baseball diamond in your town? I'd bet you do. Do people watch NFL Europe? I bet they do. Do Eupopeans frequent McDonalds? You know it. Are European teens listening to Britney Spears? uh, huh. Do they watch Mtv? Yep. The list goes on and on and as much as you want to not want it to be, American culture has more influence on European culture TODAY than Europe does on American culture. That may not be the way it was, as most Americans can trace their ancestry to Europe, but NOW that's the way it is and it seems to really rub some people the wrong way.
 
 
No, no, no...we are "The Republic of Gilead."
 
 
 
And if you mean by "American Culture" burger chains etc, you are nearly 90% correct!
 

MTV belongs to "etc" as some other of what was mentioned.

I actually mentioned burgers, because I'd read before that a UK-government unit 'urges fat tax' on hamburges.
 
 
I thought we were the "Republic of Bush?"
 
 
McGentrix,

 
American culture has more influence on European culture TODAY than Europe does on American culture. That may not be the way it was, as most Americans can trace their ancestry to Europe, but NOW that's the way it is and it seems to really rub some people the wrong way.
 

Yes - now we're getting to some real answers to the question.

I'm sorry if I beat you up for responding to Walter's disparaging comments...I just thought some of your examples were flawed and wanted to point that out.

I agree that there's a resentment to the spread of mass-produced food and music...as much as there is a sector of society (young and poor, in the main) who can't get enough!

You are still wrong about the sports - of course there's a baseball diamond somewhere in London but I couldn't tell you where...softball in the park is easier, in summer. NFL Europe has very low viewing figures compared with domestic football. We just don't get the game and NFL Europe is a pale imitation of the US game, with many players who can't make it in the US coming to Europe to continue life as a pro.

I've got to go, now...see you soon.
 
 
Ok then. You and your mates may not enjoy American sports, but can you speak for the majority or even the minority of Europeans?

You may be correct as I have not devoted a lot of time seeking statistics on European devotion to american sports.

BTW, I absolutely love Rugby. I played for 5 years in college and I try to watch it whenever it's on. and Congrats to England on winning the RWC!
 
 
We must also be aware of the contributions that some other countries have made to American entertainment.

My favorite is Australian Rules Football. Although I played sports all through school (Amer. football, hockey, wrestling,etc) and have been a devoted fan of Worldwide sports for decades I can say just this:
After 5 years of watching Australian Rules Football I STILL don't understand the rules. I love to watch it, it is a fast paced, exciting game, but I think ARF is a colossal joke that is being played on the 'Yanks' by all the combined people of 'Oz'.

The nearest I can tell is that they make up words to confuse us and that every few minutes, they change the 'rules' just so we won't EVER 'get' it. I have always been loath to buy a book about the game outlining the rules because I think that would just destroy my enjoyment of watching 2 groups of insane Ausies battle it out. So even though I am sure it is a giant practical joke being played on us, please keep sending it and... well... you got us !  
 
 
I can say a thing or two about sports in Italy and Spain.

1. Soccer is King, like almost everywhere. (Any comparison between the world popularity of soccer and the popularity of any other sport is preposterous).
2. Basketball is popular, but trails cycling and handball in Spain; cycling and volleyball in Italy.
3. American Football. Perhaps 90-95 per cent of the Italian population does not know the basic rules. But it's played by some enthusiasts. They even have a semi-pro League. Totally non-existant in Spain.
4. Baseball. I lived for 4+ is the most baseballish city in Italy (and Italy is only second to Holland in the like of baseball in Europe). It has a couple of diamonds. I met NO ONE who understood the basic rules of the game. I had to explain to Italians the baseball movies they nevertheless saw. In Spain baseball is unknown. For the Barcelona Olympics they had to build a stadium, and made their home team from Latin America descendants of Spaniards (a similar thing happens with Holland, which has a competitive team, made mostly with Americans of Dutch origin and people from the Netherlands' Antilles, and with Italy, where only 1 or 2 team members were actually born and raised in the Italian peninsula).
5. Ice Hockey. Not popular. Played by a few enthusiasts in both countries (more in Italy). Field Hockey is much more popular in Spain.
 
 
Interestingly, European sports are likely better known and followed here than perhaps are ours in Europe. As a boy I played on an Irish (Gaelic) football club (not too different from ARF) and in grad school in Pasadena on a rugby club. (we weren't so good, but had great parties). Soccer, or association football is getting more and more popular here as is cycling. Hockey, of course, is a mostly Canadian thing, but Americans have embraced it enthusiastically - and we find ourselves resented by Canadians for it. Go figure.

Cricket - well that's another story.
 
 
Just so it's clear, we (Amerigonians) have no need for either Cher or David Hasselhoff. At this point these individuals are strictly maintained for export.

Just so that's out there.
 
 
 
If you will actually READ some of the non articles I post you will have read that I post most of those articles in direct response to Pistoff's continued posting of some of the most ultra biased, left wing propaganda I have ever seen.
As I have said before, for each one of Pistoffs articles that I see posted, I will find and post an even more right wing wacko article to try and show how absurd the extremists from both sides can be.
The thing I find more absurd than the articles that I post is the responses that Pist's absurd posts get. The fact that I am aware of how absurd most of the articles I post while there is a core of ultra libs that step up to wag their heads in agreement with the absurdities that he posts shows who the actual open minded people are on this board.
 

If you have a problem with the articles Pistoff - or anybody else - posts, I suggest you construct an argument refuting them. Surely, an intellect of your refinement should be able to easily expose something so "ultra-biased" and "propaganda," right? If you are unable to mount a substantive argument against Pistoffs articles..... you see the implications.

And this is ignoring the fact that your fight-fire-with-fire approach is inherantly retarded. It clogs the boards with inanity and discredits other Conservatives.

 
While not sure exactly what you are trying to say here, I stand by my post that America doesn't owe any other nation anything. What we give, we give freely. We have no obligation to help, we do it because we like to help and because the average American is caring and generous. We know we have the highest standard of living and have the better opportunities for advancing ourselves than any other place on Earth. Because of that, most of us have a wish to help others and we do it.

But please don't presume to tell us that we have some sort of obligation to help others whether we wish to or not.
 

If you want to come out and play, please do it in the other thread where these issues can be explored more substantially:  What America Owes The World 
 
 
Soccer has become the most played sport in Canada, especially amoung young women and children. We have our own football game, the CFL and the Grey Cup is out version of the Superbowl.
As for Canadian resentment against americans for stealing our game, of the original six teams in the NHL, only two were from Canada, Montreal and Toronto, the rest were from New York, Boston, Chicago and Detroit. The Stanley Cup is the N.Americans ultimate goal in Hockey. Many Europeans, especially countries with cold weather are big fans of the game. Many of the players in the NHL come from countries such as sweeden, finland and russia (not european but from that side of the pond).
 
 
But would you not agree Ceili, that before hockey turned into its current incarnation it was (and still is) Canada's game? I mean that in the sense of being a national pastime.
 
 
Whatever the complex of factors which have led in the past to 'Yanqui go home' graffitti, or to British rock musicians peeing on the Alamo, we probably ought to acknowledge that the present period evidences a broad, even world-wide, disdain for America's operations in the world which has been engendered by something more disquieting than hockey jealousy. Maybe?

 
The former Mexican ambassador to the UN, Adolfo Aguilar Zinser, told the Observer newspaper this week that American officials intervened last March - days before the war was launched against Saddam Hussein - to halt secret UN negotiations for a compromise resolution to give weapons inspectors more time to complete their work.
 

 
Ms Gun was arrested when it was reported that America's national security agency, GCHQ's US partner, was conducting a secret surveillance operation, bugging UN delegates' home and office telephones and emails.

The NSA told GCHQ that the particular targets of an eavesdropping "surge" were the delegates from Angola, Cameroon, Chile, Bulgaria, Guinea and Pakistan - the six crucial "swing votes" on the security council. A memo sent by Frank Koza, a senior NSA official, said the information from the eavesdropping would be used against the key UN delegations.

In a statement when she was charged, Ms Gun said: "Any disclosures that may have been made were justified because they exposed serious illegality and wrongdoing on the part of the US government which attempted to subvert our own security services. Secondly, they could have helped prevent widescale death and casualties amongst ordinary Iraqi people and UK forces in the course of an illegal war."

Senior Mexican and Chilean diplomats at the UN have since claimed their missions were spied on.
 

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/Iraq/Story/0,2763,1152323,00.html 
 
 
This is all very interesting, reading from so many different people from different parts of the world. Ten years ago a rural housewife with just a high school education who mostly just stays at home with her family would never even hear of all these different things. That is what I meant by the world is getting smaller. With the invention of the internet ordinary people like myself are exposed to information and people of higher knowledge than ever before thought possible. With the invention of satellite TV with world wide access to any place in the world, the "coal miners daughter" can watch people clear across the ocean that have different ways of life and viewpoints from anything she has ever heard of locally. It is an amazing thing that is relatively new and ten years from now I think that things will be even more different than they are now as far as how countries are run. I think that scares some people and that is why they resist the UN and dismiss countries as "old Europe". Before all this because America is so big most ordinary folks really didn't have a grasp on outside countries. People in the country looked at people from other parts of the world almost like they came from outer space or something. I guess because when people come from other parts of the world they settle in bigger cities closer to the border rather than the middle states.

At least that is my un asked for opinion on all this. I am not a sports fan other than just wanting KY wildcats to win in basketball (I never personally watch it) so I don't have any opinions about world wide sports and which country has the most interesting one or whatever. I like McDonalds, but if I ever got a chance to visit other countries, I would want to try their food and experience their ways of life. Heck, I would think I was really doing something if I got to go to New York and see a broadway play, I could not imagine going to Paris. Just watching Sex and the City the other night really made me have a longing to see it, it seems so pretty and old world compared to anything I have ever seen. To use a too often repeated phrase, "the grass is always greener" I guess.
 
 
Revel,

Do come to Europe - it's only a few hundred dollars to fly there. Enough people speak English (even in Paris, though they do resent it if you make no effort to say "bonjour" or "merci").

It is much older and much prettier than most cities in the USA. What I really enjoy, in reverse, is the space and untouched wilderness in many parts of America - this crowded corner of Europe doesn't have that. Nor do we have the amazing variety of skyscrapers.

KP
 
 
kitchenpete, It may cost only a few hundred dollars to fly 'there,' but it's the per diem that can bust the bank. LOL
 
 
c.i.,

Very true - my most recent trip to the USA confirmed that at >$1.88 to the GB Pound, life is much cheaper in the USA than in London!

Paris is actually a little cheaper than London, but still more expensive than USA.

KP
 
 
 
Enough people speak English (even in Paris, though they do resent it if you make no effort to say "bonjour" or "merci").
 

Reading that reminded me of something....here in Canada (probably more so in the west) on occasion you will hear someone (English speaking) say merçi buckets in place of merçi beaucoup. Is that just a Canadianism? Or do you use the same expression over there?
 
 
"merçi buckets" I love that!  
 
 
Heared it here too.  
 
 
uh oh. i've been saying that for years, and thought i made it up. damn.
 
 
"Merçi Buttercups" works too!  
 
 
fishin, "Buttercups" has a different connotation.  
 
 
The US' tendency to dribble its own shite onto others may be a reason others hate us:  Japan the Next Target? 

 
Japan put on terror attack alert

Friday, February 20, 2004 Posted: 12:46 PM EST (1746 GMT)

Security was tightened at vital locations including Tokyo airport.

TOKYO, Japan (Reuters) -- Japan has tightened security at 650 vital facilities across the country, including nuclear power plants, government offices and U.S. facilities, to guard against a possible terrorist attack, a National Police Agency official said.

The official said the heightened alert Friday was due to such factors as Japan's recent dispatch of a contingent of ground forces to help rebuild Iraq.

He declined to say whether there had been any new information concerning a possible attack.

There were two late-night explosions near the Defense Ministry in Tokyo this week, which police said could have been carried out in a protest at the dispatch of Japanese troops to Iraq.

The dollar rose sharply against the yen in late afternoon trading in Europe after the report Japan's security level had been raised.

The National Police Agency said in December that Japan's close ties with the United States and the many U.S. facilities in the country could make it a target for attacks by Islamic militants.

Japan approved the controversial dispatch of its main army contingent to help rebuild Iraq in late January, and now has about 100 troops establishing a base in Samawa in southern Iraq, where they will help with humanitarian work and reconstruction.

Nudged by the United States, Japan plans to send up to 600 ground troops to Iraq as part of a total deployment of about 1,000 military personnel. It will be Japan's biggest and riskiest overseas mission since World War II.

Japan is one of the United States' closest allies in Asia and home base for about half the estimated 100,000 U.S. military personnel in the region. Many U.S. companies have a substantial presence in the country.

No damage or injuries were caused by Tuesday's explosions.

A leftist group calling itself "Kakumeigun" (Revolutionary Army) sent letters to Japanese media claiming responsibility, Kyodo news agency said Friday. The group said it was resorting to violence to prevent the deployment of Japanese troops to Iraq, Kyodo said.
 
 
 
 
"merçi buckets" I love that!  
 

 

When I first said it after moving to the U.S. (I'm back in Canada now), I realized "hey, they probably have never heard this before". It was just such an automatic thing to say. The funny thing is, no one looked at me and said "huh?" *L*
 
 
kitchenpete

I can barely get my husband out of the county of the state I live in, much less out of the country. He has lived in the house that we live in now since the day he was born. (sort of inherited it after his grandmother died) The only place we go to visit is down further south. Maybe someday, in the meantime, I'll just keep buying romance novels with people and places from "somewheres else." (barney fife, andy griffin show)

I would also like to visit London, I have read a lot about those Cornish (?) hills with the runaway highway men who are really disinherited Lords and the Scottish highlands with the Highland warlords wearing plaid short kilts over their bulging thighs wielding their broadswords with their massive arms and the sheiks palaces with the exotic dancers dancing in the background while a sheik with midnight black hair and spellbinding black eyes feeds grapes to his captive bosomy slave... (JK) (but I would like to visit other parts of the world someday, I just started to realize how I was sounding)
 
 
revel, Dreaming is nice, and many say "next year." Don't get stuck into this rut; there's life outside your county and state. You must "be there" to appreciate all the nuances of what life is all about. Start with a trip to Washington DC. Most of what you wish to see is "free."
 
 
I am so disillusioned by Washington right now the last place I want to go is there. Although it would be nice to see the statue of Abraham Lincoln and read the bill of rights that is on the wall and maybe see the wall of memorial, on second thoughts I would like to go there, maybe it would renew my hope for this country.

I notice that you live in California, I would ask you on the gay rights board but I haven't read in there yet and don't know if you go there. But what do you think about the latest upset there? Personally I don't understand how those that oppose gay marriage can claim that they believe in equal rights for all with a straight face, but on the other hand it does seem as if that mayor guy just usurped his authority.
 
 
I think Mayor Neusome(sp) is a brave soul, and agree with his actions on gay rights. It was not that long ago that we had laws in this country that forbad interracial marriage. But then, I'm an atheist unlike all my siblings who are christians who would oppose such a 'marriage.' I have a problem with christians who say they love the sinner but not the sin, then say they do not deserve to have the same legal rights as anyone else. There's an obvious inconsistency for me.
 
 
I may not seem much of one, but I am a christian, in fact I consider myself pretty religious. I just believe in separation of religious ideals and government, so I agree with you that gays should be allowed to marry even though I personally feel that acting on the desires of homosexuality is a sin. (but then so is lying and hating people)

(enough of that here, thank you for letting me get away with it)
 
 
 
...but then so is lying and hating people

 

But that is the subject of this thread. Hating Americans and America.

Perhaps it is not a sin in Canada.
 
 
Ummm, I think revel is an american.
I started this thread not because I hate americans, but because a lot of people do. I thought it would be interesting to see the myriad of opinions.
If we were to discuss morals, and/or sins, I think you would find both Canadians and Americans are on the same page.
 
 
I don't think there are any Canadians who hate Americans. (Unless it's a personal thing, but that's not the issue here.) There may be dislike of Americans by Canadians, there may be annoyances Canadians find in Americans, but I've never had a fellow Canadian tell me they hate Americans in the true sense of the word.
 
 
 
[...] but I've never had a fellow Canadian tell me they hate Americans in the true sense of the word.
 

Actually, I always think, " hate " is used in a very inflatingly way on these threads: how do people call things, they really hate = express or feel extreme enmity or active hostility?
 
 
Exactly Walter.
 
 
OK, so no one here hates America or Americans, but some know or encounter many who do. The feelings that Canadians express so frequently on these threads are not hatred but merely dislike or annoyance.

Why is it that Canadians have, or at least express, these feelings towards Americans so much more frequently than do Americans towards Canada or Canadians?

Are we worse, or are you merely more irritable?.
 
 
 
I don't think there are any Canadians who hate Americans. (Unless it's a personal thing, but that's not the issue here.) There may be dislike of Americans by Canadians, there may be annoyances Canadians find in Americans, but I've never had a fellow Canadian tell me they hate Americans in the true sense of the word.
 

I was just about to say that, but you beat me to the punch.
 
 
I really think we're making a mountain out of a mole hill here. Hate? As Walter said, the language we use can be misleading in so many ways. The only thing I hate about Canada is that I can't visit there more often!
 
 
Agreed.
 
 
i think we have all heard kids or teenagers shout at their elders : "i hate you, i hate you !" - because they either were asked to eat broccoli or told that they had to go to school. what they probably meant was " i really don't like broccoli" and "i don't want to get up, the bed is warm but outside it's cold". seems to me that the spoken language has become sloppy over the years and expressions are used often even though they do not fit the situstion (i know, i've contributed my fair share to this over the years). i recall that celine dion(sp?) mentioned some time ago that the she worked hard to learn the english language(she neither spoke nor could read english until her singing (?) career got under way). she said that when she finally knew some english she greeted some other entertainer in english, and the reply by the other one was : "wass up momma ?" she thought that the had learned the wrong language. (not a fan of celin, but do think that was a funny remark). hbg
 
 
 
OK, so no one here hates America or Americans, but some know or encounter many who do. The feelings that Canadians express so frequently on these threads are not hatred but merely dislike or annoyance.

Why is it that Canadians have, or at least express, these feelings towards Americans so much more frequently than do Americans towards Canada or Canadians?

Are we worse, or are you merely more irritable?.
 

Well, I'll brave this question, even though I've ne'r said a negative word about God's acre, nor regarding the much-loved inhabitants of the land.

First, let's acknowledge that the present period is unique - that the US is thought more poorly of, by most of the rest of the world, than has been the case at any period since I have started watching my dear dear neighbor to the south. What is contestable in this claim? Either some other period was worse. Or that the phrase 'most of the rest of the world' makes the claim false through exaggeration.

If true, then Canadians yakking is an instance of a rather broad and ubiquitous voice, but with the addition of particular or unique grudges based on real or imagined past events.

Now, as george has argued previously, whatever the US may actually be held by other nations to be guilty of, those other nations are (or have been) guilty too, thus nobody really has any valid complaint. Of course, it becomes a tad difficult to understand how anyone might make any claim about any nation's behavior using george's fomula. Still, it's george's question, and while visiting we should strive to be mannerly and avoid mentioning the plaster cracks.

Perhaps we can get some distance if I return george's hospitality. Not that I'm inviting him up here, but maybe I can give him a sense of the maples and the loons and the brisk northern air - in short, an environment with, as far as the eye can see, no Texans. Almost takes one's breath away, doesn't it?

We, george and I, and anyone else who wishes to come along, will head off on an imaginary voyage to a classy hotel room, filled with civic celebrities and newspaper owners, men with intimidatingly bushy eyebrows and an enviable familiarity with the Caymen Islands airport. We are in New York. We can tell by the sirens. There's a man up front, speaking. He's a short man with thick glasses, budget shoes, and an unusually high-pitched voice which, had it been an octave or so lower, wouldn't have prevented him from getting laid until he was 34. He's a Canadian. We can tell by everything.

He says, "The Canadian government has serious concerns regarding recent statements made by your government which suggests you may move towards legislation which will place your sons and daughters in jail for the insignificant and harmless act of smoking marijuana. We wonder where your moral compass is heading. We wonder what damage you are going to do to your children, the hope for your future. We are deeply, very deeply, concerned. It should not surprise anyone, given such legislation is further promoted, that our government may find it necessary to re-evaluate our relationship with your nation, and it is difficult to say what the consequences may be, to ongoing trade discussions, for example."

Wasn't that fun?
 
 
It was fun! I'm howling in laughter.  
 
 
I agree walter, what does is mean? The initial question is blind hatred toward America rational? I think what this thread shows is that the word is used loosely. Yet almost everyone had a gripe and could identify with the word or the sentiment. What is it that inspires the bile?
Much of it is not based on much more than opinion, often skewed by bad data. (not a comment on the many great answers but a general observation after years of becoming aware of the problem.)
As people we are so much alike, we see many of the same movies, listen to similar music, read the same books, our lifestyles are not dissimilar. So why is it so easy to say, or is it commonly heard, "I hate the US".
I remember as a child learning about Nuclear Bombs. The USA had 'em and so did the Russians. We were smack dab in the middle. I could identify with both countries, Russia's cold and the US is a democracy.
Yet the news was filled with anti russian sentiment, commies were evil ect.
Propaganda played a huge part in the theme, but farmer's in Kansas stocked the bunkers just in case a ruskie got him.
Is hatred irrational or is it the understanding of the word?
 
 
Everytime I turn on the TV and see Bush making some kind of speech, I say outloud, "I hate that man." I have never met him and I don't wish him to die or to otherwise be harmed. So in actuality I do not really hate Bush. I think that is how some people from other parts of the world, some just ordinary people and others in position of some kind of authority for their countries feel about America. They simply don't like some of things we stand for and what some of our values are nor the way we present those values to other countries. Blatham is right though, this time period is unique.
 
 
I don't say "I hate that man," but the phrase "duplicitous piece of shit," does spring to mind.  
 
 
blatham, you rock!
 
 
Blatham

Bravo :-D
 
 
 
Blatham is right though, this time period is unique.
 

I don't think that is true. Why? Read the following statement, made almost 31 years ago by Canadian broadcast journalist Gordon Sinclair. It was the end of the Vietnam War era and Americans were not viewed so kindly by those around the world during this time.

 The Americans 

 
"The Americans"

The United States dollar took another pounding on German, French and British exchanges this morning, hitting the lowest point ever known in West Germany. It has declined there by 41% since 1971 and this Canadian thinks it is time to speak up for the Americans as the most generous and possibly the least-appreciated people in all the world.

As long as sixty years ago, when I first started to read newspapers, I read of floods on the Yellow River and the Yangtse. Well, Who rushed in with men and money to help? The Americans did, that's who.

They have helped control floods on the Nile, the Amazon, the Ganges and the Niger. Today, the rich bottom land of the Mississippi is under water and no foreign land has sent a dollar to help. Germany, Japan and, to a lesser extent, Britain and Italy, were lifted out of the debris of war by the Americans who poured in billions of dollars and forgave other billions in debts. None of those countries is today paying even the interest on its remaining debts to the United States.

When the franc was in danger of collapsing in 1956, it was the Americans who propped it up and their reward was to be insulted and swindled on the streets of Paris. And I was there. I saw that.

When distant cities are hit by earthquakes, it is the United States that hurries into help... Managua Nicaragua is one of the most recent examples. So far this spring, 59 American communities have been flattened by tornadoes. Nobody has helped.

The Marshall Plan... the Truman Policy... all pumped billions upon billions of dollars into discouraged countries. And now, newspapers in those countries are writing about the decadent war-mongering Americans.

I'd like to see one of those countries that is gloating over the erosion of the United States dollar build its own airplanes.

Come on... let's hear it! Does any other country in the world have a plane to equal the Boeing Jumbo Jet, the Lockheed Tristar or the Douglas 10? If so, why don't they fly them? Why do all international lines except Russia fly American planes? Why does no other land on earth even consider putting a man or a women on the moon?

You talk about Japanese technocracy and you get radios. You talk about German technocracy and you get automobiles. You talk about American technocracy and you find men on the moon, not once, but several times... and safely home again. You talk about scandals and the Americans put theirs right in the store window for everybody to look at. Even the draft dodgers are not pursued and hounded. They are right here on our streets in Toronto, most of them... unless they are breaking Canadian laws... are getting American dollars from Ma and Pa at home to spend here.

When the Americans get out of this bind... as they will... who could blame them if they said 'the hell with the rest of the world'. Let someone else buy the bonds, let someone else build or repair foreign dams or design foreign buildings that won't shake apart in earthquakes.

When the railways of France, Germany and India were breaking down through age, it was the Americans who rebuilt them. When the Pennsylvania Railroad and the New York Central went broke, nobody loaned them an old caboose. Both of them are still broke. I can name to you 5,000 times when the Americans raced to the help of other people in trouble.

Can you name to me even one time when someone else raced to the Americans in trouble? I don't think there was outside help even during the San Francisco earthquake.

Our neighbours have faced it alone and I am one Canadian who is damned tired of hearing them kicked around. They will come out of this thing with their flag high. And when they do, they are entitled to thumb their noses at the lands that are gloating over their present troubles.

I hope Canada is not one of these. But there are many smug, self-righteous Canadians. And finally, the American Red Cross was told at its 48th Annual meeting in New Orleans this morning that it was broke.

This year's disasters... with the year less than half-over... has taken it all and nobody... but nobody... has helped.
 

Edited for historical correction.
 
 
I remember hearing this as a kid, the music playing in the background was the battlehymn of the republic right?
 
 
I finally found this. Several years ago, not long after I'd started working in the U.S.A., a co-worker of mine asked me why Americans were disliked. I couldn't really think of a way to explain it without sounding offensive. (When I have to think on my feet, diplomacy is often lacking.   ) About 2 years later I read a little blurb in USA Today's weekend magazine that seemed a rather appropriate response to my friend's question. I found it online and here it is.

 USA Today Weekend Magazine 

 
It's difficult to picture a more red-blooded American than Gulf War veteran Cmdr. Harmon "Harm" Rabb of CBS' JAG. But David James Elliott, the man who brings Rabb to life every week, isn't an American citizen. Elliott, 41, has lived in the USA about 10 years but felt no rush to become a citizen -- until Sept. 11. Now he wants to "become a full-fledged member of this fabulous place. Even when I was a kid, I wanted to move to America. There's something about this country that has always attracted me." "Will & Grace"'s Eric McCormack, 38 -- who, like Elliott, grew up in Toronto -- says he always felt as American as he did Canadian. But two years ago, after years of shuttling between the countries, he made it official and got dual citizenship. For McCormack, the events of Sept. 11 highlighted that allegiance: "Canada wept from one border to the next, the same as Americans." Patriotism, however, is more difficult to express. "That's one of the interesting areas where Canadians and Americans differ," McCormack says. "Canadians have the American influence, but they also have the British influence, which is not to wear anything on one's sleeve, not to be too outspoken. To be Canadian is not to express it. It's to be embarrassed by how outrageous the Americans are, always with the flags on their cars and the flags on their hats. They've got three national anthems, for God's sake! [Canadians] have one anthem, no one knows the words, and we're all embarrassed to sing it. I'm exaggerating, but it's a very different mentality."
 

(On the web site, scroll down near the bottom. The last entry before "Birthdays".)
 
 
 
I remember hearing this as a kid, the music playing in the background was the battlehymn of the republic right?
 

The only thing I recall about Gordon Sinclair was seeing him as a member of the panel on "Front Page Challenge". That was a good show!
 
 
ceili, if you go to snopes, they have a link of Gordon reading this.

(and yes, there's a version with Battle Hymn of the Republic playing in the background)
 
 
Bush's "Leave no promises behind."
*****************************

Clarence Page
Bush leaves no promise behind

Published January 25, 2004

WASHINGTON -- There are people out there who "need our help," President Bush said in his State of the Union address last week, and he proceeded to promise it to them. In large bundles.

His promises seemed to open up the coffers of government like a pinata: $15 billion to fight AIDS in Africa and the Caribbean, a new option of retirement savings accounts under Social Security, a $1.2 billion research initiative to develop affordable non-polluting hydrogen-powered cars,...

Oops! Sorry, folks. I'm reading from the wrong speech. The president made those promises in last year's State of the Union address.

This year's speech made little or absolutely no mention of those promises, among others, from last year. Bush had new promises to make.

This year's speech made no mention of last year's big surprise, the costly AIDS package. Maybe that's because none of the promised $15 billion over five years has been disbursed yet. For 2004, the president asked for $2 billion instead of the expected $3 billion, but Congress eventually settled on $2.4 billion.

Meanwhile, 2.3 million more HIV-infected patients died in sub-Sahara Africa over the past year and another 3 million people were infected, according to the World Health Organization. Yet the Bush administration is pushing for the third year in a row to reduce funding to the cash-strapped Global AIDS Fund. You have to pinch pennies someplace.

Instead, Bush brought up another surprising health issue this year, a cost-free challenge to the sports industry to "get rid of steroids now." Pass the word to your buddies at the gym, Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger.

Bush also called on everyone to oppose same-sex marriage, support the USA Patriot Act with all of its assaults on civil liberties, yet also love one another regardless of race, religion, ethnicity or sexual orientation. That's the sort of red-meat rhetoric Bush's political base loves to hear and, unlike most of his other proposals, it doesn't deepen the deficit.

As for those nifty-sounding retirement savings accounts into which younger workers can set aside some of their Social Security money, Bush first pushed that golden oldie during the 2000 campaign. He formed a high-profile study commission to study it. But he has not pushed it toward legislation, maybe because the transition costs alone would deepen the deficit, now approaching a half-trillion dollars. Nevertheless, look for it to come up again in the next campaign, opening soon at a campaign stump near you.

And those cool-sounding hydrogen-powered cars? You'll find the $1.2 billion research proposal tucked away somewhere in the Senate Finance Committee. You did not find it or any other mention of the environment in this year's State of the Union address. Like President Bush's dramatic moon and Mars exploration initiatives, which he unveiled earlier in the month in an echo of John F. Kennedy's lunar ambitions, the hydrogen idea seems all but lost in the rhetorical ozone again.

But the biggest elephant missing from the room was the weapons of mass destruction that took up so much of last year's address, as Bush argued for an invasion of Iraq. Last year he charged former Iraqi leader Saddam Hussein with hoarding "38,000 liters of botulinum toxin... 500 tons of sarin, mustard and VX nerve agent... several mobile biological weapons labs... to produce germ warfare agents... a design for a nuclear weapon" and, of course, the now-infamous CIA-discredited claim that Hussein had tried to get uranium from an African country.

This year? All of that fearful stuff was reduced to a claim that weapons inspectors have identified "dozens of weapons-of-mass-destruction-related program activities." That may rank as the longest hyphenated presidential phrase in American history, a masterpiece of obfuscation.

Sure, Bush's State of the Union address was a very political speech. Aren't they all? But the address served the president's purposes. On the night after the Iowa caucuses, he looked properly solemn in comparison to former Democratic front-runner Howard Dean's maniacal-looking televised outburst the night before.

Or maybe that was a look of quiet disappointment on Bush's face. Maybe he was saddened to see his best chance for a re-election landslide self-destruct on national TV. Of all the leading Democratic candidates, Dean was considered easiest to beat by Team Bush and its Amen Chorus of media conservatives. After Dean's Monday night error--his "I Have a Scream" speech, some called it--quite a few Democrats suddenly agreed with them.

Sure, as my friends in the Dean camp insist, Dean was just trying to rally his troops after coming in a surprising third in the Iowa caucuses before heading to New Hampshire. But, then, politics is 95 percent perceptions. Bush understands that. He'll promise us anything, as long as we have short memories.
----------

E-mail:  cptime@aol.com 
********
And, boy, does Americans have short memories.
 
 
Blatham's colorful vignette seems to have struck a resonant chord. From it and the comments of others I get the impression that many Canadians disapprove of some of the political and cultural choices Americans have made - even, indeed particularly, in areas which do not directly affect them. If there is anything in this thread that strikes me as remarkable, it is this.

People of every country as well as different regions of large countries, have different manners of expression, different popular cultural manifestations and, different social habits. Laws and customs are somewhat different in most countries, reflecting the different choices people make for their governance and social interactions. In most cases people take a live and let live attitude - reserving criticism and action to those areas which involve a significant potential of direct effect on themselves. However here I see concern and criticism expressed in areas that not only don't affect Canada or Canadians, but are also often merely the garden variety of national or regional differences in behavior or expression. One could perhaps argue that because America is so influential and so unrivalled that, even aspects of life that are commonly regarded as beyond the proper concern of others, have become the appropriate concern of outsiders - in our case. I will accept this principle in some areas of our actions, but not in those that have been cited here.

I find this behavior more indicative of something remarkable in the critics than in those who are the objects of their undue concern. What motivates it? Again, one does not find such concern and disapproval in areas that don't directly affect us directed at Canada from Americans either in government, popular expressions or on these threads.

It might be worth noting that a decade or so ago when the separatist movement in Quebec appeared to offer potential for serious political discord, and perhaps worse, there was no scolding or unsolicited advice from either our government or popular media. This was your affair and our role was to attempt to be understanding and otherwise butt out. Seems like good advice for you now.
 
 
Dagnabbit! Back to vignette school for me.

george

I guess I was trying to get too damned fancy for my britches. Oh well...a man's reach should exceed and all that.

Actually, I wasn't trying to communicate Canadian advice to America for America's own internal cultural and social decisions.

But you see, that IS what happened, only in reverse, when your drug czar came visiting us. True, he didn't threaten trade sanctions, but your ambassador did.

And I do want to thank you on the FLQ matter, though I realize I'm a bit tardy.
 
 
Though he gives me ample reason, I find it difficult to get or stay sore at Blatham (or even Canada). I think it's the wit and the lightheartedness that finally breaks through the cant of secular evangelical judgementalism. (Great phrase - made it up myself.)

Alterantively it could be my own good nature and joi de vivre.

FLQ matter?? (f%#@ing little question?; flatulent laughing.... no; what?)
However, you are welcome, no mater what.
 
 
There may be some classy Texas sirens in the land of the maples and loons.......if only the eye could see. These same Texans may be lighthearted secular evangelical judgementalists. But surely the Canadians are more irratable than the 34 y.o. young men who cannot get laid. But then, some people are too big for their britches.......(not sayin who.)
 
 
I'm of the opinion that these kinds of discussions between the canuks and mercans are okay and encouraged. Isn't that what families and good friends do? We can always agree to disagree, but please keep the discussion on-going.
 
 
FLQ - Front de libération du Québec

That was over 30 years ago.

I'm thinking georgeob1 had something different in mind. Maybe that event with the flags and such, that the current patronage flap is related to.
 
 
 
Actually, I wasn't trying to communicate Canadian advice to America for America's own internal cultural and social decisions.

But you see, that IS what happened, only in reverse, when your drug czar came visiting us. True, he didn't threaten trade sanctions, but your ambassador did.

 

If Canada were to legalize pot, that would create a serious law enforcement problem for us which could be solved only by tougher enforcement at our border. I believe that, and not trade sanctions per se, was the topic addressed by our Ambassador. A good deal of coordinated manufacturing goes on between Michigan, New York and Ontario, some invoilving just-in-time delivery of parts and components for large industries. The requirement for more stringent border inspections could seriously disrupt all that. Were this to occur, Canada would be the economic loser.

The question of the legalization of pot is a legitimate one for each country to address on its own. However, in this case it is Canada that is (or was) proposing to alter the status quo, not the U.S. Canada raised hell after "discovering" that the United States didn't intend to adopt a similar measure (we are after all an independent country).

Self-righteous, self-induilgent hypocricy !
 
 
 
 
Actually, I wasn't trying to communicate Canadian advice to America for America's own internal cultural and social decisions.

But you see, that IS what happened, only in reverse, when your drug czar came visiting us. True, he didn't threaten trade sanctions, but your ambassador did.

 

If Canada were to legalize pot, that would create a serious law enforcement problem for us which could be solved only by tougher enforcement at our border. I believe that, and not trade sanctions per se, was the topic addressed by our Ambassador. A good deal of coordinated manufacturing goes on between Michigan, New York and Ontario, some invoilving just-in-time delivery of parts and components for large industries. The requirement for more stringent border inspections could seriously disrupt all that. Were this to occur, Canada would be the economic loser.

The question of the legalization of pot is a legitimate one for each country to address on its own. However, in this case it is Canada that is (or was) proposing to alter the status quo, not the U.S. Canada raised hell after "discovering" that the United States didn't intend to adopt a similar measure (we are after all an independent country).

Self-righteous, self-induilgent hypocricy !
 

If Cellucci made threats about the pot issue, then I missed that one. The threats I'm taking about is when he made a speech about how disapointed America was that Canada has decided not back the US is their war and he said that there would be consequenses for Canada. When asked what those consequenses were, he said "you'll just have to wait and see"!
 
 
Montana and george

Threats were made on both subjects, actually. And that's not unusual. For example, a proposed move in New Zealand a few years back to liberalize marijuana laws brought a response from the US which was effectively a threat to ruin their sheep industry.

 
The question of the legalization of pot is a legitimate one for each country to address on its own. However, in this case it is Canada that is (or was) proposing to alter the status quo, not the U.S. Canada raised hell after "discovering" that the United States didn't intend to adopt a similar measure (we are after all an independent country).

Self-righteous, self-induilgent hypocricy !
 

Gosh, I like that final sentence. And it has one of these!

But, since when does simply 'altering the status quo' generate sufficient cause for anything? The American constitution was an alteration of the status quo, but so was that loathsome emergence of the first loaf of WonderBread. Or the policy of pre-emptive unilateral war.
 
 
Preemptive war is as old as human history.

Don't know the details of the supposed "threats", however on the drugs issues the response would appropriately be stiffer inspection of trade goods and people coming from the country with relaxed controls. That is certainly our right, and if it happens it will be the result of Canadian initiatives.

Even a small delay at the Detroit and Buffalo border crossings would have a very serious effect on Canadian manfacturing in support of the auto industry. I do not believe that the U.S. government would threaten or enact trade sanctions in retaliation for Canadian legalization of pot. However they have made very clear their intent to enact stricter border controls if Canada takes this step, and I can readily believe Canada would correctly see this as adversely impacting their trade. You make your choices and you take the consequences. It is childish to blame others.
 
 
"Kill them first" is as old as human history. the precedent of legal basis and codification of "pre-emption" is a very recent development.

By very recent i mean the wane of the British empire and the culmination was in even more recent history with Isreal.

Yes, in human history there has always been those quick to decide to try to kill perceived enemies.

But in the civilized age "pre-emption" has been recognized as a dangerous method that can be usurped. And it has traditionally been conservatively sanctioned because of the facility with which it can be used as a pretext.

In almost any legal codification of "preemption" caution is a prevalent theme.

I think George tells only half the story by saying "pre-emption" has always been with us.

He's right that it has, but neglects to point out that with civilization it has become much more strictly defined and is a recent development.
 
 
 
"Kill them first" is as old as human history. the precedent of legal basis and codification of "pre-emption" is a very recent development.
 

Damn you for bringing me so close to using the smiley emoticon.
 
 
george

The drug issue came up as an example of why a Canadian citizen might think the US a tad insufferable. Forget the marijuana liberalization thing - you are getting stuck at the border.

Take instead the proposal by my city's mayor to open a safe injection site as one part of a program to minimize the harms associated with intravenous drug use. Your drug czar came to Vancouver and did what he could to stop the plan.

Why? Well, first, because the US is NUTS on the subject of drugs. Now that's a big conversation, but if we had it, carefully and fully, you wouldn't win it if you argued that US policy is either consistent or empirically justifiable, or morally justifiable for that matter.

But to get back to the insufferable part...it's the presumption underlying his visit...that his (his nation's) values re social arrangements were superior to those that Canada's citizens were choosing for themselves, and that we needed his patronization on the matter.
 
 
 The legal basis for pre-emption 
 
 
Hmmm - much as I agree with you Blatham - I think that you are being a tad harsh.

Given that the US is, as you say, nuts on drugs, it is logical that the official concerned would have qualms about what he and his ilk see as a slippery slope of toleration happening in Canada - which they would be concerned would increase over-border drug operations for the US to be worried about.

I am sure he DOES think the US's social arrangements better than Canada's - or anyone else's - but, given the US's concerns, I think they had a right to express them - I am not sure that this can be regarded as NECESSARILY stemming from patronization. (Is that a word?)

To be fair, we all feel at liberty to tell the US off.

I am sure we TRY to be patronizing, at times - but, at least in Oz's case - it is hard for a mouse to effectively patronize an elephant.....

Reminds me of a joke, that...
 
 
 
 The legal basis for pre-emption 
 

So whadjya studying....law history or summin'?
 
 
No, just casual reading for curiosity's sake that became more interesting after the invasion of Iraq.
 
 
You must enjoy dry reading.  
 
 
Only if I'm interested. The legal documents were dry but the case studies fascinating.
 
 
I'll take your word for it.  
 
 
caprice,

You are right that the Vietnam era is similar to this era. Both wars were of choice and both caused an awful lot of controversy.

I have only started paying so much attention to the news since the Clinton scandal so I was more or less going by that in my mind. (I know that admission don't do much for my credibility) I watched it a little during the Clarence Thomas hearings and the Iran Contra (?) hearings, but I didn't really start getting caught up with it so to speak until the Clinton thing. I guess because I could see the start of an era that caused me a lot of concern. People scoffed at Hillary Clinton when she mentioned the "vast right wing conspiracy" but I agreed with her and now we are controlled by them and so the rest of the world has to feel the effects of it too since the US effects the rest of the world.

I personally think pot (a lot easier to spell)should be legal along with other drugs. If people want to pollute their bodies that is their business. If the reason we outlaw recreational drugs is because of the actions that those on drugs do then we should outlaw alcohol as well. I haved lived with an alcoholic for over 20 years (on and off mostly on) so I know first hand that it is as bad as a drug addiction.
 
 
I don't think anyone in the U.S. government is particularly interested in the choices Canada makes for its own social and legal structures in themselves. You are free to do as you wish. However the matter of drugs legalization does indeed affect us directly in terms of managing illicit traffic at the border. We are, and have every right to be, interested in that. I have no interest in debating the drugs matter. Both Canada and the United States are free to make the choices they have made with respect to these internal issues. However, Canada has no right to unilaterally create such a major difference in its treatment of such a contentious issue and expect us to take no action at the border. It is worse still to mischaracterize this as trade sanctions.

The formalities of declarations of war developed in the early 18th century and continued through the 19th century and until WWI, which was also 'declared' in this sense. Since then none - not one - of the many wars of the 20th century have been so 'declared' by any of their many participants from France and the UK to the Soviet Union (Hungary & Czechoslovakia), India and Pakistan, India and China, to North Korea or North Vietnam and many others: each was started by the preemptive action one (or both) of the antagonists. Indeed this 18th and 19th century practice is the exception to the historical rule.

In any war the party initiating the armed hostilities can be said to have "preempted" the conflict, with or without such a declaration. Craven is in a semantical tailspin.

Historians generally note the "civilized era" as having begun in 800 BC (or earlier) and the modern era as the start of the 15th century.
 
 
 
Some of the loudest squeals of disapproval have come from south of the border. John Walters, head of the Office of National Drug Control Policy, has repeatedly lashed out at Canada for considering changes in its marijuana laws, as has US Ambassador Paul Celluci. Walters has been warning for months that Canadian decriminalization would cause a boom in US consumption. "It's a multibillion-dollar industry and most of the production is headed south," he said in May. At the time, he praised countries such as Mexico and Colombia, which supported eradication, but "Canada seems to be going in another direction." A few days later, he weighed in again. "We'll respond to the threat," he told a cable news show. "What we have to do is protect Americans and right now, this is out of control."

Cellucci, meanwhile, has raised ominous concerns that decriminalization could tie up the busy US-Canadian border, of key importance to the Canadian economy. He was at it most recently in Edmonton, Alberta, December 10, telling reporters decrim could mean problems. "Our concern is the perception of this is that this is a weakening of the law... that it will be easier to get marijuana in Canada," he said. "Our customs and immigration officers, they're law-enforcement officers. If they think it's easier to get marijuana in Canada, they're going to be on the lookout for it. That's going to put pressure on the border at a time when we've been trying to take pressure off it. We don't want to have a lot of young people having their vehicles inspected when they're crossing the border."

Canadian politicians, however, don't think much of such rhetoric. In an interview published on November 14, Vancouver, British Columbia Mayor Larry Campbell, formerly a narcotics officer with the Mounties then Vancouver's coroner, told Drug War Chronicle, "[John Walters] is probably the most misinformed person in the whole United States." In July 2002, following a visit to Canada by US Rep. Mark Souder, Member of Parliament Libby Davies, responding to Souder's claim that marijuana is as dangerous as cocaine, told the Canadian Press, " My God, what is this man talking about? We can't be subservient to the ridiculous rhetoric coming out of the United States."

In fairness to Canada, it should be pointed out that two-thirds of the US population lives in states where marijuana possession has been decriminalized. In Ohio, for instance, possession of up to a quarter-pound is punishable by only a fine. According to Mayor Campbell, in fact, " [m]ost US states have more liberal policies on marijuana than we do."
 
 http://stopthedrugwar.org/chronicle/canada/index.shtml 

1) to deny the element of financial threat implicit in the statements of Cerlucci and Walters is naive or purposefully blind. Further, it doesn't take into account a pattern of US policy and actions on the world scene re 'drugs' (a term more inconsistently defined in US policy than any other I know of, with the possible exception of 'friend')

2) we'll note that Canadian politicians didn't head down to Idaho to muck about with Idaho's decision to lessen penalties for possession. Idahoans might have considered such to be presumptuous, even patronizing, don't you think?

3) As a BC court judge responded to one of Walter's recent lectures, "These guys, with the number of kids they've put into jail, with the drug related crime they have, are going to suggest our drug policies?"

But, this all began as a discussion on why folks around the world might be pissed at the US. The drug issue is relatively minor, just one I've put some study into, but it fits a pattern (worldwide) of bullying and big fat lack of humility.

As I noted elsewhere, several months past, documents were released under our Freedom of Information act here which disclosed negotiations between our government and the US government on prospective weapons systems purchases from US companies. The amount of money our government felt was available to invest in these weapons systems seemed insufficient to the US government negotiators, who suggested we take the money from our social programs. That really encouraged love feelings in we canadians for our neighbors down south.

Frankly, I'm getting a bit weary of this discussion. george, you're a good guy, but your protests are an instance of a national failing - a very real reluctance to admit national wrongs, or to admit to national characteristics which are valid cause for protest from other nations in the world. We've talked about this many times before. It's an extraordinary oddity that the nation which sits at an unchallenged apex of power and wealth in the world, so easily assumes the role of the victim, of the misunderstood and lonely good guy, enemies all about. Talk about self-fulfilling!

Those of us who love the project of the Bill of Rights, who love Americans far more than holding negative notions about them, could nearly rip our hair out trying to get you to view yourselves from a vantage OUTSIDE OF YOUR MYTHOLOGIES ABOUT YOURSELF. And that's what the weariness is all about.
 
 
caprice, As an active member of A2K, dry reading is a necessary evil.  
 
 
 
Frankly, I'm getting a bit weary of this discussion. george, you're a good guy, but your protests are an instance of a national failing - a very real reluctance to admit national wrongs, or to admit to national characteristics which are valid cause for protest from other nations in the world. We've talked about this many times before. It's an extraordinary oddity that the nation which sits at an unchallenged apex of power and wealth in the world, so easily assumes the role of the victim, of the misunderstood and lonely good guy, enemies all about. Talk about self-fulfilling!

Those of us who love the project of the Bill of Rights, who love Americans far more than holding negative notions about them, could nearly rip our hair out trying to get you to view yourselves from a vantage OUTSIDE OF YOUR MYTHOLOGIES ABOUT YOURSELF. And that's what the weariness is all about.
 

Well, I think I am a good guy too. I think you are as well (perhaps just a smidgeon less...)

There is a difference between disagreement over specific issues and criticism of the nature or character of your interlocutor. The latter seems to be (here at least) the special province of our critics, especially the Canadian ones. America and Americans have many defects, perhaps some among those being cited here. I have no doubt we can sometimes be annoying to others, just as they can have a similar effect on us. We however seem to be a good deal less fixated on these things than do our critics.

Your example of U.S. attempts to persuade Cadada to spend more on defense presents a good example. We each have treaty obligations to come to one another's defense if necessary. We have for some time expressed concerns about Canada's ability to back up the bargain it made with us. Canada's defense spending has long been among the lowest in NATO, and by a wide margin. We don't complain that Canada or Canadians have some kind of character defect, or that Canada is in the grip of pot smoking evangelicals from BC: instead we express disagreement over a specific issue. That is certainly our right, and, it seems to me, is far less intrusive and presumptious than making sweeping judgements about your national character.
 
 
Blatham
I was going to go do a search for the information stating that certain amounts of marijuana is already decriminalized in some states in the US, but you beat me to it. Thanks for doing the leg work ;-)

george
Canada was talking about decriminalizing much less amounts of marijuana that are already decriminalized in some of your states and the laws were not going to change on amounts larger than the very small amount and on cultivation of marijuana, so your arguement on how strict they would have to become at the US borders falls apart there. Canada was not talking about making it legal and was simply trying to prevent people from jamming up the courts and giving people criminal records over a small about of pot.

Now I have to go find an article that mentions Cellucci's threat to Canada for refusing to back the US in their invasion on Iraq, since you've been dancing around that one.
 
 
Montana,

I'll readily confess I have no knowledge of either who Cellucci is (I infer from your posts that he may be our Ambassador) or what he may have said and in what context. I think the subject we are discussing here goes well beyond that matter.

We see the ambassadors of France, Germany and other nations on our news medi quite frequently explaining their disagreements with our policies and outlining the expected actions their governments will take to oppose them. The French have gotten to many Americans (even that is a passing thing now), but otherwise we tend to deal with issues as they arise, and not the actors who raise them.
 
 
 
In any war the party initiating the armed hostilities can be said to have "preempted" the conflict, with or without such a declaration. Craven is in a semantical tailspin.

 

Yes it "can be said" to be that way. Only if you engage in semantics yourself.

There is a clear precendent for "pre-emption". In the past it was just "kill them first". Pre-emption and "kill them first" are a horse of a different colour.

To equate the two is to compare modern execution to primitive lynchings. While comparable in the act it ignores the criterias and procedures established with civilization.

This is hardly a semantic issue George. Any more so than ignoring law is.
 
 
I doin't follow you Craven. Civilization is several millenia old now and armed attacks by one nation, state, or tribe upon another have been going on all that time. How do you term the group that initiates hostilities? Did they preempt? Or are there some factors that can justify an initial attack and make it somehow not a "preemption"? If so what are those factors, and what is yoiur basis for asserting them? Don't just trot ot recent notions of the proximate danger of grevious injury. There is little basis in history, recent or otherwise to support that standard. Moreover one must deal with the questions of just what constitutes proximate and what constitutes grevious injury. Did the UK and France preempt at Suez in 1956? Did France preempt in their recent intervention in the Ivory Coast? Did the Soviet Union preempt in Hungary and Czechoslovakia? Did the Sandanista government of Nicaragua which supplied and directed the revolutionary movement in El Salvador preempt? Did either India or China preempt in their Himalayan war of a few decades ago? Pakistan and India? Zimbabwe in the Congo? etc.etc.
 
 
Found this and thought it explains a whole lot about why a lot of Canadians feel the way we do.

It's a long read, but well worth it.

george
If you really want to know what our beef is, please read this.

 http://www.canadianactionparty.ca/MainPages/News.asp?Type=secNonParty%20OR%20secParty&ID=257&Language=English 
 
 
 
I doin't follow you Craven.
 

Ok, her's the short version. I don't really want to get into this discussion so this'll be my last word on it here.

Yes, nations have always "pre-empted" each other.

Just like execution has always existed.

But in modern civilization there are precedents and guidelines.

So while in the past a neighbourhood lynching was, indeed, an execution, it is not comparable to modern executions with law, criteria and procedures specifying how it should be carried out.

The same is the case in "pre-emption". In the past nations did not care a whit about the justifications for it. In modern civilization there are precedents and criteria to follow.

What I'm saying is that justifications for anticipatory defense and the very notion of "pre-emption" in modern society comes from the 1800s.

Before that it was just "let's kill them first" with no concern for the justification of "anticipatory defence".

And if you disagree, I'm perfectly fine with that. I don't want to pick nits right now. And if I get into it later it'll be on the thread about that I liked to above.
 
 
Jesus, I can't believe he printed that. Mel Hurtig is the leader of a political party, he is/was the publisher of a small printer, i'm not sure how you say it, he published books, but the company has been in and out of the red for years. He is a wing-nut.
Please, while some of his statistics and information is basically correct on some level, it's a pretty skewed, narrow minded view of the Canadian - American relationship. His opinion may mirror a small percentage of the population, but you'd be hard pressed to hear this shite out of anyone's mouth.
I think the article is a valuable lesson on what 'hate' can do to a mind...................

Canadians are in the midst of trying to decriminalize posession of small amounts marijuana. We still bust the growers and the dealers. But why should a person have a criminal record or spend time in jail for a joint?
For example, Al Gore's son was recently busted for a very small amount. He will always have a record, if not in court documents but in the public memory.
Imagine the paper work, the costs; police, courts, lawyers, judges, jailers, ect...all for less than $30 of weed. Seems silly doesn't it?
 
 
Ceili, Seems downright criminal......for the government to spend so much for so little. We have "three strikes" law in California, and it's not a matter of a "little." We spend over $35,000 a year to house a prisoner with three strikes for I don't know how many years.....
 
 
Ceili
That is the first thing I've seen written by him, but I agree with everything he said in that article. I am not trying to push hate, but I do enjoy seeing anyone put Cellucci in his place. Before I moved to Canada from Mass, Cellucci was the governor of Massachusetts and he almost started a riot there before he was appointed ambassador by Bush. If Gore had become president, he said that Cellucci would be all done. After finally moving to Canada, I was relieved to be away from Cellucci the nut case and my heart dropped when I learned that he was coming to Canada as well. The man is insane and has no business being in the positions he's been in.
 
 
 Paul Cellucci: Shut Up! 
 
 
Taken from the link, "Where Mr. Cellucci went wrong, of course, is in his implication that Canada failed to come to the aid of the United States in its time of peril. There wasn't one; they were under no threat from Iraq, it was quite the opposite. The United States was not in peril; the United States WAS the peril."

This says it best; but we must remember that it's this president and the neo-cons that have brought this to our detriment. If we don't replace this group of thugs in November, I cry not only for our neighbors, but for the whole world.
 
 
Montana,

I read your link. Who is Mel Hurtig? Evidently he does represent some aspects of Canadian opinion. Generally I would say that much venom and anger is more apt to pollute the minds and spirits of those who entertain it than those to whom it is supposedly addressed. A pity.

He also has some rather odd ideas about economics. There is a well-developed international market for oil, and worldwide reserves have been growing at a rate equal to demand for over 50 years. There are plenty of alternate sources for petroleum. Canada enjoys a large trade surplus with the U.S., and any disruption of it would hurt Canada severely, and have only a very small effect on the much larger U.S. economy. I say this not at all as a threat, but merely to point out that Hurtig is a bit delusional.

The bits about our late entry into WWI and WWII were a little over the top. The U.S. escaped its colonial obligations to the UK a long time ago, and had nothing at all to do with the European stupidity and perfidy that created WWI and sowed the seeds for WWII - events that by overwhelming margins were the greatest disasters of the last century, and the reasons the U.S. is so dominant today.

His rage seems out of proportion even to the somewhat odd reasons he cites. Nice neighborly types you grow up there.
 
 
Caprice
LOL. More lovely thoughts about Paul Cellucci.

CI
Ditto!
 
 
george
That persons thoughts are not the thoughts of the majority of Canadians, although, some of it is. These are my thoughts because I was born and raised an American and have seen both sides of the street. I left the country because I was abused by my own government, so I lived it and got as far away from it as I could. Yes, those are my thoughts because I'm angry as hell after going through what I went through, but that's just me and I certainly don't speak for the Canadian people.

I don't hear Canadians badmouthing America in my neck of the woods, so please don't think that I speak for anyone but myself.

Do you have any links to prove what you're saying is true?
 
 
I read the relatively more restrained piece by Paul Harris. Certainly more in the mainstream of normal human disagreements and dispute.

However even there I noted a remarkably intense reaction to a speech, criticcal of some actions of the Canadian government, delivered to a group of businessmen in Toronto by the U.S. Ambassador. Even the somewhat restrained fury of Mr Harris seems to me a bit disproportionate compared to the many deliberate insults your previous Premier and his aides regularly delivered against our government over the last several years.

We often see reports in our media of similar speeches in the U.S. by the Ambassadors of France and occasionally Germany (although they are usually more circumspect and polite). They are reported but almost never ignite a reaction here.

What is the source of this - to me- very neurotic sensitivity?
 
 
george
You obviously have never been to Canada to see how very friendly and neighborly the people are here.

Peace is our middle name george.
 
 
 
Do you have any links to prove what you're saying is true?
 

Links don't necessarily constitute proof - lots of trash and misinformation on the web.

However for details on the amounts and classes of goods traded by Canada and the U.S. and on some details of the economys of each country, see the CIA World Fact Book at;

 http://www.cia.gov/cia/publications/factbook/index.html 

For details of the history leading up to WWI and WWII see any of the many histories of the 20th century. I recommend "Modern Times" by Paul Johnson (an Englishman) and (for WWI) "The Guns of August" by the late American historian Barbara Tuchman.
 
 
george
You obviousy don't get any of the Canadian channels where you are because we not only see what's going on on our end, but we also see what's going on in your neck of the woods and what we see is obviously edited for American veiwing on your end. Did you see Bush in the news with all his blaming and finger pointing towards Canada after 9/11 up to this day? Well, we have seen it and we are getting a bit tired of it.
 
 
Montana,

On the contrary, I have been to Canada many times - east and west, though unfortunately never to Montreal, a city I have often wished to visit. I like Toronto and Vancouver a great deal.

As a boy my family would sometimes summer at a place we had near Colchester on the north shore of lake Eire. (I do recall that the Canadian customs inspectors would hassle us a lot when we took the boat and outboard motor across in Detroit.)

In my Navy days we did a number of rather long at sea exercises in the Pacific with the four or five rather old frigates that constituted Canada's contribution to our mutual defense in that theater. I entertained their captains in my mess regularly - most of them were good guys. I also took a ship of mine into Esquimalt - a charming little Canadian Navy base near Victoria BC.

Most, almost all, of the Canadians I met were quite agreeable. I did however run in to a few loud and aggressive types who were quite liberal with their opinions and a bit reminiscent of your Mr Hurtig. Every place has its loonies.
 
 
LOL george. Well, I guess that means I make it on your loonie list ;-)
 
 
Montana, welcome aboard. I saved you a seat.  
 
 
Oh cool, I hate sitting alone. Care for some popcorn?
 
 
 
...compared to the many deliberate insults your previous Premier and his aides regularly delivered against our government over the last several years.
 

Uhm...Premier? Which one? In Canada, a premier is the head of a provincial government. It is a position somewhat akin to a governor of a state in the U.S.A. I think you were likely referring to the former Prime Minister Jean Chretien. And the only deliberate insult I recall was when the prime minister's director of communications, Francoise Ducros, called Bush a moron. (Not too far off the mark, was she?   Just kidding! Sorta...*heee!!!*) She wasn't too swift herself by making that comment in front of two reporters.

 
Links don't necessarily constitute proof - lots of trash and misinformation on the web.
 

This is true, but it might behoove you to recognize the fact that many of your fellow posters at A2K are cable of distinguishing between a trustworthy site and one that is less than reputable.

 
I do recall that the Canadian customs inspectors would hassle us a lot when we took the boat and outboard motor across in Detroit
 

So...are you saying you expected the Canadian customs officers to let you travel back and forth between Canada and the U.S.A. without any interference?
 
 
 
 
 
I heard this on a t.v. show tonight. It's called Airline and it's a sort of reality mini-series following the trials and tribulations of airline staff at Southwest Airlines.

This elderly lady with an oxygen tank felt she should be allowed on board. (Oxygen tanks are not allowed on passenger planes.) Her comment was "I'm an American. I have the right to get on that plane."

I can't speak for other nations, but I'm not sure I've ever heard anything expressed by a Canadian that would come close to that comment. Uniquely American perhaps? To expect deferential treatment because they are "an American"?
 
 
At the risk of offending those in the green and pleasant lands, I heard similar things from the English in the 1970s.  
 
 
Montana,

It's true I don't watch Canadian TV unless you count the odd CSPAN broadcast of the proceedings in the Canadian Parliament - (I find their accents, with the hard consonants and loud aspirations a bit grating and the manner of speech is often as full of bluster as your Mr.Hurtig, but no worse overall than the oily platitudes of U.S. politicians.)

I don't watch much American TV either, and I doubt that viewing more of either it or the Canadian variety would do much to improve my (or your) understanding.

Perhaps you are too influenced by your Massachusetts experience. In my view it is one of the most disagreeable parts of this country. Fall River and Foxboro must be among the largest concentrations of stupid ugly people in the world - both veritable eddys in the genetic stream of American life. No wonder you prefer Canada.

There are loonies everywhere, but I don't think you are necessarily one. (Don't hang around with Hobit too long though).  
 
 
 
If we don't replace this group of thugs in November, I cry not only for our neighbors, but for the whole world.
 

Don't forget yourselves.   I too hope that Bush is not re-elected. He didn't win the popular vote last time, it should be interesting to see what happens this time. I hope more Americans get out and vote! After all, the last election illustrated how their vote really can matter.
 
 
 
At the risk of offending those in the green and pleasant lands, I heard similar things from the English in the 1970s.  
 

Really? The "I'm English, I deserve better" kind of thing? *L* Hmm....maybe that's where the Americans get it from! After all, the American roots are primarily British. *ducks and fleeees!!!*
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Now, that's much better! LOL
 
 
Beer....the common denominator....the tie that binds.

*LOL*
 
 
 
Montana,

It's true I don't watch Canadian TV unless you count the odd CSPAN broadcast of the proceedings in the Canadian Parliament - (I find their accents, with the hard consonants and loud aspirations a bit grating and the manner of speech is often as full of bluster as your Mr.Hurtig, but no worse overall than the oily platitudes of U.S. politicians.)

I don't watch much American TV either, and I doubt that viewing more of either it or the Canadian variety would do much to improve my (or your) understanding.

Perhaps you are too influenced by your Massachusetts experience. In my view it is one of the most disagreeable parts of this country. Fall River and Foxboro must be among the largest concentrations of stupid ugly people in the world - both veritable eddys in the genetic stream of American life. No wonder you prefer Canada.

There are loonies everywhere, but I don't think you are necessarily one. (Don't hang around with Hobit too long though).  
 

Well, I lived among the pretty people in the Boston area, but I was a loon there too. I can assure you that my experiences in Massachusetts have everything to do with the way I feel and rightfully so. You could say that I'm a little bitter, but my thought on things would still stand even if I hadn't of had those experiences, except I probably wouldn't feel so strongly about the issues. I do love it here though. I feel so free :-D
 
 
Forget what "they" say about America - look at what Americans say about them !

 

Most of this is the obvious stuff, but can you believe some of it?! I know there's some sour grapes over Iraq, but putting perfectly democratic, bon-vivant, NATO-ally France behind strongman-ruled, cold-and-gruff Russia (which was hardly any friendlier on Iraq)? And struggling-for-democracy, home-of-ancient-civilisation Iran behind home-of-9/11 Saudi-Arabia, Castro-Cuba and Lybia ?
 
 
 
Forget what "they" say about America - look at what Americans say about them !

 

Most of this is the obvious stuff, but can you believe some of it?! I know there's some sour grapes over Iraq, but putting perfectly democratic, bon-vivant, NATO-ally France behind strongman-ruled, cold-and-gruff Russia (which was hardly any friendlier on Iraq)? And struggling-for-democracy, home-of-ancient-civilisation Iran behind home-of-9/11 Saudi-Arabia, Castro-Cuba and Lybia ?
 

Nobody said Americans were bright. And anybody who did, somewhat paradoxically, wasn't very bright. I remember a National Geographic poll last year showing that less than 20% of Americans could even locate Iraq on a map - an this as we are waging war on them!
 
 
 
Nobody said Americans were bright. And anybody who did, somewhat paradoxically, wasn't very bright. I remember a National Geographic poll last year showing that less than 20% of Americans could even locate Iraq on a map - an this as we are waging war on them!
 

Way to disparage an entire country at one shot. Has America become the average white guy? Has America become the world's whipping post?

ILZ, you obviously have a personal beef with America and Americans...what happened? Did we drop a bomb on your dog or something?
 
 
I think France got the bad rap because they're more prone to voice their opinion about English-speaking Americans and Brits. I remember one of my earlier visits to Paris when I was trying to get service at the travel office at a train station. I had murder in my heart when that bitch treated me with disrespect and disdain. That kind of experience sticks with you.
 
 
 
Forget what "they" say about America - look at what Americans say about them !

Most of this is the obvious stuff, but can you believe some of it?! I know there's some sour grapes over Iraq, but putting perfectly democratic, bon-vivant, NATO-ally France behind strongman-ruled, cold-and-gruff Russia (which was hardly any friendlier on Iraq)? And struggling-for-democracy, home-of-ancient-civilisation Iran behind home-of-9/11 Saudi-Arabia, Castro-Cuba and Lybia ?
 

France expelled the NATO military command from French territory at a particularly dangerous time in the Cold War - they are most assuredly not regarded as a close NATO ally, despite their pro forma membership in the NATO political council. Over the past 30 years France has wasted very few opportunities to put her finger in our eye. Cicerone's story about the attitudes of some Frenchmen is repeated by numerous American tourists - indeed it is a common cliche.

I think the attitudes towards Russia can be explained by a combination of hope for a better future for and with them and respect for a former dangerous enemy.

As for Iran, you may recall that Iranian revolutionaries seized our embassy in 1979 and held our hostages for over a year. Many here have not forgotten that.

What is perhaps most remarkable in the rankings is the high regard for Canada indicated - despite eight years of insults, ingratitude, and no cooperation from them under the now departed Prime Minister.
 
 
 
Way to disparage an entire country at one shot. Has America become the average white guy? Has America become the world's whipping post?

ILZ, you obviously have a personal beef with America and Americans...what happened? Did we drop a bomb on your dog or something?
 

I am American. I'm just not blind to its problems, which are quite extensive.

Edit: Further, I would submit that it is dissenting voices, such as myself, that are the collective instigators of progressive change. On the other end of the spectrum are the conservatives who - like most people, in most times, in most places - are bound by an irrational blind faith in thier country.
 
 
 
France expelled the NATO military command from French territory at a particularly dangerous time in the Cold War - they are most assuredly not regarded as a close NATO ally
 

But Russia was the enemy in the Cold War! So if any grudges should remain from back then...

 
As for Iran, you may recall that Iranian revolutionaries seized our embassy in 1979 and held our hostages for over a year. Many here have not forgotten that.
 

But Saudi-Arabia was where most all of the perpetrators of the bloodiest and most shocking attack on the US in 60 years (if not ever) came from... and where most of the money that funded their Al-Qaeda bosses came from, too.

Not to mention that it's an absolute dictatorship and much more barbarian in terms of women's rights...

I mean, it's formally a geostrategic ally, if you look only at the government-level - but damn - does with-us-or-against-us really trump any measure of (what in terms of western values would be called) civilisation?

 
What is perhaps most remarkable in the rankings is the high regard for Canada indicated - despite eight years of insults, ingratitude, and no cooperation from them under the now departed Prime Minister.
 

From what I understand it's as peacable, safe, clean, free, democratic and tolerant a country as one can get... so I guess "civilisation" does sometimes trump with-us-or-against-us after all. Well, that's reassuring ;P
 
 
Nimh,

Do you think the corresponding results of polls in France, Germany, and Belgium would show ay similar anomolies with respect to democracy? We are after all a civilized, democratic country. "With us or against us" cuts two ways.

France is not a 'geostrategic' ally of the United States. At least few people here think that is true.
 
 
 
Nimh,

Do you think the corresponding results of polls in France, Germany, and Belgium would show ay similar anomolies with respect to democracy?
 

Oh yeah, absolutely.

And they would have me going, "can you believe that?!", too  
 
 
 
 
Way to disparage an entire country at one shot. Has America become the average white guy? Has America become the world's whipping post?

ILZ, you obviously have a personal beef with America and Americans...what happened? Did we drop a bomb on your dog or something?
 

I am American. I'm just not blind to its problems, which are quite extensive.

Edit: Further, I would submit that it is dissenting voices, such as myself, that are the collective instigators of progressive change. On the other end of the spectrum are the conservatives who - like most people, in most times, in most places - are bound by an irrational blind faith in thier country.
 

Being a dissenting voice is fine. We need checks and balances. Calling Americans, en masse, stupid, is not a voice of dissention. In my opinion, it only makes you look like one of those loonie liberals everyone speaks of. Way to be that stereotype...
 
 
 
Being a dissenting voice is fine. We need checks and balances. Calling Americans, en masse, stupid, is not a voice of dissention. In my opinion, it only makes you look like one of those loonie liberals everyone speaks of. Way to be that stereotype...
 

Depending on the criteria you use, it is a demonstrable fact that most Americans are "stupid." For one thing, when stacked up to the rest of the educated world, we routinely come in last. I suppose it is just another one of those pesky facts that get in the way of your blind patriotism - like our morally repulsive foriegn aid policies.

But all you conservatives shouldn't fret. Take comfort in the fact that you are not alone in your ignorance. It is the case in most ages, in most places, that most people are blinded by irrational faith in thier nation, while a small minority of progressive thinkers pushes slowly ahead.
 
 
George, Iran was pretty much justified in seixzing our embassy. they were rather upset about the coup in 1953 (engineered by the US) that toppled their deomcratically elected prime minister (Mossadegh) and gave the Shah absolute power. I don't blame them one little bit.
 
 
ILZ,

You no doubt place yourself in the vanguard of that "small minority of progressive thinkers".

Is it lonely up there? What brought you back here amidst the common, stupid folk?
 
 
 
Being a dissenting voice is fine. We need checks and balances. Calling Americans, en masse, stupid, is not a voice of dissention. In my opinion, it only makes you look like one of those loonie liberals everyone speaks of. Way to be that stereotype...
 

** Insert buzzing sound here **
Sorry, McG. Try again. ILZ was not calling Americans stupid "en masse".
Here's what he said:
I would submit that it is dissenting voices, such as myself, that are the collective instigators of progressive change. On the other end of the spectrum are the conservatives who - like most people, in most times, in most places - are bound by an irrational blind faith in thier country.

So (correct me if I'm wrong here, ILZ) he was talking about the types of people "at either end of the spectrum" when it comes to these things. On one side are those who look more critically at these things, then there are those who refuse to see anything past what blind nationalism will let them see.

Do me a favor and read what he wrote again, with the "hardcore conservative" glasses removed if you can. It makes sense, and is pretty damn close to the truth. If it weren't for dissenting voices, we'd still be following "seperate but equal" doctrines (although I am extending the point a bit to emphasis the basic theme).
 
 
 
So (correct me if I'm wrong here, ILZ) he was talking about the types of people "at either end of the spectrum" when it comes to these things. On one side are those who look more critically at these things, then there are those who refuse to see anything past what blind nationalism will let them see.
 

Bingo
 
 
 
ILZ,

What brought you back here amidst the common, stupid folk?
 

Yeah, I'm magnanimous with my intellect. Think of me as the internet equivalent of Robin Hood; spreading my riches to the intellectually poor and intuitively inept.

In all seriousness, if you have a problem with anything I say - either here or in in any other thread - I suggest you mount a decent retort instead of poking me with a stick and then running away. For example, see the foriegn aid thread.
 
 
 
But Russia was the enemy in the Cold War! So if any grudges should remain from back then...
 

We Americans always have this feeling towards former foes. There is something in the American character that loves to make friends with former enemies:
Great Britain (took two wars but we made them great friends)
Germany (again, took two wars but all we wanted to do was become friends)
Italy
Japan (became our friends after we defeated them)
Russia (after a long 'Cold War', once we became the victors, all we wanted to do was become their friends)

We love trying to make friends with our enemies, but God save us from our 'longtime friends'

georgeob1 mentioned about France kicking out the NATO command from France during the Cold War, but he didn't mention when France REALLY stuck a knife in NATO's back.

France had pledged a military commitment of 12 divisions to assist NATO in event of a Soviet invasion of the West and NATO war plans were drawn up around the assistance of those 12 divisions.
A division in western armies had, for 60+ years, been defined as a unit of 3 or more brigades consisting of a total of 12 to 15,000 men.
The French command, to avoid committing that many troops to NATO as they had promised, 're-defined' their 'division' to be ONE brigade of 4 to 5000 men. This is how they got around their treaty commitment.

As I said before, we love our former enemies, but God save us from our allies!
 
 
 
What is perhaps most remarkable in the rankings is the high regard for Canada indicated - despite eight years of insults, ingratitude, and no cooperation from them under the now departed Prime Minister.
 

I find this extremely amusing! Remember this the next time the US government threatens Canada with their consequences. That word "cooperate" is one word that I've grown to detest from all the years of hearing it when I lived there and from the government. It is not our duty to cooperate with the all mighty US of A! We are a peaceful country and we intend on keeping it that way, whether you like it or not.
 
 
Montana, George Bush lost "peach" for our country for the next generation, because he's created new enemies for the US of A that will not go away with a change in our administration this November.
 
 
I agree CI, but can you imagine how much worse it can get if he ends up in there for another term. Just the thought makes my skin crawl.
 
 
 
As I said before, we love our former enemies, but God save us from our allies!
 

That's exactly how I feel about our alliance with the US.
 
 
 
What is perhaps most remarkable in the rankings is the high regard for Canada indicated - despite eight years of insults, ingratitude, and no cooperation from them under the now departed Prime Minister.
 

Just what are you on about? I really don't think you know what you're talking about based on the statements you made that I first addressed in this thread. For one thing, the previous Prime Minister, Jean Chrétien, was leader of Canada for just over 10 years, not eight. The only insult I'd ever heard of was the one I mentioned in my earlier post. Ingratitude? Ingratitude for what!! Mind explaining that one? And the only "no cooperation" was the decision of Canada to not join in on the war on Iraq. It was an unjust war. While I feel for the military personnel and their families, I feel they were mislead by their president.

You keep referring to all of these negative aspects of the previous government in Canada, but you aren't backing it up with concrete examples so I have to wonder what it is you really know about the whole situation.
 
 
Yeah, what Caprice said!
 
 
Montana: *L*
 
 
McGentrix

 
In my opinion, it only makes you look like one of those loonie liberals everyone speaks of. Way to be that stereotype...
 

Do you not see that with the statement you just made about liberals you are doing the very thing you accused IronLionZion (long name) of doing and every other "liberal?"

What exactly does the terms liberal and conservative mean if we attach it to every thought or belief expressed under the sun? In American politics I thought it meant just that conservative believe that conserving money is better than spending money on programs and the term liberal meant that one who believes that you should spend money on programs. But now the meanings seems to have expanded beyond recongnition and no one can express an opinion without being put into a label that in effect dismisses that opinion as just "oh, he is just one of those loony liberals" or the other way around, rather than discussing the merits of the statement.

We "liberals" are just as guilty of that as you "conservatives."

I think it is a fair bet to say that our country is divided rather than united-I guess Bush didn't fulfill another one of his promises, he "flipflopped." He was for uniting the country then he divided it. Now he is even dividing the country even more by bringing up the "stupid" constitutional ban on same sex marriages in the middle of an election year just to distract the country on the miserable job he has done as president. Without getting into the issue, you have to admit if you were not thinking from your "conservative box" that just bringing up the issue is sure to cause division and the issue itself divides a group of people and forbids them from things that other people get to do for no other reason than just who they are. But I know, I am just a "liberal" so what I say does not amount to a hill of beans.

I know that clinton and a lot of other "liberals" believe that gays shouldn't be allowed to get married, so I guess that makes me an ultra liberal, oh! but wait, I am against abortion, so now I am not so liberal...
 
 
 
** Insert buzzing sound here **
Sorry, McG. Try again. ILZ was not calling Americans stupid "en masse".
Here's what he said:
I would submit that it is dissenting voices, such as myself, that are the collective instigators of progressive change. On the other end of the spectrum are the conservatives who - like most people, in most times, in most places - are bound by an irrational blind faith in thier country.

So (correct me if I'm wrong here, ILZ) he was talking about the types of people "at either end of the spectrum" when it comes to these things. On one side are those who look more critically at these things, then there are those who refuse to see anything past what blind nationalism will let them see.

Do me a favor and read what he wrote again, with the "hardcore conservative" glasses removed if you can.
 

Before you go around playing *Insert Buzzing noise here* you might want to remove your own rose-colored glasses and read the posts in the context they were written in instead of moving things around to meet your own agenda.

McG's post was referring to an earlier post from ILZ were ILZ said:

 
Nobody said Americans were bright. And anybody who did, somewhat paradoxically, wasn't very bright. I remember a National Geographic poll last year showing that less than 20% of Americans could even locate Iraq on a map - an this as we are waging war on them!
 

"Nobody said Americans were bright" sure looks like a comment that covers ALL Americans. Now were exactly in there was he referring to people "at either end of the spectrum" in there? Maybe you should put your glasses back on so you can find that somewhere...
 
 
What Fishin' said.
 
 
I don't think any of the North Americans here can point with too much pride to how smart we, or our countrymen, are...

 
"If our young people can't find places on a map and lack awareness of current events, how can they understand the world's cultural, economic and natural resource issues that confront us?" John Fahey, president of the National Geographic Society, said in a statement.

Among the survey's findings:

-Forty-seven per cent of the Canadians surveyed correctly answered a question about the size of the U.S. population. Only 25 per cent of the Americans gave the correct answer.

-Only about one in seven American students could find Iraq. The score was the same when students were asked to find Iran, an Iraqi neighbour. Only 17 per cent could find Afghanistan on a world map.

-On the world map, Americans could find on average only seven of 16 countries in the TAB Quiz. Only 89 per cent of the Americans surveyed could find their own country on the map.

-In the world map test, Swedes could find an average of 13 of the 16 countries. Germans and Italians were next, with an average of 12 each.

-Worldwide, three in 10 of those surveyed could not correctly locate the Pacific Ocean, the world's largest body of water.

-Thirty-four per cent of the young Americans knew that the island used on last season's Survivor show was located in the South Pacific, but only 30 per cent could locate the state of New Jersey on a map. The Survivor show's location was the Marquesas Islands in the eastern South Pacific.

The international survey was conducted for the National Geographic by RoperASW. The results are based on face-to-face interviews with at least 300 men and women aged 18 to 24 in Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, Mexico, Sweden, Britain and the United States.

The questionnaires were in the local language, but the content was universally the same.
 

 link 

I found this quite distressing when I first read about it. I'm not liking it any better now.
 
 
 the national geographic link 
 
 
Geography just isn't important anymore. I do agree that the results are distressing though.

It's too bad that the US has to spend so much money on defense because of people like Bin Laden and Hussein. It would be encouraging to spend a bit more on our education system. Maybe when peace reigns throughout the globe it will be possible.
 
 
I think that Geography is an important area of study, as do a lot of other people, (you'll see if you follow the link, that more students are taking it now than a decade ago). Context can make a lot of difference to our understanding to what is going on in the world. It's one of the reasons I enjoy reading, and talking to, Setanta. He's interested in almost everything - and can put things in context. What was going on when something else happened. Where were they, where were they going, who paid for it, what physical/financial/political/religious obstacles were there? That good old 'no man is an island' thing. No country is an island either - and we need to know who's near who (among other things).

Now, this is very digressive from the original question, but... I went to a fascinating concert a few years ago. It was a concert, and associated lecture, reflecting the music Marco Polo would have heard on his travels - and it gave me a whole different understanding of his trip. Its purpose, its meaning - and the effect on a number of cultures. As a result, I started re-reading the diaries of his travels, and that has given me a new perspective on what's happening in the middle east right now. What's happening now is not happening in isolation from the history and geography of the region.
 
 
 
It's too bad that the US has to spend so much money on defense because of people like Bin Laden and Hussein.
 

It's a shame we spent money on them when we shared mutual enemies...

And as far as that goes, I wouldn't place the blame squarely on the shoulders of the educational system. Most of our televised news does a poor job of contextualizing events, as well. Coverage of Iraq, for example, devotes some time to explaining what's happening where within the country, but I've seen next to nothing to put it in a larger geographical and historical context. Really, how useful is today's footage of American troops standing around when they've been showing similar footage every day for months. How about bringing in a historian to look at the resources available to the country, their trading patterns historically and presently, events in neighboring nations, how modernization has impacted Iraqi culture -- for that matter, what are the Iraqi cultures? We hear a lot about "the Kurds," but we never see much of them or their culture. It's realluy very uninformative. All we get a sense of is how our military action is proceeding, completely decontexualized, as though it were a video game.
 
 
I got all the sample questions correct. I am even more concerned now that I have seen some of the questions. I do have to note two things:

1. Whatever they are doing in Sweden really needs to be studied and exported.
2. More Americans knew where the Pacific Ocean was than did the Swedes.  
 
 
Must resist... cannot allow American pride to overwhelm brain... no Fedral, don't do it!... can't fight it anymore!

Yes! Only 25% of our young people can find places like Iraq on a map. (I weep for the future too.) But 99.982% of our smart munitions can find those places and blow up enemy targets there. Even if our youth can't point to those locations, our weapons are smart enough to find them on their own.

Whew! Sorry just had a bad moment there channeling Curtis LeMay.
 
 
and thus the joke from the first iraq war: "our smart weapons are to valuable to use. from now on, we're going to drop american high school students on our targets."
 
 
 
Before you go around playing *Insert Buzzing noise here* you might want to remove your own rose-colored glasses and read the posts in the context they were written in instead of moving things around to meet your own agenda.

Nobody said Americans were bright" sure looks like a comment that covers ALL Americans. Now were exactly in there was he referring to people "at either end of the spectrum" in there? Maybe you should put your glasses back on so you can find that somewhere...
 

No, "nobody said Americans were bright", in the context of the statistics I was discussing, was a jab at the American worldview. Depending on how loose the criteria you use is, Americans as a whole really aren' that bright. For example, we routinely come last in measurements of educated nations. Again, THIS IS A FACT, not a mere opinion. Are you going to dispute the truth of my statement, or continue to skirt around the issue?
 
 
 
Must resist... cannot allow American pride to overwhelm brain... no Fedral, don't do it!... can't fight it anymore!

Yes! Only 25% of our young people can find places like Iraq on a map. (I weep for the future too.) But 99.982% of our smart munitions can find those places and blow up enemy targets there. Even if our youth can't point to those locations, our weapons are smart enough to find them on their own.

Whew! Sorry just had a bad moment there channeling Curtis LeMay.
 

Heh. That was actually quite funny. I am tempted to put it in my signature.
 
 
 
Are you going to dispute the truth of my statement, or continue to skirt around the issue?
 

My comment wasn't directed to you nor do I owe you a damn thing.
 
 
 
Geography just isn't important anymore.
 

What planet are you living on??????
 
 
 
Must resist... cannot allow American pride to overwhelm brain... no Fedral, don't do it!... can't fight it anymore!

Yes! Only 25% of our young people can find places like Iraq on a map. (I weep for the future too.) But 99.982% of our smart munitions can find those places and blow up enemy targets there. Even if our youth can't point to those locations, our weapons are smart enough to find them on their own.

Whew! Sorry just had a bad moment there channeling Curtis LeMay.
 

Read this and you may feel differently about American military weapons. It was a story 60 Minutes did this past Sunday.

 The Patriot Flawed? 
 
 
 
1. Whatever they are doing in Sweden really needs to be studied and exported.
2. More Americans knew where the Pacific Ocean was than did the Swedes.  
 

1. They likely devote more money per student than what governments here do. (And I include both American and Canadian governments in this.)

2. Not knowing where the Pacific Ocean is reflects sadly on anyone. But I would hope if it was only between the Americans and Swedes that the Americans would know because

a.) one of the 50 states is located in the Pacific Ocean
b.) there are several American military posts on islands located in the Pacific Ocean

and

c.) there is a lot of American history located in this part of the world
 
 
...and as to why some folks outside the US get pissed off at the US...

How about this? The mayor of the little town you live in comes a'knockin at your door. He talks about his long-standing friendship and respect, and he's hoping you'll help him out with this...idea...he has, and he's really hoping you will because nobody else on your street is behind his idea. And you tell him you want to phone your wife and your dad and talk to them about it. Then you offer to make him some coffee, and you return to find he's now bugging your phone.

 
 

 http://www.nytimes.com/2004/02/26/international/europe/26BRIT.html 

 
British spies were bugging UN Secretary General Kofi Annan's office in the run up to the Iraq war, former UK cabinet minister Clare Short has claimed.
 
 http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/politics/3488548.stm 
 
 
 
 
1. Whatever they are doing in Sweden really needs to be studied and exported.
2. More Americans knew where the Pacific Ocean was than did the Swedes.  
 

1. They likely devote more money per student than what governments here do. (And I include both American and Canadian governments in this.)

2. Not knowing where the Pacific Ocean is reflects sadly on anyone. But I would hope if it was only between the Americans and Swedes that the Americans would know because

a.) one of the 50 states is located in the Pacific Ocean
b.) there are several American military posts on islands located in the Pacific Ocean

and

c.) there is a lot of American history located in this part of the world
 

1. I believe that whatever is being done in Sweden is working because:

2. Knowing where the Pacific Ocean is, was the ONLY question out of 20 that the US scored higher on than Sweden. Thus I was making a joke.
 
 
Blatham,

Are you suggesting that we are the sole, original, or even the most aggressive, practicioner of such intelligence collection activities? History does not support that view.

Caprice,

Complex weapons systems often do have flaws, or, as is more likely in the incidents reported in the 60 minutes piece you cited, lend themselves more readily than foreseen to human errors. I can even recall an event in which a Canadian naval vessel collided with a U,S, ship - imagine that! The event took place in the Pacific, but it never occurred to me to suspect that a deficient knowledge of geography on the part of the Canadian captain was the cause. Perhaps they were spies.

I repeat an earlier question I posed here. Why are some Canadians so agitated about the many flaws of the United States? Cause and effect seem far out of proportion, and the complaints either insubstantial or vague and far reaching. Have you reached a state of such perfection that all this really matters so much? Are there no windmills in Canada for you to tilt?
 
 
Maybe someone on this thread can help me with this:

Why didn't Osama attack Europe (Germany, UK, France,..) or China or Australia or Japan or India or..?
 
 
 
Blatham,

Are you suggesting that we are the sole, original, or even the most aggressive, practicioner of such intelligence collection activities? History does not support that view.
 

george

For gods sake man. Take some fukking responsibility for your nation's ugly behaviors.

You know of some other government that
1) ran a PR campaign designed to place the UN in disrepute while
2) bugging the offices of the the SG and numerous other member nations
3) in order to appease domestic and world opinion while lying to all
4) about already formulated plans to launch a preemptive war?

List such states in your reply, please. I understand this will be a lengthy list, but try to get back to me soon.

You offer up (again) justification at a playground level of ethics, george.
 
 
 
I repeat an earlier question I posed here. Why are some Canadians so agitated about the many flaws of the United States? Cause and effect seem far out of proportion, and the complaints either insubstantial or vague and far reaching. Have you reached a state of such perfection that all this really matters so much? Are there no windmills in Canada for you to tilt?
 

And you know the answer to this already. The consequences of US activity in the world are of a dimension which is not comparable to Canadian activity, or to that of anyone else. The more you guys screw up, the more the world gets screwed up. And the less often, or the less honestly, you confront how you fuk up ethically, the more everyone else is going to distrust you, dislike you, or target you.
 
 
Blatham,

Relax. You even missed the delicious irony in my last post.

I'm not willing to accept as true all the overtones and several of the important assumptions and implications in the sequence you described, (it was a tad judgemental) though there may well be a core of truth to it.

Equivalent events have happened innumerable times in history, and I think you know that.

If I am "in a playground level of ethics", then you are in a fantasy land, not inhabited by real humans, even Canadian ones.

What's with you Canadians anyway?
 
 
 
And you know the answer to this already. The consequences of US activity in the world are of a dimension which is not comparable to Canadian activity, or to that of anyone else. The more you guys screw up, the more the world gets screwed up. And the less often, or the less honestly, you confront how you fuk up ethically, the more everyone else is going to distrust you, dislike you, or target you.
 

Does that mean you are applying a standard to us that you don't apply to yourselves or to other nations? - It seems that way.

And you already know the answer to your own questionable proposition, There have been many other periods in human history in which other powers have equivalently dominated events in major parts of the world. They provide us the only basis we have for evaluating and comparing the actions of great powers. Do you suggest that we are doing badly compared to other real and analogous situations in the history of the world? There certainly is no evidence to support that thesis.

In about 1880 the British occupied the Suez area on the pretext of securing the investment of some Englishmen in the canal stock. They stayed for 70 years, barely tolerating the fiction of Egyptian independence, and fostering some of the hatred and resentment that confronts the world today. More than a little duplicity and spying was involved in this caper enabling the British to out fox both the French and the Egyptians. A similar story - and with similar bad results - could be told about the creation of the French empire in North Africa, The only reason these countries are not doing the same today is that they no longer have the ability to do so. They squandered that potential in an idiotic European war that began in 1914 and didn't end its final chapter until 1945.
 
 
 
Maybe someone on this thread can help me with this:

Why didn't Osama attack Europe (Germany, UK, France,..) or China or Australia or Japan or India or..?
 

relative

That's a question which may, possibly, be sincerely raised in certain quarters within the US State Department, or the intelligence community, or the military community, or even the administration...but I bet it is bloody rarely asked.

For certain, it wasn't allowed to be raised shortly after 9-11. As Didion has pointed out, there was a too brief period immediately following the attack when American discourse opened up that widely, here and there. But very quickly, the hammer came down on those who were suggesting that American just might have some small responsibility in all this. University's were targeted, profs fired, writers were targeted, anyone who voiced such a possiblity was slammed as 'traitor'. Traitor here means something like 'counter revolutionary'. Or satanic - held under the sway of evil delusion.

This is such a frustrating god damn argument to make to george, or many others like george. Their assumption is what? The US is never guilty of any act deserving of public chastisement? No one except an American might presume to chastise? (of course, they get slammed too). The US will be damaged if people speak this way...that the US is so at risk from enemies external/internal, or so fragile, that it cannot bear such open commentary?
 
 
george

(this is fun)

I'm a tellin ya...it is precisely this refusal you demonstrate to acknowledge instances where America has gone off the rails (behaved far less honorably than it's rhetoric, promises, and mythololgies suggest it behaves) that your nation gains much of the disdain which people hold, in and out of your country.

It seems that admission of fault (in any other form than the cursory and general tip of the hat you give to 'everybody does it') is too tough for you to achieve. The thing is, in an individual, we all HATE such blindness, and we recognize it is a weakness, not a strength.
 
 
McG before geography test

 
Geography just isn't important anymore.
 

McG after geography test

 
I got all the sample questions correct. I am even more concerned now that I have seen some of the questions. I do have to note two things:

1. Whatever they are doing in Sweden really needs to be studied and exported.
2. More Americans knew where the Pacific Ocean was than did the Swedes.
 

Sorry McG couldn't resist. You beat me anyway, I though there were more Muslims in the world than Christians. In this I am of course correct and the National Geographic wrong. (by my definition of Christian :wink: )
 
 
Blatham,

It is fun.

I agree with most of your last post - not all, but more than I usually do.

The United States has and continues to make many mistakes in both its international and national policies, Instances of greed and self aggrandisement in the motivatins of our politicians and of various interest groups here are all too common. We are moreover, in our popular attitudes, too often shortsighted and in the grip of a very superficial information stream disseminated so effectively by our media. We are very conscious of the (very real) contributions of our democracy to the world, but far too often patronizing and overbearing about it. We are sometimes insensitive to the perceptions of others.

OK. Does that do it for you?

It is a fault that, in responding to the many criticisms directed at the United States, I and others here fail to explicitly acknowledge the failings of our government and our society.

However, it is also a fault that our innumerable critics also fail to acknowledge either their own imperfections, or a realistic comparative standard for the behavior of great powers. I find this to be hypocritical and intellectually bankrupt. It also involves a good deal of insensitivity to the perceptions of Americans - a fault these practicioners usually level at us.
 
 
You gotta learn how to take it George. We had to when Britannia ruled the waves.
 
 
What kind of "ese" are you?
***********************
An American and a Japanese were sitting on the plane on the
way to LA when the American turned to the Japanese and asked,
"What kind of 'ese' are you?"
The Japanese confused, replied, "Sorry, but I don't understand
what you mean."

The American repeated, "What kind of 'ese' are you?"

Again, the Japanese was confused over the question.

The American, now irritated, loudly repeated, "Jeez, how tough is
this -- what kind of 'ESE' are you? Are you ChinESE or JapanESE
or VietnamESE?

The Japanese gentleman replied, "Oh, I see what you mean. I'm
Japanese."

"Well, OK, now we're getting somewhere," the American said.

A little while later, the Japanese man asked, "Excuse me, but what
kind of 'key' are you?"

"What? What the hell do you mean?" the irritated American
answered.

"You know, a monKEY or a donKEY or just a typical YanKEE?"
 
 
Yeah, I agree, it's all part of the territory.
 
 
good one ci

remind me about your san fransisco a2k meeting.

Interesting discussion on the radio this morning. British MP made tasteless joke about Chinese. Most people thought she went too far, but others said hey its only a joke. Then someone said ok make jokes about dead Chinese when you can take jokes about dead Brits in the London blitz. Silence.
 
 
Steve, The San Francisco A2K Gathering is being held on April 9 to 12 - with some folks coming earlier and some leaving later. We have about one dozen "officially" confirmed yesses - so far.
 
 
 
However, it is also a fault that our innumerable critics also fail to acknowledge either their own imperfections, or a realistic comparative standard for the behavior of great powers. I find this to be hypocritical and intellectually bankrupt. It also involves a good deal of insensitivity to the perceptions of Americans - a fault these practicioners usually level at us.
 

Goll dang it...progress.

I understand the insensitivity charge, and recognize my probable guilt here. But it is often very difficult to make certain arguments without sounding that way. The fact is, I am very sincere when I say I truly like Americans. For example, I've found folks in the south, much to my dismay, far more friendly and hospitable than they are in my home city of Vancouver. Further, as I've said elsewhere, what America has wrought, in science, the arts, in philosophy, in letters, in engineering, in political theory over the last two hundred years will, if we survive, properly be seen as a Golden Age. The best of America is amongst the best that humans have achieved. That is my sincere opinion.

So, what is one to do when one perceives contemporary Savonarolas gaining power and esteem in your land? Or when one sees the sort of bullying behavior at the UN over Iraq which, so many of us could see, would make enemies for you, when it was unnecessary? Or when one reads that, after all these years, the people of Bophal have received not a penny? It's hair-pulling-out stuff.

The hope for the world - that tradition of rights and liberties, of the sanctity of life and person, of the principles of equality, of the unfettered thought and open inquiry - all those invaluable goods that have been bequeathed, rest in America moreso than anywhere else.
 
 
blatham, We are able to criticize our own president and administration pretty handily. A year ago at GWBush's SOU address, he promised Africa $15 billion to fight HIV/AIDs. His promises mean very little to those of us that have followed this president's rhetoric and what he actually does. At the home front, his "Leave no child behind" is a fedreal mandate which is based on testing, and without the funding. It's also a big lie and failure to our own people, but many repubs think Bush is a good president none-the-less. How do we fight such ignorance and apathy? We are building schools in Iraq, while we close schools here in the US. To have economic and political strength in the US, our schools must be number one for our children. This president is failing that charge.
 
 
Blatham,

Thank you for the acknowledgments. We don't really need to have our backs or other parts patted as a softener for deserved criticism. It is a tough, competitive world, and complaints & criticism do come with the territory.

I do however make a distinction between rhetoric aimed at achieving some specific outcome, and a discussion in which the participants are (presumably) engaged in a mutual pursuit of the truth and right understanding. Rhetorical devices that are permissable in the former become distracting falsehoods in the latter. Unqualified assertions about national obsessions or vices, unbalanced by any notion of what is reasonably achievable in the world, what has been achieved (and not achieved) by those gone before, and those which also exist in the home of the critic, are not positive contributions to the achievment of right understanding. They are distractions that take us farther from the truth.

Steve has rightly suggested that we "gotta learn to take it" as did Britannia when she ruled the waves. I agree, and believe that overall we do that fairly well. There appear to be a greater number of Americans on these threads who accept and sometimes amplify these criticisms, than those like me who object. Still improvements can be made. One would also hope that the historical experience to which Steve has referred would have given him a greater understanding of this point than he has exhibited in these and other threads.
 
 
 
... Thus I was making a joke.
 

You were? Well I guess if it was a good one (like c.i.'s joke) I woulda laughed!  
 
 
 
 
... Thus I was making a joke.
 

You were? Well I guess if it was a good one (like c.i.'s joke) I woulda laughed!  
 

 
 
 
 
So, what is one to do when one perceives contemporary Savonarolas gaining power and esteem in your land? Or when one sees the sort of bullying behavior at the UN over Iraq which, so many of us could see, would make enemies for you, when it was unnecessary? Or when one reads that, after all these years, the people of Bophal have received not a penny? It's hair-pulling-out stuff.

 

I accept and sympathise with your dilemma here. There are multiple aspects of each of the issues you have raised.

For example a UN that appoints Lybia and Cuba to its council on human rights sets an upper limit on the degree to which it can be taken seriously by serious people dealing with serious problems. The problem of balancing responsibility and popular sentiment is one that has beset thinkers about democracy for many years. The historical lesson appears to be that to sustain responsible government in a democratic form requires a degree of political and social development - levels that certainly have not been attained by a great number of nations in the UN.

While U.S. behavior towards the UN can truthfully be described as bullying, it is also true that the behavior of the French, Russian and German opposition to our actions cannot be truthfully described as friendly and constructive - or (in the cases of Russia and France) free of unstated selfish motives.

The problem of leading effectively while maintaining the affections of those being led is a very perplexing one indeed. I have some fairly substantial experience with it. I have learned this much : if a leader pursues the affections of his tribe as a primary objective, he will certainly fail as a leader, and will likely lose the affections he seeks. If, instead he pursues success and effective leadership as the primary objective, he may also enjoy the general affection of those led, but that is at best a bonus.
 
 
 
Caprice,

Complex weapons systems often do have flaws, or, as is more likely in the incidents reported in the 60 minutes piece you cited, lend themselves more readily than foreseen to human errors.
 

You couldn't have read the entire article because it states right in it that "the Patriot isn't like most weapons systems: it's almost completely automatic." The non-automatic part being the ability of human operators to override the system, but even then, they have mere seconds to do so. I also know you didn't see the piece on television because the crux of the matter is that the military knows they have a weapon which is defective and yet they continue to use it despite the tragic outcomes that should never occur. The military cites skewed statistics on the Patriot. They continue to spend money on a weapon that should never have been kept in use once the knowledge of its real potential (or rather lack thereof) was known. Even after knowing there was a definite problem with the Patriot, it was still used in combat in the war in Iraq which directly caused the unnecessary death of an American pilot.

All I can say is that I'm glad I am not currently an American taxpayer.

 
This year alone, the Pentagon will spend more than a billion dollars on the Patriot program. And Raytheon is selling more and more Patriots to countries in Asia, the Middle East, and Europe.
 

(Above quote from the 60 Minutes web site.)

 
I repeat an earlier question I posed here. Why are some Canadians so agitated about the many flaws of the United States? Cause and effect seem far out of proportion, and the complaints either insubstantial or vague and far reaching. Have you reached a state of such perfection that all this really matters so much? Are there no windmills in Canada for you to tilt?
 

Cause and effect seem far out of proportion? Complaints are insubstational or vague? Says who? You? And just exactly what are you talking about anyway? It's almost pointless asking you a question because you never respond anyhow.
 
 
 
[
All I can say is that I'm glad I am not currently an American taxpayer.

...Cause and effect seem far out of proportion? Complaints are insubstational or vague? Says who? You? And just exactly what are you talking about anyway? It's almost pointless asking you a question because you never respond anyhow.
 

1. Me too.

2. Says me. Have you asked me any questions that I have failed to answer, or at least attempt to?

3. I think your knowledge of surface and air - to - air weapons systems is probably not very great. No shame there. I spent a fair amount of time in the business, and am confident I know what I am talking about vis a vis Patriot. Almost all the weapons systems in use, even the most successful, have known defects. Nothing remarkable there - unless you are a producer for 60 minutes and need to get a show out.
 
 
 
One would also hope that the historical experience to which Steve has referred would have given him a greater understanding of this point than he has exhibited in these and other threads.
 

Wooo I am chastised. Totally unjustifiably of course.
 
 
Of course.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Read this and you may feel differently about American military weapons. It was a story 60 Minutes did this past Sunday.

 The Patriot Flawed? 
 

The fact that the story contained in the link claimed that the patriot had been originally been built 40 years ago (which was completely incorrect) and that they were quoting some facts from the original Patriot program (deployed in the First Gulf War) NOT the information about the CURRENT Patriot program (The PAC-3 system) leads me to take your source with a grain of salt.

But even if we take it all as gospel, the fact must be understood that the Patriot did EXACTLY what it had been designed to do, which is, shoot down airplanes. The Patriot (Past and current) was NOT originally designed to shoot down incoming tactical ballistic missiles, it was designed to provide medium to high altitude intercepts of high speed, high performance jet aircraft. In this task, it works magnificently. It has the ability to 'sanitize' the airspace it 'controls' and it was only when the software was 'fiddled with' to provide SOME anti ballistic missile protection, that people started to look at it as an ABM system that happened to knock down aircraft.

Please keep in mind that when you use a tool outside it's intended purpose, or try to alter a tool to do a job it was not designed to do, there can and will be 'unexpected consequences'.

The consequence of 'tuning' an air defense radar's software package fine enough to provide intercept solutions for an incoming ballistic target will result in lots of spurious targets. And that can lead to accidents like the ones described.

Just my 2 cents (pre tax)
 
 
 
The fact that the story contained in the link claimed that the patriot had been originally been built 40 years ago (which was completely incorrect) [...]
 

 PATRIOT 
 
 
First of all to quote the site linked:

May 67 The Secretary of Defense selected Raytheon's Missile Systems Division as the prime contractor for the SAM-D project. He also decided that the system would enter an Advanced Development period to demonstrate its functionally unique features, while minimizing the financial risks of full-scale Engineering Development.

November 69 First launch of the SAM-D missile

Missiles are built AFTER award and before launch so the date of the original 'D' build would be somewhere around 1968.

1968 + 40 years = 2008 (current date is 2004 for those of you in hibernation)

Second, the first actual Patriot missiles were not delivered to the Army until December of 1981.

Third, the current Patriot that is fielded (The PAC-3) was a completely different missile than the original or the upgraded PAC-2 and was not selected until 1994 and didn't even enter production until 1995.

The mistake the writer made is he mistakes a military system with II or III with an earlier system bearing the same name.
 
 
 
1968 + 40 years = 2008 (current date is 2004 for those of you in hibernation)

 

I really don't want to pick on words, but the original cbs-link said

 
The Patriot was originally built nearly 40 years ago
 
:wink:
 
 
My mistake, but the facts stand, speaking of the original Patriot when the current missile they are fielding is a completely different missile with the same moniker but approximately 25+ years difference is like comparing the:

Thunderbolt
 http://www.wpafb.af.mil/museum/research/p47.htm 

with the:

Thunderbolt II
 http://www.af.mil/factsheets/factsheet.asp?fsID=70 

The military likes to keep names for simplicity sake, but one must be sure of WHICH system one is discussing before speaking.
 
 
Fedral: As Walter said, not meaning to be nit-picky, but you didn't really read the entire paragraph. If you had, you would have realized you took the entire thing out of context.

 
The Patriot was originally built nearly 40 years ago to shoot down aircraft. But just before the 1991 Gulf War, its manufacturer, Raytheon, modified the Patriot to shoot down tactical ballistic missiles.
 

The idea they are conveying is that at its original inception nearly 40 years ago, it was made to shoot down aircraft. Then, just before the Gulf War, it received a modification to target missiles.

The crux of the story on 60 Minutes tells the viewer that the Patriot system is more flawed than the military is willing to admit and they knew about these flaws for years before they ever attempted to remove them. And even today the Patriot is not the type of weapon it is purported to be. They are spotlighting an obvious failure in the system that the taxpayer should know about since it is their money that is being used to continue building a system that is flawed beyond a tolerable measure.

Your initial post on this slams the reporters at 60 Minutes as being fairly free with the truth. Now I have little respect for the news media in general, but I think the people at 60 Minutes are credible. They have been doing what they do for well over 30 years. If they were as careless with the truth as your post implied, they wouldn't be on the air.
 
 
Didn't we also hear that the Patriot missile also did more harm than good? That the success rate of the Patriot missile was less than 50 percent?
 
 
Here's a link on the Patriot missile during the Gulf War. My less than 50 percent success rate was close. In Israel, they estimated a 40 percent success rate.  http://www.cdi.org/issues/bmd/Patriot.html 
 
 
 
Have you asked me any questions that I have failed to answer, or at least attempt to?
 

Yes. See the following.

You quoted recent figures, but are they improved over figures prior to NAFTA?

You make it sound as though it is more advantageous for Canadians than it is for Americans. How is having an open border more advantageous to one country over the other?

So...are you saying you expected the Canadian customs officers to let you travel back and forth between Canada and the U.S.A. without any interference?

 Click here to see initial post which you either didn't see or ignored entirely. 
 
 
 
Here's a link on the Patriot missile during the Gulf War. My less than 50 percent success rate was close. In Israel, they estimated a 40 percent success rate.  http://www.cdi.org/issues/bmd/Patriot.html 
 

And again, you are quoting figures for the ORIGINAL Patriot missile NOT the PAC-3 missile that is fielded today.

PLEASE understand that the current incarnation of the Patriot is completely different from the version that was fielded during the First Gulf War (Desert Shield/Storm)
 
 
Fedral, Since I have not kept up on the news on the Patriot missile since the first Gulf War, my thinking on this subject is not current. I only remember Russia making a claim recently that the have developed some form of star wars that can shoot down missiles.
 
 
So then....what are its present statistics? Are they much improved?

 
And the military has since confirmed news reports that Patriots with simulated missiles had problems with "friendly firein exercises in 1997, 2000, and 2002" -- including one instance when a Patriot with simulated missiles would have, if its missiles had been real, "shot down an entire four-ship formation of F-16's."
 

And what of Navy Pilot Lt. Nathan White? Certainly his death supports the claims made in the 60 Minutes story.
 
 
 
And what of Navy Pilot Lt. Nathan White? Certainly his death supports the claims made in the 60 Minutes story.
 

His death proves what I stated in my earlier post:

1) The Patriot is brutally effective at its original purpose (Destroying aircraft in it's airspace control zone)

2) Messing with the control software of an air defense radar to enable it to plot intercepts on ballistic targets can have some unpleasant and unintended consequences.
 
 
 
So then....what are its present statistics? Are they much improved?
 

Here is a link to some info about the Patriot. It is a bit behind the actual deployed versions but it can give you a little idea about the differences between the different versions of the missile. I am still looking on my comp for the better link I have on the Pat PAC-3 and will post it as soon as I can.

 http://www.fas.org/spp/starwars/program/patriot.htm 
 
 
 
 
And what of Navy Pilot Lt. Nathan White? Certainly his death supports the claims made in the 60 Minutes story.
 

His death proves what I stated in my earlier post:

1) The Patriot is brutally effective at its original purpose (Destroying aircraft in it's airspace control zone)

2) Messing with the control software of an air defense radar to enable it to plot intercepts on ballistic targets can have some unpleasant and unintended consequences.
 

You sound as though you support the Patriot. I hope this is not the case.
 
 
 
You sound as though you support the Patriot. I hope this is not the case.
 

I support the PAC-3 version of the Patriot as it provides protection against aircraft to the troops in the field.

What I never supported was trying to turn the Patriot into something it was never designed to do, namely some sort of half-assed anti ballistic missile system.

When I was in the Army, I was a crewman on a Pershing II missile (A medium ranged tactical nuclear ballistic missile system that was eliminated by the 1987 INF Treaty.) so I understand the capabilities of ballistic missiles and just how hard it is to try and intercept them.

The Patriot works brilliantly at it's original task, shooting down aircraft. The PAC-3 version is faster, more maneuverable and even MORE capable at doing that job. The problems with the Patriot only began when they started messing with the radar/intercept code.

I support the Patriot because of its mission and capabilities, I just think they should have let it just do it's original mission and not screwed around with it beyond that.
 
 
 
27 February 2004

BERLIN - The United States-led war against Iraq has fueled reservations among the Germans over the US, a poll showed Friday.

Over 70 percent of those surveyed said hardly any other nation pushed its interests with so little consideration for others and as much egoism as the US, said the Allensbach Institute poll.

Half of the 2,105 Germans polled said the US could not be relied upon given its rising number of domestic problems.

Nevertheless, some 90 percent said were in favour of good relations with Washington but some two-thirds of those polled worried that greater cooperation with the US would make Germany a terrorist target.

Release of the poll came during a trip by German Chancellor Gerhard Schroeder to the United States where he is meeting US President George W. Bush.

The poll also found declining support for the European Union with 56 percent calling for policy-making to be more nationally dominated.
 
source: [Allensbach poll]  Expatica 
 
 
That last sentence is the most revealing of your post, Walter. I bet other country's citizens are thinking and feeling the same.
 
 
To a large extent the current distemper of the Moslem World is a result of a several centuries old divergence of its fortunes relative to the European West. The major part of their historical greivances are tracable to the colonial era and the predatory behavior of the European powers before, during, and after the breakup of the Ottoman Empire. Certainly many actions of the United States and others as well have done their part to sustain these ill feelings.

While I do believe that Germany can justifiably construct a case to escape a good part of the historical blame for this situation, Russia, France and the UK certainly cannot. To lie low now in the hope that the retribution will fall only on the United States can hardly be called cooperative and considerate behavior on the part of these countries. It is a great stretch for them now to attempt to absolve themselves.
 
 
Congratulations for finally making sense georgeob.
 
 
Thank you. (Sincerely) Though I at least believe I have done it once or twice before.
 
 
At least twice, George.
 
 
Yes, he did. It was twice. Unfortunately, the second instance contradicted the first.
 
 
Good one!   Actually it was three times - the third introduced an entirely new formulation.
 
 
But that was discounted as bunk, and on it goes.    
 
 
Can't get an even break from these critical Canadians. :wink:
 
 
Just caught up on several days' worth of this.

Many good points and the usual good-natured banter between political wings.

Just what I come here for!

KP
 
 
George wrote
"While I do believe that Germany can justifiably construct a case to escape a good part of the historical blame for this situation, Russia, France and the UK certainly cannot. To lie low now in the hope that the retribution will fall only on the United States can hardly be called cooperative and considerate behavior on the part of these countries. It is a great stretch for them now to attempt to absolve themselves."

Forgive me if my memory is defective, but I seem to remember Britain fighting shoulder to shoulder with the Americans in Afghanistan and more recently in Iraq. You Americans are past masters at really pissing people off. Blair's mistake was to have faith in the competency of American leadership. If the war had gone well, we would not be in this mess. And if the Americans had listened to people who know Iraq better than they do, i.e. us the Brits, we invented the damn place after all, it might have gone better than it has. But no this was going to be Invasion-Lite, all the flavour and none of that tiresome nation building.
 
 
and I'm sorry if I sound annoyed. Thats because I am.
 
 
It's sort of like Baskin-Robbins, 31 different reasons why we attacked Iraq.
 
 
but couldn't come up with 'one' not to go to war..........
 
 
 
 
 
nimh

Interesting progression of stats but a key question: in which country/countries was this conducted?

KP
 
 
America
 
 
Steve,

I did not mean to imply that the UK is attempting to escape its responsibility. On the contrary, as you have correctly pointed out, the UK has defied many strong pressures, both internal and external, to take what I view as a principled stand on these matters. It is indeed true that the USA has no better friend or ally in the world than the UK. This is a distinction I failed to make in my post above, and I apologise for that.

Instead it is the French and the Russian in particular who, with truly grotesque hypocricy are atempting to have it both ways in a cynical attempt to escape the anger which they helped create, and exploit a dangerous situation for their own gain in defiance of their obligations to their long-standing (and in the case of Russia) short term allies and friends.
 
 
Thanks George, I appreciate that.

As you know I have been at times very critical of American actions in Iraq. And I still flip one way and the other as to whether we should have supported it. Sometimes I think absolutely not, the price (for UK) was too high. Then I think well actually we did do the right thing, the world is a better place without Saddam and his Ba'athists ruling/terrorising Iraq.

To be honest I just don't know. It will take many years before we can come to a conclusion. In the meantime I think about how we were told that Saddam's weapons of mass destruction were a "serious and current" threat to the uk, how little old ladies bought up stocks of water and tinned food, how we were deliberately frightened into voting for war, and I think, that Mr Blair, was wrong.
 
 
Most of the important decisions we make in our own lives are made without sufficient information to provide certainty that they are correct. The same is true of political leaders. What is often more important are the principals that guide those decisions and the different values they assign to errors in one direction and another.

It was the obstructionism of the UN that reduced the debate on Iraq to the WMD question. Bush made a choice that seeking UN approval was worth the candle - the price for it was reducing the fundamental and complex arguments for unseating Saddam to the relatively trivial and risky matter of WMD. We now know the consequences of that decision. The UN effort was NOT worth the cost, and the UN - even the Security Council - cannot be relied on to face difficult issues. However, we should have already known that. An organization that cannot find a way to criticize Zimbabwe or deny Lybia and Cuba membership on its Human Rights Council, cannot be relied on to squarely face serious issues.
 
 
Well, they hate us in the Middle East because we buy oil from their kings and make their kings filthy rotten rich who abandon Islam ( for themselves ) and impose it on everyone else. Islam is poverty, for the most part. But the palaces and the armies and the power do not speak much about Islam. Our corporations continue to buy the oil and the kings continue to keep the fantastic wealth to themselves, and thus keeping the general populations down and powerless.

This is an old problem on this planet, and examples go back to Egypt and beyond. The elite priesthood, the semi-divine pharaoh, the Sun King, the monarchy, it all stems from this same lack of sharing of wealth through private control of resources and energy, etc. American business where no moral considerations are necessary plays right into this ancient problem. We'll send you a fortune, and we don't care if you kill your people, so long as the oil continues to flow...

Christiantity was supposed to stop all this disdain over profits and resources, but it didn't, obviously. Capitalism still has no heart, and it's all over the planet now. Way too late to do anything about it because capitalism itself refuses even tiny steps forward, and is always seeking to turn back the clock to even less obligations and restrictions while doing business. In other words, we's losin' the war, period.

The terrorists are fighting for their freedom against their kings made rich and decadent by OUR businessmen. This is fundamental to understanding why we are hated so. We are not free of guilt here for the problems breaking out all over the planet. We are in fact, very guilty for being so damn non-Christian like we claim to be. Our businessmen are NOT Christians in the way they do business, so what's not to hate?

Also, Rome was universally hated and despised for the obvious reasons. Haiti should at least put a bug in your ear that Bush might be empire building like any good emperor would. The more people you mow over, the more the hatred for you spreads far beyond your new manicured "lawn".
 
 
 
It was the obstructionism of the UN that reduced the debate on Iraq to the WMD question. Bush made a choice that seeking UN approval was worth the candle - the price for it was reducing the fundamental and complex arguments for unseating Saddam to the relatively treivial and risky matter of WMD. We now know the consequences of that decision.
 

What?

Please explain.

It was George Bush who reduced the argument to WMD, because he thought it was the only way to secure international approval for his bogus invasion.

It was not only the UN that opposed waging war on Iraq - it was almost all of our allies and every other nation on Earth.

Face the facts: The rest of the world knew long ago that the invasion of Iraq was a farce. It was mostly only right-wing Americans - one political group in one country - that supported the war. And, as I have pointed out before, their support was based on utter ignorance - 79% believed there was a direct link between Hussien and Sept 11th.

Further, George Bush could have, and should have, waited for the weapons inspectors to do thier job, instead of pulling them out prematurely. Iraq posed no imminent threat that required immediate action.

Also, your comment that UN obstructionism is what forced us to way is further degraded by the revelation that Bush planned the war from the momment he came into office.

George Bush and the conservative establishment were dead wrong on Iraq. Most rational, informed people knew this all along. I and others stated unequivocably three years ago that there were definitly no terrorist links and almost certainly no weapons of mass destruction. Now, because of George Bush's stupidity, and the American publics gross ignorance and gullibility, we have killed 10,000 innocent Iraqis - five times the number of Americans killed on Sept 11th. Not too mention the 500 American casualties.

Get a grip on reality and acknowledge that you, and the Bush administration, were disasterously wrong. You only discredit the enitre conservative establishment by clinging precariously onto the notion that the Iraq debacle can be justified.
 
 
To say that the UN reduced the issue to WMDs is true in a sense.

But it's also tantamount to saying that courts reduce prosecutions to the legal basis for prosecution, excluding the rest.

Or to say that laws "reduce" the available options to the legal ones.

It's a good thing until it works against you.

The only really solid legal angle for invading Iraq was the degree to which they complied with their terms of surrender after they'd illegally invaded Kuwait.

The UN didn't actively reduce it. The UN simply doesn't recognize any and all invasions as legitimate.

This necessitated a valid casus belli and WMDs were solid legal ground.

Humanitarian motivation sounds nice but there usually needs to be an ongoing humanitarian crisis.

These are standards that we uphold when we see fit as well.

So yeah the "UN" (euphemism for "the world" when one disagrees with the world's consensus) can be said to have reduced it to it's only legal footing.

This happens to be a good thing. It's the same fuction that declared Saddam's invasion illegal.

There are those who will complain when the UN does not support the invasions that they do.

But most can agree that invasions should not be fecklessly prosecuted and that criteria for legitimacy should exist.

You can't say that Saddam's invasions are illegal and ours are without differentiating criteria.

Ironically the invasion of Iraq only had a specter of legitimacy because of Saddam's illegal invasion.

Because of this the US only had WMD as solid legal ground.
 
 
So, then.....it has almost certainly be proven Iraq had no WMD. If the solid ground was shaky from the begining..........does this make the war illegal? If so, what will the ramifications be, I wonder, do you see the day when Bush will be held accountable on charges of war crimes?
 
 
Ceili, No, Bush will never pay for his crime against humanity. That's the sad part of all this agression against a country that posed no threat to the American People or anybody else. Instead of putting our efforts into finding Osama, this president side-tracked our efforts and spending that only increased the misery for everybody - including the Iraqis. They are also under the threat of terrorism now from other Arabs that they didn't have before our invasion. Osama is still free and roaming the countryside of Afghanistan and Pakistan, and our soldiers and billions are being spent on a country that didn't deserve what we gave them.
 
 
 
So, then.....it has almost certainly be proven Iraq had no WMD. If the solid ground was shaky from the begining..........does this make the war illegal? If so, what will the ramifications be, I wonder, do you see the day when Bush will be held accountable on charges of war crimes?
 

I consider it an illegal war. Many do.

But the US would veto any resolution trying to find it illegitimate. Because of the subjectivity of threat it's subject to interpretation.

The US is in a position to block anything in the UN that would criticize it.

Ultimately its legality is on murky ground, as is all legality when it comes to international law.

In a way, saying that it's illegal is nothing more than rhetoric. On the international scale there's no rule of law and nations with power do everything they can to keep it that way.
 
 
 
So, then.....it has almost certainly be proven Iraq had no WMD. If the solid ground was shaky from the begining..........does this make the war illegal? If so, what will the ramifications be, I wonder, do you see the day when Bush will be held accountable on charges of war crimes?
 

Illegal by whose standards? Is US going to judge it's own wars illegal.. I will believe it when I see it. Certainly by my standards any invasive war is 'illegal' in the sense that it is not right. What the hell is illegal or legal WAR anyway? Ok, I illegaly killed 10.000 people? Oh, my killing of 10.000 people was legal? What is the f*****g diifference?

Ah, of course. If you have standards for legal/illegal wars, you can attack people 'legally' by your own standards, and even more ironically, because they attack others illegaly. Like Serbia, Iraq (2 times), Vietnam, Korea,....

Uh, hipocrisy, God syndrome, brutality and above all : thinking everybody else is just stupid!
 
 
I wasn't aware the US attached Serbia, this is news to me.
 
 
 
I consider it an illegal war. Many do.

But the US would veto any resolution trying to find it illegitimate. Because of the subjectivity of threat it's subject to interpretation.

The US is in a position to block anything in the UN that would criticize it.

Ultimately its legality is on murky ground, as is all legality when it comes to international law.

In a way, saying that it's illegal is nothing more than rhetoric. On the international scale there's no rule of law and nations with power do everything they can to keep it that way.
 

At last Craven has arrived at a correct description of international law.

The enactments of the UN General Assembly and Security Council are what they are - the enactments of organs of a voluntary organization which are binding on their members to the extent that they are accepted by them. They have no effect whatever on nations that are not members, and since membership is neither compulsory nor irrevocable they cannot, of themselves, be applied without the implied or explicit consent of the sovereign nation involved.

Nevertheless some people prever to describe as legal or illegal matters which comply or do not comply with UN enactments. That is their right, but their opinions do not constitute enforcable international law. Others go farther and assert that if the UN does not explicitly affirm the propriety of some action, then it must necessarily be "ilegal". This is hardly defensible even as a matter of opinion. There are many real questions and conflicts in the world that the UN does not even attempt to either mediate or regulate.
 
 
Ceili:

 
I wasn't aware the US attached Serbia, this is news to me.
 

Well the event is significant because:

1) It was an attack of US of a European country.
2) It was an attack of US of a sovereign country, although Milosevic is thought of as a kind of Hitler, Milosevic was formally elected.
3) It didn't help. Not in any way. Except for the people, some of which I know personally, fleeing from US bombs.

 http://www.eatthestate.org/03-28/BombingSerbiaNot.htm 
(added)
 http://www.cato.org/pubs/policy_report/v21n5/niskanen.html 
 
 
 
At last Craven has arrived at a correct description of international law.
 

Perhaps this is just the first time you have heard me say so.

I've long maintained that International Law is an illusion and long bemoaned the hawks in power who do everything they can to keep it that way.

I suspect that you see the emergence of international rule of law as a bad thing.

Any legal standard would be an equalizer, and equalizers are not popular among the powerful.

Those enamoured of America's ability to engage in whatever military pursuit that suits our fancy usually decy any move toward real international law very loudly.
 
 
NATO is not the United States.
Nobody attacked serbia but the serbians themselves and NATO was sent in to clean up the damage. I believe the actions were warranted and Milosevic is particularily nasty bastard, elected or not.
 
 
 
3) It didn't help. Not in any way. Except for the people, some of which I know personally, fleeing from US bombs.
 

It didnt help any of the Kosovars who returned from their makeshift refugee camps in Albania and Macedonia to their hometowns?

It didn't help any of the Kosovars who were still in hiding at home or in the hills, trying to stay out of the hands of the Serbian paramilitaries that were killing and raping people, when the attacks started?

I mean, they were what that war was started over.

By spring 2000, the 90% Kosovar majority was safely back at home. In Peja and Gjakova, people had the US, NATO and EU flags hanging out. On the walls, I saw it written: "Thank you, Clinton, thank you, Blair, thank you, Schroeder". In the schoolhallways, childrens drawings showed tanks and blood and people with guns - the kids' memories of how they'd been chased out, before NATO attacked.

(Oh yes - cause it wasnt the US attacking - it was NATO. Which includes quite a lot of European countries, too.)

By ways of bonus, the intervention helped Milosevic's ouster along as well. That didn't help anyone either?

Sorry - I dont mean to go all melodramatic at you. I know that the 10% Serb minority in Kosovo/a has had a tough time since. Now many of them have been chased out. I know that post-Milosevic politics in Serbia aint been pretty, either. And I'm not saying one can't possibly argue that, on balance, things got worse (tho I personally dont see exactly how). But it didnt help? Not in any way?

It did what it set out to do - stop the murderous mass deportation of 100,000s of Kosovars. Thats the bottom line.
 
 
"NATO is not the United States."
Wrong. NATO is US, de facto. Bombers, bombs and pilots, generals, carriers, everything that bombed Serbia was US. Saying US didn't do it, NATO did, not going to make any difference.

nimh: You do not have a clear picture of the Kosovo problem. Kosovo became a problem in the eighties, long before the bombing.
It's like IRA, or any other such problem. Why didn't US attack London because of the problems with IRA? Why doesn't US attack Russia because of Cechnya? Why didn't US attack SouthAfrica because of apartheid?

I am not defending violence, as you can clearly see. Bombing Serbs in Belgrade because of violence of Serbian paramilitary against Albanians in Kosovo is just weird, and politically incorrect. It isn't right by any laws -neither US nor NATO nor UN.

The bombing was also totally unrelated to Kosovo - it served as an 'ultimatum' but its effect was just death of innocent people and millions of dollars destroyed. The killing went on, and the NATO forces physically helping Albanian Kosovo refugees was what ended that problem (then).

And interestingly
"stop the murderous mass deportation of 100,000s " is a contradiction: what is it - killing or deporting? Mass deportations are one thing, mass killings are another. What is "murderous mass deportation " I have no idea.

The Milosevic regime did not end at that time. He became more of a saint, he is making fun of Haag court for the last 5 years. His mob went on to rule the country for a long time - it still does. Just look up the facts - the prime minister Kostunica murdered, etc. Most of this was helped by the long-standing embargo which helped mafia develop (you know the effects of prohibition). And who helped Serbia after the bombing? Nobody, cause US was busy bombing somebody else.
 
 
 
Why didn't US attack SouthAfrica because of apartheid?
 

There is a hell of a difference between deep-seated societal issues and an ongoing humanitarian crisis in which pro-active ethnic cleansing and mass murder is being waged.

nimh's picture is a hell of a lot clearer than yours.

"murderous mass deportation " might be a mouthful but it is accurate.

Ethnic cleansing is not just about death. In the case being discussed the enthic cleansing was both murderous and expulsive.
 
 
Especially if it occurs in a theater that is already being protected and the general area that had a World War originate ove same basic problems.
 
 
Craven, there is no doubt that ethnic cleansing, killing etc. is not good.

That's why bombing Belgrade wasn't good.
My picture couldn't be clearer, standing here on the edge of it. I understand that the media presented the case in such a way that most of the Americans, and perhaps a portion of Europe, has a clear conscious about it.

We all know there is murdering and raping, even as we speak, going on even in the center of the world, if you know what I mean.
I could have been a target of US bombs myself, if things went a little different.
You know, there are vast differences between people who love the knife, and people who like to read. In Kosovo, a lot of people like to kill, and so do a lot of people in New York.
There was significantly less crime in Belgrade, once, as it is in a lot of million-sized American cities. Belgrade was a city of culture. And guess what? NATO decides to bomb it.

It is just saddening to see how mislead people are about such problems. About what was right and what wasn't, and about what was really achieved.
If Serbia wanted it, the killings could go on, trust me. The war in Bosnia wasn't over in a month, and no foreign involvement with guns did make it any better.
 
 
Relative,

I will have to flat out reject two notions you proposed above.

1) the appeal to authority by way of proximity.

By all means, if the facts are wrong correct them. But as long as the facts are right you have no basis for an appeal to proximity.

2) That the difference of opinion "about what was right" is a matter of being "mislead".

The above two notions are simply a way to avoid the uncomfortable notion that your position on a *subjective* matter is not absolute.

Instead of trying to say that the people who disagree with you are "mislead" or to imply that they do not see the situation clearly why not just accept the fact that it's a subjective matter and opinions can and will differ?

Now to address the perceived inconsistency:

So what?

The point isn't that it's fair. There is incredible inconsistency in US dealings. This doesn't mean that all US intervention is wrong.

In short, US inconsistency has no bearing on whether that was a correct decision or not.

Lastly, I agree that there is death any dying everywhere. But that's still a big difference from a concerted and nation-wide campaign for ethnic cleansing.

You can't argue that the existence of misery around the world means that there is not a qualitative difference between degrees of misery.

Nation-wide ethnic cleansing is not the same as inner-city gang crime, for example.
 
 
 
And interestingly
"stop the murderous mass deportation of 100,000s " is a contradiction: what is it - killing or deporting? Mass deportations are one thing, mass killings are another. What is "murderous mass deportation " I have no idea.
 

That would be deporting thousands of people in a way that included killing a whole bunch of 'em.

Sorry about my choice of words, I don't mean to sound flippant. When Stalin deported the Crimean Tatars and the Chechens and other Caucasian peoples to Central Asia, a great many of them died along the way. Was it Stalin's intention to kill them off, by deporting them in that way, or were the many casualties and murders along the way more of an added bonus? The answer is yes. It was somewhere in between deportation and mass murder.

Same here. Extermination was not the goal, but the death of some 8,000 Kosovars was hardly an accidental side-effect, either.

 
Just look up the facts - the prime minister Kostunica murdered, etc.
 

I dont like Kostunica much either, but I dont think it's, let's say, consensus opinion that he had Djindjic murdered.

 
Most of this was helped by the long-standing embargo which helped mafia develop (you know the effects of prohibition). And who helped Serbia after the bombing? Nobody, cause US was busy bombing somebody else.
 

On the mafia profiting from the embargo, I agree. (On saving people requiring ground troops rather than just bombs, I agree too, by the way, but I can also see that sometimes one needs to precede the other, in terms of military strategy). But on the "nobody helping" count, I do believe the US and EU already pumped a great amount of money into post-Milosevic Serbia. One of the main reasons they extradited Milosevic in the first place was to get the next tranche of financial aid they had been pledged. Whether it was enough, is another question, as is whether Djindjic and his political allies and rivals in government used it all well.
 
 
 
If Serbia wanted it, the killings could go on, trust me. The war in Bosnia wasn't over in a month, and no foreign involvement with guns did make it any better.
 

The war in Bosnia went on for years partly because the foreign involvement came without guns, so to speak (the blue helmets).

When the US finally decided to force the issue by military prowess, the war was over quickly enough. (Even if it's been replaced with a cease-fire rather than peace).

 
The point isn't that it's fair. There is incredible inconsistency in US dealings. This doesn't mean that all US intervention is wrong.

In short, US inconsistency has no bearing on whether that was a correct decision or not.
 

Exactly.
 
 
And arguments showing beaten, raped and murdered people on TV and saying 'look what they're doing' and saying 'we have to bomb them the bastards!' are just laughable.
Not because people aren't beaten and murdered, but because someone wants to be the judge of all that, and the executioner.

Everybody killed everybody for some time in ex-Yugoslavia. OK? If you don't understand that's because your perspective is one-sided.
I know Serbs, Croatians, Bosnians, Macedonians (and I knew some Albanians when in the army). They are NOT bad people in any way like some might think. As a matter of fact, we can get along pretty well, and literally can't live one without another. And why I don't know any Albanians currently? Not because of lack of them or my personal hate. Read on.
The killings that happened are the result of many circumstances, but all mentioned did the killing in the same manner. It was a bloody mess, people migrating, fleeing, deception,..
Of all people, Albanians seem to be the least likable around here, and to no surprise. Better not tell you the stories about guys eyeing Albanian girls.. because they are scarry. Scarry to death sometimes. Albanians seem to have problems 'fitting in' socially - they develop their own culture inside a host culture, and at one moment they take over. They have 10 kids or even more, live packed like sardines, their women have NO rights, and they take control over ice-cream business first. Then the vegetables business.
And nobody wants to talk about it, yet they all fear it. Germany, Switzerland, Italy,..

Kosovo is a 'cradle of Serbia' as they call it, yet it was taken over by Albanians gradually. And when they start to take over, others move out, they have to.
Now imagine this going on for years, and imagine what a time-bomb! Everything soaked in gasolene! Illegal immigrants, enraged Serbs, enraged Albanians, a knife there, a gun there,.. Bloody hell, bloody mess! And all happening after a recent war!
Albanians, not having so many guns handy, because the country they want to make a mess in happens to be somebody else's contry, may appear like victims; but they killed just the same. You can't understand the temperament some of these people have - Serbians and Albanians and Bosnians - give them guns and they'll kill each other in a minute. Albanians cramping in Kosovo and Serbians treating it like 'Cradle of Serbia'.???

If anybody is responsible for the Kosovo crisis, it's the former Yugoslav regime which didn't want to admit it. Yugoslavia was so perfect that it wasn't possible. It was brewing for ovcer 50 years, and exploded just as the Balkan war was on decline...

Now only a fool can pretend to be able to blame somebody so easily, and bomb civilians because of it! Preposterous!!
 
 
 
Now only a fool can pretend to be able to blame somebody so easily, and bomb civilians because of it! Preposterous!!
 

Yet you've done just that, blaming the United States for your problems. Face it, these problem are centuries older than the united states.
 
 
Craven :

 
I will have to flat out reject two notions you proposed above.

1) the appeal to authority by way of proximity.
 

and

 
nimh's picture is a hell of a lot clearer than yours
 

! I must protest. Withdraw immediately or admit it's only an opinion. How else can you argument that?

 
There is a hell of a difference between deep-seated societal issues and an ongoing humanitarian crisis in which pro-active ethnic cleansing and mass murder is being waged.
 

Yes, as you say - Kosovo is a deep-seated societal issue, and apartheid is just ongoing humanitarian crisis in which pro-active ethnic cleansing and mass murder.

 
2) That the difference of opinion "about what was right" is a matter of being "mislead".

The above two notions are simply a way to avoid the uncomfortable notion that your position on a *subjective* matter is not absolute.
 

Thats EXACTLY why the bombing was wrong. You cannot bobm somebody over a subjective matter.

 
The point isn't that it's fair. There is incredible inconsistency in US dealings. This doesn't mean that all US intervention is wrong.
 

US inconsistency is a matter of consistently idiotic foreign policy. I wasn't complaining about that, i don't give a damn. I was complaining about the US bombing people.
 
 
Ceili:
"Yet you've done just that, blaming the United States for your problems. Face it, these problem are centuries older than the united states. "

When my problem is that US is pouring bombs over my head, the US is the one I will blame it for.
 
 
 
 
nimh's picture is a hell of a lot clearer than yours
 

! I must protest. Withdraw immediately or admit it's only an opinion. How else can you argument that?
 

You are completely correct. It is an opinion.

But why are you demanding that I preface this opinion with that disclaimer?

When you asserted the opinion that nimh's view was not clear and that he was "mislead" I understood that to mean that you were stating an opinion.

Were you asserting fact? Or are you demanding a disclaimer that you repeatedly did not bother with?

 
Yes, as you say - Kosovo is a deep-seated societal issue, and apartheid is just ongoing humanitarian crisis in which pro-active ethnic cleansing and mass murder.
 

Incorrect. First of all they are not mutually exclusive.

Secondly apartheid was not an ongoing attempt at ethnic cleansing.

 
You cannot bobm somebody over a subjective matter.
 

Please name a matter that is not subjective.  
 
 
Ha! That's why I don't bomb people!
 
 
 
Everybody killed everybody for some time in ex-Yugoslavia. OK? If you don't understand that's because your perspective is one-sided.
 

Every war ends up with everybody killing everybody. That doesn't mean it isn't possible to discern "who started it", or, to put it more sophisticatedly, who were responsible for the political and military escalation that led to the war.

Thats not necessarily (just) one country or people. I think Tudjman was as guilty as Milosevic. I do think that it is possible to distinguish between those who were more of a victim, and those who were more of a perpetrator, though - easily. And Milosevic and "his" Serbia (the Serbs who didnt protest or resist, the Serbs who voted him in, the Serbs who joined Seselj's Chetniks or Arkan's Tigers), bear a particular responsibility.

 
I know Serbs, Croatians, Bosnians, Macedonians (and I knew some Albanians when in the army). They are NOT bad people in any way like some might think.
 

I don't think anyone here has said they think the Serbs or any other people are collectively "bad people".

Well, you are basically saying Albanians are bad people - but otherwise noone is saying anything like that.

 
Of all people, Albanians seem to be the least likable around here, and to no surprise. Better not tell you the stories about guys eyeing Albanian girls.. because they are scarry. Scarry to death sometimes. Albanians seem to have problems 'fitting in' socially - they develop their own culture inside a host culture, and at one moment they take over. They have 10 kids or even more, live packed like sardines, their women have NO rights, and they take control over ice-cream business first. Then the vegetables business. And nobody wants to talk about it, yet they all fear it.
 

Variations of this story, of course, can be found in history's archives: it's the way white Americans used to talk of Negroes, the way Europeans talk of Gypsies (Roma), the way Europeans used to talk about Jews...

I acquainted a few Albanians, and I was glad to. They included some people who did not fit your description, in any way.

 
Now imagine this going on for years, and imagine what a time-bomb! Everything soaked in gasolene! Illegal immigrants, enraged Serbs, enraged Albanians, a knife there, a gun there,.. Bloody hell, bloody mess!
 

Apologies for picking up on a detail here, but "illegal immigrants"? From where? Under Communist dictator Hoxha, Albania proper was the most tightly guarded prison in the world, barring North-Korea perhaps. Perhaps you should stick to the "10 kids or more" line, instead... ;-)

As for all the talk of, give them a gun and they start killing, I think the story of how the Kosovar Albanians for almost ten years followed the lead of Ibrahim Rugova and his mission of non-violent resistance should give any peddler of Balkanist stereotypes pause for thought.

For ten years, the Kosovars reacted to the increasing violence of the Serb soldiers and para-military thugs (many of whom came from Serbia proper for the occasion), by building their own underground society, setting up underground schools, instead of taking up arms.

The many years it took before the guerrilla KLA became a serious player disproves any cliche of trigger-happy Albanians (or Balkanese, in general).
 
 
 
I consider it an illegal war. Many do.

But the US would veto any resolution trying to find it illegitimate. Because of the subjectivity of threat it's subject to interpretation.

The US is in a position to block anything in the UN that would criticize it.

Ultimately its legality is on murky ground, as is all legality when it comes to international law.

In a way, saying that it's illegal is nothing more than rhetoric. On the international scale there's no rule of law and nations with power do everything they can to keep it that way.
 

At last Craven has arrived at a correct description of international law.

The enactments of the UN General Assembly and Security Council are what they are - the enactments of organs of a voluntary organization which are binding on their members to the extent that they are accepted by them. They have no effect whatever on nations that are not members, and since membership is neither compulsory nor irrevocable they cannot, of themselves, be applied without the implied or explicit consent of the sovereign nation involved.

Nevertheless some people prever to describe as legal or illegal matters which comply or do not comply with UN enactments. That is their right, but their opinions do not constitute enforcable international law. Others go farther and assert that if the UN does not explicitly affirm the propriety of some action, then it must necessarily be "ilegal". This is hardly defensible even as a matter of opinion. There are many real questions and conflicts in the world that the UN does not even attempt to either mediate or regulate.
 
 
George, you already said that 5 hours ago.

See the top of the page. ^^^^
 
 
nimh:

I understand the need to find the guilty one for the war.
The Yugoslavian official army, of which I was an active member of at the time, attacked first Slovenia and then Croatia. The Slovenian war was quickly over in a matter of days. Croatian war lasted far longer and with far more dead. Partly because Serbia was eager to hold onto Croatian territory, partly because the fighting became local - fights starting up all over the place, the 'paramilitary forces' (read neighbour to neighbor) kicking in, then the flames engulfed Bosnia, divided religiously between Karadzic's serbs, croatians and muslims.
At this point the thing was so complicated and got so far out of hand that nobody was able to immediately stop the war anymore. The killing was so fractal there even wasn't a front, nor were there two sides - there were many sides.
And the war lacked one significant thing: there was no political or land interest anymore. The war went on hatred and religious fuel.

Who is responsible?
The Yugoslavian army under Serbian control started it - there is no doubt about it.
Hatred fueled it - there is also no doubt about it.
And the Homo Vulgaris Lupus did the killings. Nobody else.

 
Every war ends up with everybody killing everybody
 

Certainly not. That is the case only when wars have religious, or otherwise hatred-based character. In territorial wars, soldiers are killing opponents. There are always war crimes, buit that's another story.

 
Well, you are basically saying Albanians are bad people - but otherwise noone is saying anything like that.
 

Or is it you putting words in my mouth? You must admit I only described them, I stated the facts. Then you said that it looks like bad people to you.
Certainly enough room for hatred, don't you think?

 
As for all the talk of, give them a gun and they start killing, I think the story of how the Kosovar Albanians for almost ten years followed the lead of Ibrahim Rugova and his mission of non-violent resistance should give any peddler of Balkanist stereotypes pause for thought.
 

Hah! If the resistance was armed, it would be killed off. There could be no armed resistance! This is the main problem in the Balkan: once there's a shooting, everybody goes to get their gun. These nations lived through the Turks, for Christ's sake! Kosovo was the stage for most famous of battles between Serbia and the Otoman empire.
Albanians are very quiet and social people, keeping to themselves. They have 'family heads' that decide everything for a family as large as 50 or more people. All the money they make goes in the same budget, the chief having the only authority over it. They are extremely disciplined. They work very hard. All well and good. But they don't fit in the society - they tend to convert it.

And by the way, Kosovo is going for independence now.. I don't know if they will join Albaina or not. But certainly 100 years ago there were almost 100% Serbs living there. If this is a 'peaceful evolution' or a 'takeover' is not for me to decide, but just goes to show how unsubstantiated territorial claims are in the long run.
 
 
 
 
Well, you are basically saying Albanians are bad people - but otherwise noone is saying anything like that.
 

Or is it you putting words in my mouth? You must admit I only described them, I stated the facts.
 

Lookit, no offence, but this quote of yours below - what you wrote about the Albanians - emphatically cannot be said to represent "the facts". It is a highly personal - and highly negative - opinion about an entire people.

"Of all people, Albanians seem to be the least likable around here, and to no surprise. Better not tell you the stories about guys eyeing Albanian girls.. because they are scarry. Scarry to death sometimes. Albanians seem to have problems 'fitting in' socially - they develop their own culture inside a host culture, and at one moment they take over. They have 10 kids or even more, live packed like sardines, their women have NO rights, and they take control over ice-cream business first. Then the vegetables business. And nobody wants to talk about it, yet they all fear it."

 
And by the way, Kosovo is going for independence now.. I don't know if they will join Albaina or not. But certainly 100 years ago there were almost 100% Serbs living there.
 

I think they'll become independent, over time, too... and that joining Albania is not in the cards until perhaps the next era.

But your claim on 100% Serbs having lived there 100 years ago (and before?) is patently false. Kosovo has always been a mix of peoples, religions and cultures, "cradle" or not. E.g., according to the Austrian statistics of 1903, Orthodox Serbs only made up some 25% of the population of the sancaks of Prishtina, Pec and Prizren; according to the Ottoman statistics of 1912, they made up 21% of the population.

People have come and gone in Kosovo all the time, as often by force as voluntarily. For example, according to Noel Malcolm, some 60,000 Serbs had left Kosovo in the 40 years before that - but if they were crowded out, it wasnt by "illegal immigrants" or "10-children Albanian families", but rather by the 50,000 Muslims who fled to Kosovo when they were chased out of Serbia, Montenegro and Bulgaria in 1877-78.

Noel Malcolm's book, Kosovo, a Short History (mind you, "short" - it's still 492 pp.), is pretty good actually, chock full of details. I can also recommend the anthropologist Ger Duijzing's Religion and the Politics of Identity in Kosovo. He calls Kosovo "an ethnic shatter zone".
 
 
 
George, you already said that 5 hours ago.

See the top of the page. ^^^^
 

You're right, I did! Damned if I know how it happened.
 
 
Americans our best friends, Canadians say
But U.S. citizens prefer the Brits

The Canadian Press
Monday, March 15, 2004

MONTREAL - The best-friend relationship that Canada and the United States once enjoyed might have become more of a one-way affair.

While 50 per cent of Canadians in a recent Leger Marketing poll said the U.S. was Canada's "best friend," only 20 per cent of American respondents in the same survey felt likewise about their northern neighbour. Britain topped the best-friend list for 62 per cent of Americans.

Twenty-five per cent of Canadians chose Britain as their country's best buddy.

The poll also suggested that 68 per cent of Canadians thought the two countries were very different, while 29 per cent believed they were very much alike.

Among Americans, the numbers were reversed -- 61 per cent said the countries were very much alike, compared with 31 per cent who said they were very different.

The poll of 1,501 Canadians and 1,035 Americans was conducted Feb. 17-22.

Harold Waller, chairman of McGill University's North American Studies Program, said he wasn't surprised at the findings because Canada is not on the radar screen of the average American.

"Americans know almost nothing about Canada and Canadians."

Christopher Sands, senior associate with the Canada Project for the Center for Strategic and International Studies, said there is no surprise that Britain was way out in the lead. "The American public has accepted that, post-Sept. 11, allies have to be looked at by what they do, not what they say."
 
 
Are you surprised?

I find statements such as "Americans know almost nothing about Canada" made by Canadians who implicitly assume they know a great deal about the United States, both patronizing and profoundly hypoctitical. Just what one might expect from an aspiring academic heading something like "The North American Studies Program".

The survey results themselves suggest that the survey sample of Americans was indeed well aware of the situation and the reality of our relationships. As Mr. Sands indicated, allies are properly evaluated based on what they do, and not what they say.
 
 
Ceili

Your right most average Americans know almost nothing about Canada and Canadians. Neither do we know too much anyone else in the world either. The knowledge and opinions expressed here by Americans are the exception rather than the rule. Actually I am more of a typical know nothing American than anyone else here. I suspect the reason that if asked who we think are friends are we say Britian is because most of us think our ancestors came from "somewhere over there." All most of us know about other countries is what little we remember from our history books in school and the things we hear in the news. Most of us live ordinary lives with our families concerned with issues that affect our families. In other words, I don't think it's personal. We don't know too much about Mexico either.

(I am talking about the American public, not our government or politicians or whatever.)

At least that is my sense with everyone that I know. It may different in the big cities or states that are closer to the borders with a lot of immigrants from Canada and Mexico. As just a curious question, are there a lot of immigrants from Canada in America? All I usually hear about is Mexican immigrants.
 
 
As a Briton, I'd rather have the EU as my country's 'best-friend' than the US. Maybe the Commonwealth creates some ties with Canada, Australia & New Zealand, but we still have more to gain by siding with our chums across the Channel.
 
 
 
As just a curious question, are there a lot of immigrants from Canada in America? All I usually hear about is Mexican immigrants.
 

You usually hear about "illegal" Mexican immigrants. Those that are here legally aren't discussed much. There are a lot of Canadians living here in the greater Boston area and if you trace the genealogy of many long term New England families (as well as those all along the northern tier states at least as far west as the Dakotas..) you'll find that most have ancestral ties to Canada. My own family is from Quebec and 90% of my relatives still live there.
 
 
nimh : My quote about Albanians is not very positively colored, and I apologize for it's bad taste. I am not a racist and I don't judge people based on preset opinions or ideology.
It is very sad to judge an entire nation and I am sorry for how my posting sounded. I said I even knew some Albanians when the situations brought us together.

But we must be cautious here because past racism has made our position almost a deadlock : you cannot dislike people anymore. But disliking people is not racism, it is the way we function as humans. Racism is about people's rights not about their reputation.

About Kosovo statistics : I rushed the stats from my head and I agree this territory has always been mixed population. The numbers you have I cannot verify, but official Yugoslavian stats show more than 26% of Serbs in 1971. I remember stats like 60% of Serbs and other non-Albanian nations in the 19th century.

I will not go into this anymore, since this is a 'can of worms'. I will only repeat the three statements:

1. It is wrong to kill.
2. It is wrong to attack nations because of unclear reasons.
3. It is wrong to pour bombs on somebody other's head, and then say they deserved it.
 
 
George, I wouldn't think it a stretch to say the average Canadian knows way more about the US than most americans know of canada. More than half of the tv programs we get come out of the US. We get american news, magazines - daily reminders of our neighbours to the south. I don't understand your anger to this statement. It seems fairly obvious to me.
 
 
 
George, I wouldn't think it a stretch to say the average Canadian knows way more about the US than most americans know of canada. More than half of the tv programs we get come out of the US. We get american news, magazines - daily reminders of our neighbours to the south. I don't understand your anger to this statement. It seems fairly obvious to me.
 

Same here in Germany. Most Germans know a lot more about America than the average American knows about Europe. This is not arrogance, it's an observation. I don't think it's the Americans' fault. It probably has much more to do with the fact that a German has six weeks of paid holidays a year while an American has two. That makes it much easier for us to travel to foreign countries and take the time to actually see something.
 
 
 
You usually hear about "illegal" Mexican immigrants. Those that are here legally aren't discussed much. There are a lot of Canadians living here in the greater Boston area and if you trace the genealogy of many long term New England families (as well as those all along the northern tier states at least as far west as the Dakotas..) you'll find that most have ancestral ties to Canada. My own family is from Quebec and 90% of my relatives still live there.
 

Like I said, it is probably different in other places than it is in the southern and middle states.

Genology is becoming a big thing now that it is easier to do isn't it? People on both sides of my family traced our roots back. One side came from France and the other from England.
 
 
Well, to sound arrogant, why should Americans NEED to know about Canada? The US can annhilate everyone in the world at least a dozen times, has one of the leading world economies, makes vast scientific discoveries, and has McDonalds. What has Canada done lately that would make anyone interested?
 
 
McGentrix

I'm rather sure now, why you don't have any neighbours.
 
 
 
Well, to sound arrogant, why should Americans NEED to know about Canada? The US can annhilate everyone in the world at least a dozen times, has one of the leading world economies, makes vast scientific discoveries, and has McDonalds. What has Canada done lately that would make anyone interested?
 

When they say "I hate America", do you think they mean this kind of attitude?

I hope that your tongue is in your cheek but I suspect that it's not...the world always sighs at Americans' lack of a sense of irony.  
 
 
It wasn't mentioned here before, wasn't it?

A new study released Tuesday shows that one year after the start of the Iraq War, dissatisfaction with the United States' foreign policy is still growing around the world.

 
A Year After Iraq War
Mistrust of America in Europe Ever Higher, Muslim Anger Persists

A year after the war in Iraq, discontent with America and its policies has intensified rather than diminished. Opinion of the United States in France and Germany is at least as negative now as at the war's conclusion, and British views are decidedly more critical. Perceptions of American unilateralism remain widespread in European and Muslim nations, and the war in Iraq has undermined America's credibility abroad. Doubts about the motives behind the U.S.-led war on terrorism abound, and a growing percentage of Europeans want foreign policy and security arrangements independent from the United States. Across Europe, there is considerable support for the European Union to become as powerful as the United States.
[...]
 

 Full "Summary of Findings" 
 
 
 
 
Well, to sound arrogant, why should Americans NEED to know about Canada? The US can annhilate everyone in the world at least a dozen times, has one of the leading world economies, makes vast scientific discoveries, and has McDonalds. What has Canada done lately that would make anyone interested?
 

When they say "I hate America", do you think they mean this kind of attitude?

I hope that your tongue is in your cheek but I suspect that it's not...the world always sighs at Americans' lack of a sense of irony.  
 

Hi Pete

I thought this was very funny. Why indeed do you need to know anything about anybody if you can annihilate them several times over!

You are right about irony though. The Americans don't seem to do irony at all. Except to know where those darned I-ronians hang out so they can annihilate them.  
 
 
 
 
George, I wouldn't think it a stretch to say the average Canadian knows way more about the US than most americans know of canada. More than half of the tv programs we get come out of the US. We get american news, magazines - daily reminders of our neighbours to the south. I don't understand your anger to this statement. It seems fairly obvious to me.
 

Same here in Germany. Most Germans know a lot more about America than the average American knows about Europe. This is not arrogance, it's an observation. I don't think it's the Americans' fault. It probably has much more to do with the fact that a German has six weeks of paid holidays a year while an American has two. That makes it much easier for us to travel to foreign countries and take the time to actually see something.
 

I don't believe that the stuff on television, either in the U.S. or in Canada is particularly useful in promoting real understanding about much at all. Certainly seeing too much of the pap on American TV media can dull the sharpest brain, and will hardly inform its viewers about the real interests and dispositions of Americans. Instead it is endless repetition of commercially successful fantasies. Perhaps that can lead to some insights, but a few hours each year are enough for that.

If I communicated anger, I apologize for it. I do believe there is a difference between awareness and understanding. It is strangely commonplace for people in other countries to claim deep understanding of America: I have heard this in Brasil and Malaysia from people who understood almost nothing about this country. I believe it is a result of the ubiquity of American commercial and media products. I will admit I do find it annoying to find in others, who are very willing to criticize us, the claim that, while they understand us very well, we certainly do not understand them.

I believe Thomas is just seizing a moment to have some fun with me over the more liberal working conditions that prevail in Germany. At first I was tempted to hit back with a shot claiming that while Germans must travel to find some pleasure and enjiyment in a vacation, that is less necessary for us, who can readily do so at home. Rhetorically satisfying, but sadly untrue. I have enjoyed my travels in Germany far too much and look forward to my next chance to see the ever new and old Berlin.

I for one do not claim to understand either Canada or Germany more than anyone or their understanding of my home. (And yet I believe I am a pretty well-informed guy.) I do find the obsessions of Canadians on these threads with the many (all too real) defects of American culture and politics a bit odd. I am not that interested in them and don't see any rational basis for them to be so interested in us. The standard retort of course is that "what the U.S. does matters so much" etc. I think that is nonsense.
 
 
george, I must agree with you about the American media and dull brains. We keep getting those terrorist alerts, and people still think another al Qaida attack is immanent, and continue to live in fear. If they used their brains, they would understand that we have more people dying on our highways every year.
 
 
 
It is strangely commonplace for people in other countries to claim deep understanding of America: I have heard this in Brasil and Malaysia from people who understood almost nothing about this country.
 

Brazilians will, almost unfailingly, know about:

George Washington
Thomas Jefferson

And just about every modern president we have.

They know what language we speak.

They know the names of many of our states.

They know our history almost as well as our average highschool students.

We, in turn, have had a president who visited Brazil and called Brazil Bolivia and Brazilians Bolivians (while in Brazil mind you).

We have a people who for the most part can't name a single Brazilian other than Pelé.

We have a people who for the most part could not point to Brazil (a nation almost as large as the continental US) on the map.

We have a people who for the most part do not know what language is spoken in Brazil.

George, you may be right in that most Brazilians don't truely understand America at all. But when you compare that the the absolute ignorance Americans have of Brazil your point is less convincing.

To add to the above is the unconfirmed story that President Bush asked Brazilian president FHC while visiting Brazil "Do you have blacks here too?".

FHC and co. were kind enough not to confirm this story.

Yes, Brazilians don't understand America in depth. They know the stereotypes about American culture and know out basic history and geography, but Americans know next to nothing about Brazil and Brazilians.

I've lived in both the countries you named, and I'm willing to wager that these people who you say did not truely understand America understand it far far better than you do their countries, but yes, their distance makes it hard for true understanding.

But that's what you call a "pointless point".
 
 
 
...the world always sighs at Americans' lack of a sense of irony.  
 

Pete,

I believe that if anything this thread confirms that the irony deficit is outside, not inside our borders.
 
 
He did it again!  
 
 
Craven,

I wonder just how much you know about Brasil, or have travelled there. (Voce falla Portuguese?) How much do you know about the United States for that matter? Does your degree of knowledge and understanding match the degree to which you are judgemental and so certain?

I have no wish to get in an endless back and forth with you - only to express the questions above. Don't even want an answer.
 
 
 
Craven,

I wonder just how much you know about Brasil, or have travelled there. (Voce falla Portuguese?)
 

He didn't really just say that did he?  
 
 
I am sooooo watching in fascination now  

georgeob1 doesn't know, does he?

I'm going to go get some snacks.
 
 
He he he he  
 
 
Don't tell me Craven is Brazilian!
 
 
 
Craven,

I wonder just how much you know about Brasil, or have travelled there.
 

I lived there on thee occasions for spans of years at a time. I just said that I have lived in (not visited ) both those countries.

 
(Voce falla Portuguese?)
 

Fluentemente, a minha soletracão não é uma coisa de tirar orgulho pois apredi a falar falando e não com estudo de livros.

Trabalhei anos como um interpretador traduzindo Português para Inglês ao vivo e em documentos do governo e da maioria das impresas multinacionais que funciona em Brasil.

 
How much do you know about the United States for that matter? Does your degree of knowledge and understanding match the degree to which you are judgemental and so certain?
 

Actually, I'm not judgemental about American ignorance of foreign affairs. In Brazil I argued stridently against the notion that Americans are willfully ignorant of the world.

Americans know of nations that are in the spotlight just like any other people.

Brazilians know nothing about Mongolia, for example, and know much about America because America makes news.

Brazilians have a chip on their shoulder about being a large country and economy about which we know nothing, but they are partly at fault for being willing to import our culture and for their paltry efforts to export theirs.

 
I have no wish to get in an endless back and forth with you - only to express the questions above. Don't even want an answer.
 

I've no plans for enless anything. But my point stands, Malaysians and Brazilians might have only superficial knowledge of stereotypical American culture, but this is far more than can be said of most Americans.

My rhetorical wager stands, I bet those people knew more of America than you do of their countries.
 
 
As an aside, George, I've lived in more cities in Brazil than most Brazilians have visited in their lifetimes.

That's why the others are doing the taken aback thing.
 
 
(and we do it so well :wink: )

I owe you some Cheesies for this, Craven.
 
 
Damn! OK you got me!

Esto con muintos saudades do Rio Grande do Sul.

I do however challenge you concerning the levels of awareness and real undersatanding of America that prevail in other countries. There is a high degree of awareness of the various cultural and commercial exports we pour out so assiduously - fashions, music, etc. However that is not understanding. I didn't detect all that much understanding of Sao Paulo in Recife either.

While the educated elites in most countries have a fair knowledge of most of the world they do not represent the majority, particularly in the countries we are discussing. If there is any difference in Americans it is a result of our relative wealth, which gives our ill informed and ignorant a bigger platform than those occupied by the ill-informed and ignnorant in other countries.
 
 
 
Esto con muintos saudades do Rio Grande do Sul.
 

Saudades da região ou das gauchas?

Morei no sul do Brasil tambem. O povo do Sul do Brasil é gente boa.

 
I do however challenge you concerning the levels of awareness and real undersatanding of America that prevail in other countries. There is a high degree of awareness of the various cultural and commercial exports we pour out so assiduously - fashions, music, etc. However that is not understanding.
 

It's not true understanding, and misperceptions based on stereotypes abound.

Example:

In Brazil, they might wonder why "Americans like to eat meat for breakfast". A reference to bacon sausages and eggs.

Brazilians don't have a term for "eat breakfast" and the equivalent is "take cofffee". So they express disgust at what they think is our penchant for heavy breakfasts.

This is based on film and TV stereotypes and most Americans do not have time for that heavy meal.

But this is the basis of understanding. They know very much about our culture even if cultural differences prevent them from being truely understanding of it.

So they revile American this and that in culture, just like most Americans disparage other very different cultures.

But they have the basis of understanding which we frequently do not.

For example, a popular "ton of bricks or ton of feathers" joke in Brazil is: "what's the capital of the US? New York or Nova York?"

They are at a level at which they lack true understanding of the culture but know about it.

Many of the people I taught spoke English better than most Americans I know.

 
I didn't detect all that much understanding of Sao Paulo in Recife either.
 

Brazil has serious issues of intra-state discrimination. Recife is a very poor and uneducated place. Understanding of São Paulo by Nordestinos is much worse than say, Californian understanding of New York.

Most of these issues of ignorance are simply circumstantial. Americans understand our own regions better than Brazilians do their because Americans travel within America more so than Brazilians travel (out of state) within Brazil.

 
While the educated elites in most countries have a fair knowledge of most of the world they do not represent the majority, particularly in the countries we are discussing.
 

Yeah, but I'm not talking about the educated. I'm talking about illiterates.

I used to teach homeless kids there, all of them know who the American president is. Their versions of "Jay Leno" shows are full of American references.

It's not about education, it's power of culture.

Brazilians don't generally know about America because tehy are interested in education, they know about America because we have a culture that will redefine culture war.

 
If there is any difference in Americans it is a result of our relative wealth, which gives our ill informed and ignorant a bigger platform than those occupied by the ill-informed and ignbnorant in other countries.
 

I disagree, I think that if there can be one named difference it's that our popular culture is in every corner of teh globe, and this brings them superficial knowledge of our culture in large quantities.

While they might not understand us, they know, even if only because they like our music, movies, television and money.
 
 
Actually, my last point of disagreement with you may well be saying the same thing from very different angles.
 
 
Money has a tendency to speak in every language.  
 
 
Craven,

I'll confess to a soft spot for things from the colossus of little order and intermittent progress. I love the music from Villa Lobos to the unique Brasilian soft samba jazz, and the literature from Jose de Alencar to Machado de Assis and Jorge Amado. Though I never stayed there for more than a couple of months at a time, I suspect I may well have seen as many cities as you.

Perhaps we agree. Awareness of the superficial aspects of commercial culture, can create the illusion of understanding, but does not constitute it. That may, in fact, be a disability and an obstacle to understanding.

By the way, they do eat meat for breakfast in the south. (Though I do agree that after a sugar laced cafezinho or two, food is unnecessary.

Yes... das gauchas et das pretas tambien. Also girls named Iracema.
 
 
duplicate
 
 
Well, that was fun.

Misapprehensions about the US held by folks from other countries are surely part of this story, but even only a diet of popular culture (Hollywood and TV shows) would tell a Tau Cetian a fair bit about America. But America isn't getting any programming from Tau Ceti or Morocco or Afghanistan or Chile.

Because we Canadians speak the same language, our border is particularly porous, and any Canadian TV set will have perhaps five or six Canadian channels, but fifteen from America. And that includes the big networks. So Canadian TVs will often be turned to NBC or CBS or CNN or PBS for the nightly news. How many American families watch Canadian news?

So, any notion of balance in knowledge here is as wrong as the nose on my face.

It's understandable, historically. America is isolated by oceans, didn't retain ties to Europe as we did, and it developed a set of mythologies which set it apart and, in some ways, above the rest of the world. As McGentrix said re learning about Canada...'why bother?'.

If we hold as a fundamental premise that knowledge is better than the lack of it, then we pretty quickly arrive at a general truth that America is hurt by its poor level of knowledge of the world outside. And it's not a long leap from there to understanding why,when the rest of world listens to George Bush, we begin to sweat.
 
 
I enjoyed this whole thread notwithstanding looking like an ignorant American. :wink:
 
 
This is about the size of it.
**********************
TEACHER: George, go to the map and find North America.
GEORGE: Here it is!
TEACHER: Correct. Now class, who discovered America?
CLASS: George!
 
 
Well, in 2000, I was visiting a German family I used to live with 39 years ago. It was the summer and the election was heating up. I was happy to find I could get CNN on their TV. And it was in English. So I found out that Gore had chosen Leiberman for a running mate. But the family I was visiting, even though they had one member who spoke reasonably good English, didn't really know anything about American politics.

They've been to visit me in New York in the early 70s, and that's about the extent they know about America. Other than what they learned from Hose Cartright and JR. It's a small country town in Southern Germany and I'd say none of the people there, neighbors and such, knew much about American politics. I tried to explain, but they weren't much interested.

They were much more interested in what had been going on in Bosnia. The daughter who now runs the house, taking care of her elderly mother, is married to a very good natured and fun man from Croatia. (He kept putting Gummy Bears in my Snapps. Man, do these people drink a lot! No kidding.) I knew more about their government than they did about mine. (although, I'll admit I don't know much, certainly not as much as many international non-American a2kers around here.)

Are we not talking about the intelligentsia? If so, then I agree Americans know much less on average about other country's politics as others know about ours. But as Craven says, it's sort of understandable.......in the sense that what we do does, in fact, impact everyone much more than is true of any one other country in the World.

I don't think Americans are stupid necessarily, allowing of course for individual cases, but we have been more complacent because we felt we were safe........and now we don't any more.

We're very influential in our world, we should learn to use it responsibly.
 
 
Lola, Unfortunately, that comes from the top. Us peons can't do too much when our president is hell-bent on a pre-emptive attack on a country that posed no threat to us in any way, shape, or form.
 
 
Well, I'm not so sure you're right about that c.i. Or I'm not sure I agree. We can learn more and work for change. For instance a nice fat check to Kerry right now would probably help as well as volunteering.......which I'm afraid I won't do until I get to New York this Summer.

The hell bent president has to go.
 
 
 
Craven,

I'll confess to a soft spot for things from the colossus of little order and intermittent progress. I love the music from Villa Lobos to the unique Brasilian soft samba jazz, and the literature from Jose de Alencar to Machado de Assis and Jorge Amado. Though I never stayed there for more than a couple of months at a time, I suspect I may well have seen as many cities as you.
 

On my way home and before seing this post I was already thinking I'd have to retract my earlier wager.

I bet the people of whom you spoke of were middle class and probably knew a bit of English. And I bet you know about as much or more of their culture than they did of yours. Again, a rhetorical wager based on very little.

Machado de Assis wrote the a Portugues version of Poe's "Raven" that I think is the best work of translation I've seen. I also had a gal pal who lived on Machado de Assis street.

I have a soft spot for Brazil, the people are something special and I plan to return one day.

 
Perhaps we agree. Awareness of the superficial aspects of commercial culture, can create the illusion of understanding, but does not constitute it. That may, in fact, be a disability and an obstacle to understanding.
 

It definitely can. Without an attempt at empathy I've found that most superficial cultural awareness generates at least small amounts of animosity.

So when an American goes to Brazil and encounters third world inefficiency they might blurt "primitive indians" next to a poorly educated Brazilian who happens to understand him perfectly, and a Brazilian who knows American culture on a superficial level will just focus on the insignificant differences and revile it.

They'll make a huge deal about how Americans wear socks with sandals or how Americans eat this or that. The superficial level of cultural exchange reminds me very much of adolescent girls sizing each other up and wrinkling their nose.

"They eat that!" "They dress like that!" "They are so loud!" "They are rude!"

But it's a start. Superficial knowledge is the basis of many stereotypical misconceptions but at the same time it's a start.

A funny story about cultural exchange between these two countries is a Simpsons episode where they go to Brazil (called "blame it on Lisa").

It had some of the typical american gaffes (making all Brazilians look Mexican) but also had moments where you could tell that someone behind the story actually had been to Brazil and also had a soft spot for Brazil.

Rio's tourism board was quite upset, teh cartoon did all the gaffes, putting monkeys in the streets of Rio, rats everywhere and a taxi driver who kidnaps Homer.

But the Brazilians who bristled at this also fail to understand their American counterparts. Coming from America and seeing the favelas of Rio is a culture shock and people are bound to focus on the stark negatives they see.

It just happened to touch a nerve, because Brazilians are tired of being considered "jungle bunnies".

I saw the cartoon as an interesting clash of culture, and both sides saw it as each other being an idiot (when Rio voiced anger the Simpsons producers gave a backhanded apology in which they invited the Brazilian president to meet Homer Simpson or box him or somesuch).

Brazilians know America on superficial levels, and while I think that's better than complete ignorance it's true that this doesn't prevent them from making the same erroneous assumptions.

One assumption about America that I always find funny is the distain expressed about American patriotism.

Everyone says we are jingoistic, while taking great national pride in their perceived lack of patriotism.

It's funny, they are all just patriotic in different ways. Americans are the "we are number 1 and we saved the free world's ass" type of patriots while Brazilians delude themselves into thinking they have the best women and pizza in the world and that Santos Dumont invented the airplane....

Canadians and Australians, for example, may be right to say that our nationalism is different, but in an irony that I think Blatham has touched on, they are immesely proud of their humility in this regard.

IMO, whether one understands a culture or not has a lot to do with the empathy they decide to approach it with and the understanding and tolerance they are willing to approach it with.

I've lived in more places than I remember so I've no initial cultural indocrination to overcome. And I loved each and every place I lived even though many of my compatriots didn't.

To me, the secret is to stop making such a big deal out of the differences and it's in that spirit that I point out American ignorance of places abroad.

It's not because of anything inherent to American people, it's circumstantial. Though expressed in odd fashion McGentrix had it right. People know about what's shoved in their face.

Americans don't have the NEED to know many things about other nations and the other cultures are not imported very much (despite immigration).

To expect Americans to study up on nations that make few ripples is hypocritical. Other people know about America because we are in their face, not because of superior consideration for social study (though I do think there is a legitimate criticism of US highschool history being inordinately focused on American history).

In a sweet irony I noticed that in Brazil many Brazilians know American history better than their own. My brother and I certainly knew more Brazilian history than any of our aquaintances.

People just learn what's shoved in their face unless they decide to go and pursue scholastic tedium. And that curious type is rare, regardless of what people being talked about.

The European, Brazilian or whomever who criticize American ignorance of their country is a person railing against circumstance. And it's hypocritical, they usually know next to nothing about nations that do not affect them and whose culture isn't being shoved in their face.

<end rant>

 
By the way, they do eat meat for breakfast in the south. (Though I do agree that after a sugar laced cafezinho or two, food is unnecessary.
 

The south don't count, they breathe meat.

 
Yes... das gauchas et das pretas tambien. Also girls named Iracema.
 

Aposto que queria dizer morenas. As morenas são exoticas. Sei lá, talvez queria diser as pretas mesmo, e talvez a sauldade de morenas e coisa minha. Ba tché, as Brazileirinhas são maravilhosas!
 
 
Very interesting Craven, and I am very glad to have discovered this new (to me) dimension in you.

In my experience 'preta' was often slang for babe or sweetheart (except in Belem & San Salvidor). But I do agree about as morenas Brasilieras.

Didn't know about Machado de Assis' translations of Poe (a writer often held in higher regard in other countries than his own). I believe Machado's "Posthumas Reminiscences of Bras Cubas" is one of the largely unsung masterpieces of literature - lyrical,superbly ironic and filled with Brazilian bittersweet, wry, humor. Amado's "Gabriella" is of course unmatched (certainly by anything else he wrote). I'm even a fan of Alencar's epics; "o Guarani "and "Iracema" - a bit old fashioned, but matchless.

I have repeatedly learned that beneath all the cultural artifacts the world is populated with the same human material everywhere. Few of us really understand ourselves much less each other. Perhaps it is just the generalizations about the superficial aspects of natinality and place that are the real subject here. If so then perhaps understanding is not the correct term - knowing may be enough. On that basis perhaps we don't know enough. However the same is true within the U.S. In California they don't know much about Iowa or Nebraska - California is where it is happening - it is the future.
 
 
Twas' interesting to see the "Brasileiro de coracão" side of you too. Whooda thunk?

I can't agree more that the heart of man is the same the world over.
 
 
Well I certainly didn't guess it. Stepped right in the middle of it - to the delight of some observers here.

Thanks & bem suerte. ( been a while - did I say that right?)
 
 
It's "boa sorte", "boa" is more or less "good" while "bem" is more or less "well".

Gotta run, a morena is at the door.
 
 
 
California is where it is happening - it is the future.
 

Yes, and this is, of course, a fundamental theme in the Cohen brothers' masterwork...

QUINTANA:
Let me tell you something, bendeco.
You pull any your crazy shit with
us, you flash a piece out on the
lanes, I'll take it away from you
and stick it up your ass and pull
the fukking trigger til it goes
"click".

DUDE:
Jesus.

QUINTANA
You said it, man. Nobody fucks with
the Jesus.
 
 
Well I don't know who the Cohen brothers are and I'm not interested in learning either. I infer from your comment they are from California. Senator Barbara Boxer is from California too (living proof that short people should be shot) - I don't hold that against the state either.
 
 
 
Well I don't know who the Cohen brothers are and I'm not interested in learning either.
 

george,

Are you feeling a little bit grumpy lately? Your statement above seems arbitrary and somehow not like your usual willingness to explore what another person means by what they say.

Joel and Ethan Cohen are master movie makers and the scene Bernie quotes from The Big Lebowski is one of the funniest I've ever seen in the movies. John Tururro's delivery of these lines is marvelous. He's a very accomplished actor. Maybe Bernie didn't set it up well enough for you to understand what he was saying.

How about if we go out and come back in again on this one?

Take a look at this:

 http://www.miserablelie.com/turturro/biglpics2.html 

especially this one:

 http://www.miserablelie.com/turturro/pictures/lebowski/Image25.jpg 
"Nobody fucks with the Jesus"

The Cohen Brothers have written and directed many movies which include Miller's Crossing, Fargo, Oh Brother Where Art Thou (my favorite), Raising Arizona, The Big Lebowski, Barton Fink.........
 
 
george

As the 2003 site winner of the prestigious "Most Effusive Lover Of All Things American" award, you are remarkably derogatative of modern yanqui culture.

The Cohen brothers are film-makers, and you really ought to acquaint yourself with their work. The quote above is from The Big Lebowski, a truly exceptional example of writing, directing, and acting.

I'm tempted to suggest that you become more familiar with this present decade, but I think such a study would be most valuable if you also, in the manner of prerequisite study, went back and covered those decades you skipped over...every one since the fifties.
 
 
What a goil!
 
 
Me grumpy?!? Well I am a bit weary of osso's coercive restaurant litanys and I did sit through a tiresome four hour deposition yesterday and miss my workout. ( A large Washington Democrat law firm - Clinton's blow job firm - is trying to set up a corporate class action suit and is using a friend's company as bait. I am an "expert witness". My interrogator was polished little fairy with laquered fingernails: fortunately his day was far worse than mine.)

I have never heard of the Cohen brothers or of any of the films or actors you cited. I am not at all aware of the context of Blatham's quote and probably, as a result, could not appreciate its merits. Perhaps that just illustrates my contemporary cultural backwardness, but I for one am comfortable with it.

Bernie is a good guy and I would not wish to offend him. (Well maybe piss him off briefly, but not really offend.) I'm confident my feelings are reciprocated. Hell, I like him.

OK, I'll "go out and come back" (Goddamn shrinks - when you disagree with them they just say "How long have you felt that way?")

Allright, I'm back! Now what?
 
 
Bernie is being generous. My current focus in literature is the late 19th century, and in films it is mostly in the '30s. The most recent film I really like is "The Wind and the Lion" starring Sean Connery as Raisuli, a Berber chieftan with a brogue; Brian Keith as Teddy Roosevelt; and Candice Bergen as an American (Mrs. Pedekaris) in Morrocco kidnapped by the Berber chieftan and held for ransom by the U.S. government. Many truly great lines

"If you so much as harm one hair on their heads, thoughI am but a woman I will fight you, and with my last ounce of strength, I will curse you to God".
"And God will listen"

"Do you play checkers?"
...
"Mrs Pedekaris, you are a great deal of trouble"
...
"Why should I listen to you, you aren't even one of my wives"
...
"What is that"
"A tongue"
"My God, how awful"
"Perhaps its owner had nothing good to say with it"
...
"What America wants is Pederkaris alive or Raisuli dead"
...
"Excuse me gentlemen, I want to be alone with my bear."
...
"The comfort of others is not the concern of the Sultan"

"Ahh Raisuli, we've lost it all: everything is gone away with the wind."
"Yes Sheriff, but isn't there anything in your life that wouldn't risk everything for?" Laughter.
 
 
"Heyyyy, man; there's a beverage here!"

and

"Shut the fuck up, Donnie; you're out of your element..."

 
 
 
Dialogue buffs....gotta love em.

From 'Brother Where Art Thou' (another Cohen brothers film)

EVERETT
What'd the devil give you for your soul, Tommy?

TOMMY
He taught me to play this guitar real good.

Delmar is horrified:

DELMAR
Oh, son! For that you traded your
everlastin' soul?!

Tommy shrugs.

TOMMY
I wudden usin' it.
 
 
Not bad! For me the ultimate is from Hemmingway's "For Whom the Bell Tolls" - a result of his attempts to mimic the Spanish intimate form of address and, as well, some then inadmissable profanities.

The scene; El Sordo and his Loyalist fighters are surrounded on a small hill by the Nationalist soldiers who are slowly moving up to attack. El Sordo muses that the hill is shaped like a chankre (a metaphor fit only for Hemmingway). He then warns his men to hold their fire until they can clearly see the eyes of the enemy. Suddenly a burst of gunfire--

Bam, bam. bam

El Sordo: "Why dos't thou fire so indiscriminately Juanito. I warned thee."

Juanito: "One of the sons of the great whore tried to move from behind that rock to the other."

El Sordo: "Did'st thou get him?"

Juanito: "Nay, the fornicator ducked back."
 
 
errrr, Coen, not Cohen.
 
 
Oh well, Beth, I guess we got them confused with Leonard.........easy enough.
 
 
You mean you guys don't even know the right name of the directors you have been haranguing me about! Hell, I even "went out and came back in again" (to quote Lola) over it, with no perceptible effect
 
 
Did Leonard Coen sing/produce/direct "The Blues Brothers"?
That was an enjoyable romp. Has hollywood produced anything worth seeing since? Some while back a friend gave me a copy of Resevoir Dogs. Watched it twice, back to back. 4 hours of watching someone bleed to death. Hopeless.
 
 
Meanwhile from the Life of Brian

The adoring crowd find out where Brian is hiding. Brian's Mum (Terry Jones) goes to the window and shouts

Look! He's not the Messiah. HE'S A VERY NAUGHTY BOY. NOW PISS OFF.
 
 
 
errrr, Coen, not Cohen.
 

Those Jewish people...even tricky with their names. Thanks bethie, and of course you are right.
 
 
 
Did Leonard Coen sing/produce/direct "The Blues Brothers"?
That was an enjoyable romp. Has hollywood produced anything worth seeing since? Some while back a friend gave me a copy of Resevoir Dogs. Watched it twice, back to back. 4 hours of watching someone bleed to death. Hopeless.
 

steve the football hooligan

Definitely DO go and rent "The Big Lebowski" by Joel and Ethan COEN. You will not be disappointed and I guarantee it. The last decade has been something of a rennaissance in American film, and it's a damned pity that Pauline Kael has missed it. Along with all the predictable high cost garbage planned and executed by actuaries with sunglasses, there's truly delightful works being produced too. I'm particularly partial to these brothers because of the quality of all aspects of their work, and because their subject matter, intelligence and humor are such that one could quite validly make the claim that if Twain were alive today, he'd likely be doing pretty much what these boys are up too.
 
 
 
"What is that"
"A tongue"
"My God, how awful"
"Perhaps its owner had nothing good to say with it"
 

george

The Hemmingway example, and this one above, are lovely! thank you kindly.
 
 
george, you're so funny. You did go out and come back in again very politely and thank you very much for it. But I can hardly be held responsible for the misspelling of a name. I can't spell anything, being dyslexic, as I am. It's a trait I share with our revered President. I'm highly dependent on spellchecker and the internet.

Steve,

See Oh Brother, Where Art Thou. It's based on Homer's The Odyssey with John Goodman as Cyclops and there are sirens and everything. Excellent! It's much better than Reservoir Dogs.
 
 
george

I'll go along with the others and recommend just about any Coen brothers film.

KP
 
 
That's right, KP. I'm partial to Raising Arizona, myself. If you wonder about America, that will explain all.  
 
 
OK, I an overwhelmed: I'll go see a goddamn Cohen, Coen (or is it Cohan - He could be Irish!) film. Please give me names of (say) the top three.
 
 
 
OK, I an overwhelmed: I'll go see a goddamn Cohen, Coen (or is it Cohan - He could be Irish!) film. Please give me names of (say) the top three.
 

1. The Big Lebowski
2. Insufferable Cruelty (might still be in the theaters; you'll like this one if you like K.Hepburn/S.Tracy movies)
3. Oh Brother, Where Art Though?

Approximately in this order
 
 
Raising Arizona... The Big Lebowski...Fargo... and O, Brother Where Art Thou?
 
 
Our friend's daughter married a Cohen, and he's not Jewish.  
 
 
Steve the football hooligan indeed!

I am only a hooligan, Blatham, on a2k. And only then in a most thoughtful and considerate manner.
 
 
Steve's always the gentleman.  
 
 
Well clearly "The Big Lebowski" and "Oh Brother Where art Thou" seem to top everyone's lists. (I'm also inclined to follow Thomas' lead 'cause he's smarter than I am.)

You know I have NEVER even heard of these guys or any of their films. Remarkable ! Perhaps that is a good indicator of just how out of touch I am (Though, I find it it pleasant enough where I am).

I really hate to take advice, or (worse) to accept ideas not my own. I hope some here appreciate what I am doing.
 
 
Fargo and Raising Arizona are also exceptional movies...
 
 
Yeah, but has Thomas seen "Raising Arizona"?
 
 
 
Steve the football hooligan indeed!

I am only a hooligan, Blatham, on a2k. And only then in a most thoughtful and considerate manner.
 

Yes.

(He has learnt by now that some of his vocabulary looks like **** when published here. :wink: )

(And that there is the colour 'BLUE' in football as a dominating factor as well!   )
 
 
Well I think Steve WAS a Hooligan, but he has improived a bit lately.

(I'm still worried about Kitchen Pete though.)
 
 
Yes its true. My behaviour has improived. And it has nothing to do with this cranial microchip insert.
 
 
By the way, I'm not sure I like that word "hooligan". I believe it started as an English ethnic slur against the Irish!
 
 
 
Yeah, but has Thomas seen "Raising Arizona"?
 

I admit I haven't. Will see if I can find it in my nearby video store.
 
 
 
Well I think Steve WAS a Hooligan, but he has improived a bit lately.

(I'm still worried about Kitchen Pete though.)
 

I'm still a bit worried about you, too, George!  

I'll stand by my usual position on such matters:

"I may not agree with what you say but I will defend, to the death, your right to say it".
 
 
Free speech is wunnerful when all agree to the same credo.
 
 
Main Entry: hoo·li·gan
Pronunciation: 'hü-li-g&n
Function: noun
Etymology: perhaps from Patrick Hooligan fl1898 Irish hoodlum in Southwark, London
: RUFFIAN, HOODLUM

Pete, so you defend his right to call me a hooligan? Now which crappy football team did you say you followed?
 
 
The team that's not yet been beaten in the league, this season!
 
 
Doesn't seem, that's the one from Maine Road  ... oh, 'Hello, hello, he's a A***** boy!'
 
 
Oh Yeah? Well you're soon "gooner" get thrashed in the Cup.
You lookin at someone pal? Want some?

[   ]

Actually I think Arsenal will probably win quite easily. The Old Trafford Empire is declining and falling rather quickly. I blame that silly cow Victoria Beckham. And a stupid horse that won too much.
 
 
Thanks Walter, but I got there in the end.
 
 
